WHY  BROADBAND  MATTERS 

S.  HRG.  110–1225 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  16,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–429 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 16, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Cohen, Larry, President, Communications Workers of America (CWA)  .............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Conroy,  Margaret  M.,  Missouri  State  Librarian,  on  behalf  of  the  American 
Library Association (ALA)  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Linkous,  Jonathan  D.,  Chief  Executive  Officer,  American  Telemedicine  Asso-
ciation  ....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mayor, Ph.D., Mara, Member, Board of Directors, AARP  ....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Peltola,  Gene,  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer,  Yukon-Kuskokwim 
Health Corporation  ..............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Ramsey, Rey, Chief Executive Officer, One Economy Corporation  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

......................
American Homeowners Grassroots Alliance, prepared statement 
Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronics  Engineers-United  States  of  America 
(IEEE-USA), prepared statement  .......................................................................
Letter,  dated  November  18,  2008,  from  Margaret  M.  Conroy,  Missouri  State 
Librarian to Hon. Claire McCaskill, U.S. Senator from Missouri  ....................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John F. Kerry to: 

Larry Cohen  ......................................................................................................
Margaret M. Conroy  .........................................................................................
Jonathan Linkous  .............................................................................................
Mara Mayor, Ph.D.  ...........................................................................................
Townsend,  Charles,  President  and  CEO,  Atlantic  Wireless  L.P.,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
53 
48 
3 
3 
51 
2 
56 

7 
10 

23 
25 

15 
17 
19 
21 

40 
43 
4 
5 

62 

66 

75 

70 
74 
71 
72 

61 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

WHY  BROADBAND  MATTERS 

TUESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  16,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:37  a.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Good morning. In this morning’s hearing, we ex-
plore the question why broadband matters. Broadband matters be-
cause  broadband  communications  have  become  the  great  economic 
engine of our time. Broadband deployment drives opportunities for 
business,  education,  health  care.  It  provides  widespread  access  to 
information that can change the way we communicate with one an-
other and improve the quality of our lives. 

This  is  why  our  discussion  this  morning  is  not  about  pipes  and 
providers.  It  is  about  people.  Our  citizens  stand  to  gain  the  most 
from  universal  broadband  adoption.  By  some  estimates,  universal 
broadband  adoption  would  add  $500  billion  to  the  United  States 
economy  and  create  more  than  a  million  new  jobs,  and  added  to 
this, hundreds of millions of dollars in savings through government 
and  telemedicine  initiatives  and  untold  riches  we  can  reap  by  tap-
ping the genius of Web-based entrepreneurs in every corner of this 
country. I think the case for better broadband is very clear. 

Still,  our  broadband  state  is  not  what  it  should  be.  Though  con-
troversial  in  some  quarters,  rankings  among  the  Organization  for 
Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD)  showed  the 
United States slipping down the international broadband ranks. As 
of  this  year,  for  the  first  time,  China  has  a  larger  number  of 
broadband subscribers than the U.S. By some measures, Asian and 
European  countries  have  high-speed  connections  that  are  20  times 
faster  than  ours  and  for  just  half  the  cost.  And  I  believe  that  all 
of us will agree this is unacceptable and we should do better. 

So  let  me  offer  my  thoughts  about  where  to  begin.  I  believe  we 
cannot manage problems that we cannot measure. For this reason, 
last  year  I  introduced  S.  1492,  the  Broadband  Data  Improvement 
Act, which is designed to enhance our understanding of broadband 
deployment and adoption in every state. This bill is not about regu-
lation or deregulation. This is about getting the facts because from 
good information flows good policy. 
(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

2 

So  I  hope  in  the  remaining  days  of  this  Congress  that  Members 
of  this  Committee  can  work  together  to  advance  this  measure  or 
something similar to that in the Senate. Together I believe we can 
look  back  and  say  we  understand  that  broadband  matters  and  we 
did something about it. 

Senator Stevens? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  scheduling  this 

hearing. 

In Alaska, our residents, especially our elderly residents, depend 
upon the ability of their health care providers to be able to commu-
nicate rapidly and effectively over the Internet with the health care 
community.  Many  Alaskans  live  off  the  road  system  in  our  rural 
areas, and the bottom line is that broadband is often the only way 
for  them  to  receive  the  same  quality  of  health  care  as  Americans 
living in what we call the South 48. 

Today  I  intend  to  introduce  the  Telehealth  for  America  Act  of 
2008, which will be a bill to improve health care for rural America 
by  allowing  smaller  rural  health  care  providers  to  participate  in 
the  Universal  Service  Program.  The  Universal  Service  Fund  was 
meant  to  provide  the  Nation’s  rural  health  care  providers  with  ac-
cess to advance telecommunications services. 

Currently,  however,  the  Communications  Act  only  provides  for 
Universal Service Fund support to larger health care providers, but 
it is clear that smaller, remotely located health care providers also 
need  to  be  connected  to  the  Internet.  Allowing  smaller,  specialized 
rural health care entities to access the Universal Service Fund will 
enable them to combine forces with the health care community. 

For  example,  this  bill  would  enable  small  providers  to  share  in-
formation  such  as  medical  records,  provide  improved  training  to 
health  care  personnel  through  videoconferencing  without  requiring 
the personnel to travel away from the provider area and to enhance 
the  overall  ability  of  the  health  care  community  to  provide  rapid 
and coordinated responses to all Americans in time of crisis. 

Specifically,  my  bill  will  revise  the  definition  of  health  care  pro-
viders  eligible  to  receive  Universal  Service  support  to  include 
smaller,  specialized  rural  health  care  entities  such  as  doctors’  of-
fices,  emergency  medical  facilities,  hospices,  blood  banks,  phar-
macies, dental clinics, and facilities caring for our veterans. 

The  bill  will  also  require  the  Federal  Communications  Commis-
sion  to  report  to  Congress  on  its  system  of  fiscal  controls  and  ac-
countability  over  the  Universal  Service  Fund  programs.  The  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund  program  is  vital  to  our  schools,  libraries,  and 
health  care  providers.  It  is  equally  important  that  these  programs 
be  involved  with  advanced  technology  and  grow  with  the  Internet. 
And  I  look  forward  to  working  to  try  and  move  this  bill  forward 
so that Americans in all parts of the Nation can have improved ac-
cess to quality health care, particularly in rural Alaska. 

Again, I want to thank you for including at the end of this testi-
mony,  testimony  from  the  President  of  the  YKH  Corporation  in 
Bethel,  Alaska.  I  think  you  will  find  it  is  going  to  be  a  very  inter-
esting conversation. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

3 

The CHAIRMAN. If I may, may I be listed as a co-sponsor? 
Senator  STEVENS.  I  would  be  delighted  to  have  you  co-sponsor, 

Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  you  said  it  well.  I  do  not  need 
to  add  anything  except  to  say  I  am  a  co-sponsor  of  the  Broadband 
Data  Improvement  Act  and  hope  we  can  get  it  moving.  We  had 
hearings on it last July. 

So  thank  you  for  having  this  hearing  today,  and  if  I  may,  I  will 

submit the statement for the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Nelson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

For  more  and  more  Americans,  affordable  and  accessible  broadband  service  is  no 

longer something that is merely desirable. 

It’s now a necessary component of our economy. 
From  telecommuting  to  telemedicine,  increased  broadband  connectivity  has  the 

potential to improve our productivity and the overall quality of our lives. 

Unfortunately,  the  true  promise  of  broadband  in  the  United  States  has  not  been 

After  years  of  discussion,  we  are  still  one  of  the  few  developed  countries  lacking 

a comprehensive national plan for universal broadband access. 

And the results of that failure are starting to show. 
In  2000,  the  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD) 

began ranking broadband subscribership. 

That year, we ranked 4th among 30 nations surveyed. 
Now we are 15th. 
A  similar  study  by  the  International  Telecommunications  Union  (ITU)  puts  us 

24th in the world—behind Korea, Denmark, Iceland, Canada and Sweden. 

We’ve let this lack of national planning go on for far too long—and now the chick-

met. 

ens are coming home to roost. 

versal broadband access. 

planning mechanism. 

Through  this  hearing  today,  I  hope  we  can  further  illustrate  the  benefits  of  uni-

In addition, I really hope we can also get some movement on some sort of national 

The Broadband Data Improvement Act (S. 1492), of which I am a co-sponsor, rep-

resents a major step in that direction. 

We reported it out of Committee last July. 
Now it’s time for the full Senate to pass this legislation. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  might  say  to  the  Senator  from  Florida,  we 
might be able to make this small bill I am putting in as an amend-
ment to your bill. I would like to chat with you about that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  have  six  witnesses  this  morning:  first,  the 
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of One Economy Corporation 
of Washington, Mr. Rey Ramsey; the President of the Communica-
tions Workers of America, Mr. Larry Cohen; the Executive Director 
of  the  American  Telemedicine  Association,  Mr.  Jonathan  Linkous; 
AARP  Board  Member,  Dr.  Mara  Mayor;  Missouri  State  Librarian, 
Ms.  Margaret  Conroy;  and  the  President  and  CEO  of  Yukon- 
Kuskokwim  Health  Corporation  of  Bethel,  Alaska,  Mr.  Gene 
Peltola. 

May I call upon Mr. Ramsey? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

STATEMENT OF REY RAMSEY, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

ONE ECONOMY CORPORATION 

4 

Mr. RAMSEY. Chairman Inouye, Ranking Member Hutchison, and 
Senator Stevens, it is a pleasure to be here today. I have submitted 
testimony,  and  I  will  refer  to  some  of  the  testimony,  but  I  would 
rather  just  speak  with  you  candidly  about  some  of  the  issues  that 
I see with broadband issues in this country and why it matters. 

First,  a  quick  note  on  One  Economy  Corporation.  We  founded 
One  Economy  Corporation  8  years  ago,  and  I  sort  of  smile  some-
times when I think about the timing of it because that is when the 
technology bubble burst. And when I told my father I was starting 
One Economy Corporation, he smiled about the timing and told me 
I had had a good job. 

So we started One Economy with the goal of using broadband to 
assist low-income individuals with a double-sided approach, to look 
at both the supply side and the demand side. 

So on the supply side, particularly in the year 2000, what we dis-
covered  very  quickly  was  too  many  low-income  individuals  and  in-
dividuals  living  in  rural  communities  did  not  have  access  to 
broadband.  And  our  strategy  really  focused  on  three  basic  prin-
ciples:  to  make  sure  broadband  would  be  affordable,  to  make  sure 
it would available, and very importantly, to make sure it would be 
useful.  And  I  would  like  to  just  unpack  those  three  issues  because 
all three are important. 

The affordability issue has been crucial, and I think some of the 
things  around  competition,  the  lowering  of  the  costs  of  broadband, 
networking affordable housing developments, has had some impact 
on  driving  down  some  of  the  costs,  although  there  is  more  to  be 
done. 

Available.  As  you  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  there  are  many  rural 
communities  that  it  is  still  not  available  the  way  it  should  be,  but 
I would like to spend more time focusing on the issue of how useful 
it is, and that is the issue of the demand side of broadband. 

I  think  this  is  the  most  crucial  area  for  us  to  focus  on  in  this 
country. We started at One Economy to focus on this area that we 
refer  to  as  content,  public  purpose  content,  public  purpose  media, 
and  when  we  look  at  the  issue  of  poverty,  we  said  one  of  the  most 
important  issues  is  making  sure  that  we  do  not  have  information 
haves  and  information  have  nots.  There  is  a  nexus,  a  very  impor-
tant  nexus,  between  the  quality  of  information  and  the  quality  of 
life.  There  are  a  lot  of  people  who  do  not  have  access  to  a  doctor 
and do not know where to get a doctor. There are many people who 
are trapped in poor performing schools, and yet we have the means 
to  be  able  to  bring  content  and  teaching  tools  to  those  individuals 
if we are smart about how we apply broadband. 

And  so  in  this  whole  supposed  digital  divide  movement,  most  of 
the attention has been paid to the issue of supply, and I think that 
is  important.  But  we  would  like  to  see  more  attention  paid  to  the 
applications of the technology. 

So  just  to  give  you  a  few  examples.  We  launched  a  website  a 
number of years ago called the Beehive, www.thebeehive.org, which 
is  a  portal  design  for  low-  and  moderate-income  individuals  to  de-
liver information on health, on jobs, getting the Earned Income Tax 
Credit, taking advantage of several programs. In the past couple of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

5 

years  alone,  as  we  have  done  outreach  campaigns  online  to  help 
low-income people—just this past tax season, we helped people get 
$10 million back just in a few cities of the campaign on their taxes, 
and  it  was  all  filed  online.  And  these  were  low-income,  limited  lit-
eracy  individuals,  proving  that  you  could  use  technology  to  help 
people.  We  have  had  more  than  15  million  individuals  use  that 
website  to  be  able  to  access  important  public  purpose  information. 
Later  this  year,  December  11  of  this  year,  we  will  be  launching 
our  most  ambitious  effort  yet  called  the  Public  Internet  Channel, 
which  will  be  an  online  space  that  is  designed  to  be  able  to  bring 
information  around  health,  around  employment,  around  starting  a 
business,  around  a  whole  host  of  areas  in  partnership  with  many 
other  organizations,  in  both  English  and  in  Spanish,  to  be  able  to 
bring the benefits of broadband to more people. 

So our focus and what we urge Congress and many others to look 
at is how we can make sure broadband is affordable, it is available, 
and  it  is  useful  to  people  because,  again,  it  is  both  a  supply  and 
a demand side issue, and we would like to see more attention paid 
to  the  demand  side  because  we  could  do  more.  We  are  not  making 
enough  investments  on  the  applications  of  technology,  and  where 
a lot of focus is spent on who has broadband and who does not, the 
real  issue  is  if  we  can  make  sure  there  are  applications  available 
to  buttress  our  health  care  system,  to  buttress  our  education  sys-
tem,  to  buttress  our  workforce  development  system,  you  will  get 
more innovation, more people wanting to go online. There are peo-
ple  now  that  have  broadband  available  to  them,  but  they  do  not 
avail  themselves  because  they  do  not  see  that  the  applications  are 
actually speaking to them. 

And this is where I think there is an ideal collaboration between 
the  private  sector  and  a  nonprofit  like  ours.  So  we  team  up  with 
companies  both  on  the  supply  side  and  the  demand  side,  the  Cis-
cos,  the  Verizons,  the  AT&Ts,  the  cable  industry.  We  work  very 
closely with Google on content so that our content is searchable for 
people.  So  we  will  not  rest  as  an  organization  until  we  can  form 
more  partnerships  to  make  sure  broadband  has  that  universal  ap-
plication that we think this country so desperately needs. 

So I submit that to you as my remarks today. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Ramsey follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REY RAMSEY, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

ONE ECONOMY CORPORATION 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to  be  here  today.  My  name  is  Rey  Ramsey,  and  I  am  the  Chief  Executive  Officer 
of One Economy Corporation. 

One Economy is a global nonprofit that leverages the power of technology and in-
formation  to  connect  low-income  people  to  the  economic  mainstream.  We  bring 
broadband into the homes of low-income people, produce public-purpose media, and 
train and employ youth to enhance communities’ technology capacity. Our work has 
taken hold in four continents, from big cities to small rural towns. Since our found-
ing in 2000, our work has reached 15 million people. 

When I look at the state of broadband today, I see good news and bad news. 
The  good  news  is  that  our  country’s  efforts  to  stimulate  the  supply  of  broadband 
have  worked  well.  Most  Americans  have  access  to  broadband  service—by  which  I 
mean  it  is  available  where  they  live  if  they  want  a  connection  to  their  home  com-
puter.  In  fact,  according  to  the  Federal  Communications  Commission’s  Zip  Code 
level data, in more than 90 percent of the United States, consumers can choose from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

6 

three  or  more  broadband  providers.  Nearly  60  percent  of  Americans  have  adopted 
broadband by paying for a high-speed connection. 

But those positive trends in broadband availability should not overshadow the sig-
nificant  inequality  in  broadband  adoption  between  rich  and  poor  communities.  Ac-
cording  to  the  most  recent  Census  Bureau  data,  while  76  percent  of  households 
earning  more  than  $50,000  per  year  are  connected,  only  35  percent  of  homes  with 
annual income less than $50,000 have adopted broadband in their homes. 

At One Economy, we have focused our efforts on low-income consumers—increas-
ing  and  aggregating  their  demand  for  broadband.  Technology—broadband  in  par-
ticular—is  at  the  forefront  of  the  21st  century  fight  against  poverty  because  there 
is an increasingly important connection between the quality of information available 
to people and their quality of life. 

For  example,  70  percent  of  working  families  who  receive  the  Earned  Income  Tax 
Credit (EITC) pay for professional help preparing and filing their taxes and as many 
as 25 percent of families who qualified for the EITC did not receive it. 

This  year,  we  partnered  with  H&R  Block  and  E*TRADE  to  make  free  tax  prepa-
ration  and 
filing  available  online.  Families  using  our  site,  the  Beehive 
(www.thebeehive.org),  received  nearly  $10  million  in  state  and  Federal  refunds.  In 
addition  to  the  $1,000  average  refund  they  received,  broadband  made  possible  the 
education and support these families needed to file for themselves, saving hundreds 
of dollars in fees. 

Broadband  is  a  particularly  powerful  tool  for  fighting  poverty  because  it  mini-

mizes problems of time, mobility, and geographic isolation. 

One Economy recently began work with the Warm Springs Indian Reservation in 
Oregon,  home  to  nearly  4,000  members  of  the  Warm  Spring,  Wasco,  and  Paiute 
tribes.  Broadband  is  already  available  on  the  reservation;  the  Warm  Springs  Tribe 
built  a  Motorola  canopy-based  wireless  solution  to  provide  broadband  to  the  local 
government and individuals. But uptake among residents has been slow, in part be-
cause the average monthly cost is $50—out of reach for many area families. 

In  the  coming  months,  we  will  work  with  reservation  leaders  to  make  broadband 
a  relevant  and  affordable  tool.  In  addition  to  lowering  the  cost  of  home  access  and 
creating  public  access  points,  we  will  use  broadband  and  the  applications  it  makes 
possible  to  expand  tribal  member  participation  in  government,  support  small  busi-
ness  development,  preserve  native  culture,  and  improve  members’  digital  skills. 
Young  people  will  be  trained  in  technical  and  leadership  skills  so  they  can  become 
cultural bridges between their community and technology. 

Government  can  play  a  role  in  stimulating  demand,  as  the  tribal  government  in 
Warm  Springs  is  doing.  Creating  public-purpose  online  media—media  that  puts 
vital  information  and  tools  directly  in  the  hands  of  citizens—can  demonstrate  the 
value proposition of bringing broadband into their lives and homes. For low-income 
people, who are often caught in a web of government programs and services, simple 
and direct online access to those programs can mean the difference between missing 
a day of work to stand in line at a municipal building and getting help in the com-
fort of one’s home. 

Above  all,  we  believe  in  meeting  people  where  they  are.  Our  signature  website, 
the  Beehive,  was  created  to  be  useful  and  useable  for  an  audience  that  may  have 
a  lower  literacy  level  and  may  not  speak  English  as  their  primary  language.  The 
Beehive  provides  low-income  individuals  with  online  access  to  the  information  and 
connections  they  need  on  a  local  level  to  improve  their  lives  while  eliminating  the 
language,  literacy  and  cultural  barriers  that  keep  over  50  million  Americans  from 
fully utilizing the benefits offered by the World Wide Web. 

The results have been dramatic. Among them: 600,000 high school students have 
received help with their homework, 415,000 people have learned about managing di-
abetes, and nearly 1 million people have learned how to secure their computers and 
stay safe online. 

We  create  these  online  tools  and  resources  not  only  to  help  people  improve  their 
lives, but also to introduce them to the wealth of life-changing information available 
online. 

Independent  research  and  our  own  experience  suggest  that  the  principle  barriers 
to people adopting broadband in their homes have less to do with access and afford-
ability  and  more  to  do  with  helping  people  to  understand  the  value  of  broadband, 
helping  to  alleviate  concerns  about  online  safety,  and  a  series  of  other  educational 
and  cultural  issues.  A  2007  survey  by  the  Pew  Internet  and  American  Life  project 
asked non-Internet users why they are not online. You might expect the number one 
reason  to  be  cost.  In  fact,  one-third  of  people  not  using  the  Internet  said  they  are 
just not interested. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

7 

This is not to discount the importance of cost and the work that still needs to be 
done  in  that  area,  but  these  findings  show  that  even  when  broadband  is  available 
and affordable, other concerns remain to be addressed. 

These opportunities to improve health, education, and economic livelihood in low- 
income  communities  demonstrate  that  while  universal  access  is  an  important  goal, 
it  is  only  a  starting  point.  Our  experience  has  shown  that  additional  steps—efforts 
that  are  less  about  a  specific  technology  and  more  about  education  and  creating  a 
culture of use—are needed to ensure that the benefits of the Digital Age are reach-
ing the communities that need them most. 

At  One  Economy,  we  believe  that  the  time  has  come  for  a  broad-based  effort  to 
provide  these  kinds  of  information  and  tools  online.  To  that  end,  we  have  created 
the  Public  Internet  Channel  (PIC.tv):  public-purpose  programming  designed  to  in-
form,  engage,  and  help  people  take  action.  The  Public  Internet  Channel  grew  out 
of  our  experience  delivering  culturally  relevant,  multilingual  information  to  low-in-
come and low-literacy audiences. 

For  every  new  20th-century  communications  technology,  Americans  have  created 
public-purpose programming that uses the power of the airwaves to spread common 
knowledge  and  bring  people  together  on  common  ground.  On  television,  the  Public 
Broadcasting  System’s  viewers  explore  national  and  local  issues.  On  the  radio,  lis-
teners tune into local National Public Radio affiliates to hear educational and civic- 
minded  content  that  cuts  across  differences  in  race,  class,  gender,  and  geography. 
By  providing  the  Public  Internet  Channel  directly  to  all  Americans,  we  hope  to 
narrow  the  information  gap  that  divides  communities  and  provide  a  common  space 
that crosses racial, gender, age, religious, geographic and political barriers. 

The  millions  of  people  who  have  taken  advantage  of  our  online  resources  to  file 
their  taxes,  find  better  schools  for  their  children,  start  new  businesses,  and  take 
other steps to improve their lives demonstrate the need for such an effort. 

Again,  I  appreciate  the  Committee’s  interest  in  how  broadband  stands  to  benefit 
low-income  communities.  I  believe  that  a  policy  that  brings  the  traditional  concep-
tion  of  universal  service  into  the  digital  age,  while  addressing  the  broad  spectrum 
of  reasons  why  people  are  not  online,  stands  to  improve  the  lives  of  millions  of 
Americans. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Ramsey. 
May we now receive testimony from President Cohen? 

STATEMENT OF LARRY COHEN, PRESIDENT, 

COMMUNICATIONS WORKERS OF AMERICA (CWA) 

Mr.  COHEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It’s  great  to  be  here.  I 
appreciate  the  opportunity  and  also  the  focus  of  this  work  by  the 
Committee. 

I  am  Larry  Cohen,  the  President  of  CWA.  We  represent  700,000 
members.  Our  members  build,  maintain,  and  service  these  net-
works  that  we  are  discussing  here  today  and  are  also  journalists 
and  broadcasters  and  others  who  create  the  content  that  travels 
over  the  communication  networks  of  our  country.  So  our  members 
and  our  union  everyday  see  why  broadband  matters  and  why  the 
speed of broadband matters. 

Two  years  ago,  we  launched  our  national  campaign  called  Speed 
Matters.  The  main  website  is  speedmatters.org.  Over  the  past  two 
years,  CWA  members,  working  with  community  groups  and  activ-
ists  across  the  country,  have  tried  to  boost  up  the  public  attention 
and  information  about  why  broadband  matters,  and  specifically 
why the speed of broadband matters. 

There are dozens of examples which you wil1 find in my written 
testimony.  I  am  not  going  to  go  through  the  examples,  but  they 
range  from  workers  in  the  communications  industry  itself  like  500 
customer  service  workers  in  rural  Virginia  who  work  at  an  AT&T 
call center. If there were no broadband there, they obviously would 
not  be  employed.  It  used  to  be  a  mining  area.  So  in  terms  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

conversion  of  our  economy  for  the  21st  century,  high  speed 
broadband is absolutely critical. 

8 

But  also  small  business.  In  our  Speed  Matters  campaign,  we 
talked  to  farmers  in  rural  Vermont  who  told  us  their  broadband 
connection  allowed  them  to  double  their  maple  syrup  business 
through  Internet  marketing  and  sales.  Farmers  in  Iowa,  a  similar 
thing.  They  were  part  of  the  global  economy  and  it  would  make  a 
huge difference. Small businesses in Appalachia and southern Ohio 
creating  new  jobs  through  Connect  Ohio,  a  public/private  partner-
ship,  similar  to  the  one  Mr.  Ramsey  described,  and  bringing  high- 
speed Internet to an industrial park in an underserved area. 

Examples  go  on  and  on.  Internet  learning.  We  now  estimate  3.5 
million  students  a  year  take  one  or  more  courses  on  the  Internet. 
So the demand side is growing. We need to stimulate that demand. 
I want to jump, though, to this chart. Part of our focus in Speed 
Matters  has  been  that  Internet  speed  matters,  that  we  have  de-
fined  broadband  totally  inadequately  in  the  United  States,  so  we 
actually overstate its presence. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

Source:  International  data  from  the  Information  Technology  and  Innovation  Foundation 
(ITIF);  U.S.  data  from  speedmatters.org  test  results.  Most  test  participants  had  DSL  or  cable 
modem connections. 

What  we  see  on  this  chart  is  the  United  States,  and  we  could 
have  many  more  countries,  but  we  picked  the  U.S.,  Canada, 
France,  Finland,  South  Korea,  and  Japan.  The  U.S.  is  trailing, 
where  the  average  download  speeds  in  the  U.S.  now,  based  on  our 
survey,  is  2.3  megabits  per  second.  This  is  people  who  have 
broadband.  And  then  you  see  Japan  leading  the  world  in  Internet 
speeds  where  the  average  download  speed  is  63  megabits  per  sec-
ond.  That  gap  is  enormous  in  terms  of  what  that  produces.  And 
this  is  the  average  speed.  So  in  Japan  today,  85  percent  of  homes 
are  passed  by  100  megabit  service.  In  the  United  States,  it  is  a 
small fraction. 

Actually  with  me  in  the  audience—I  would  just  ask  him  to 
stand—Shoji Morishima is the head of our equivalent, the NWJ, in 
Japan.  And  what  we  have  seen  in  Japan  for  years  is  the  union 
there,  the  NWJ,  partnering  with  NTT  and  the  government  to  pro-
mote  high  speed  broadband  deployment—this  is  not  an  accident 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
N
E
H
O
C
6
1
9

9 

that  this  happened  in  Japan.  It  is  because  that  was  the  focus  of 
their public policy. 

And more than anything else today, we are here to applaud real-
ly  S.  1492  as  a  beginning.  We  are  the  only  industrial  country  in 
the  world  that  has  no  policy  in  this  way,  and  whether  we  talk 
about  South  Korea  or  Finland  or  France  and  Japan,  all  of  them 
have  had  public  policy  for  years  now  not  only  to  promote 
broadband,  but  to  define  broadband  in  21st  century  terms.  In  that 
regard, we applaud not only the Committee and the bipartisan sup-
port for S. 1492, but Senator Rockefeller and his resolution for set-
ting goals. 

And  in  our  Speed  Matters  campaign,  we  have  a  similar  goal,  10 
megabits  per  second  passing  every  American  house  by  2010.  We 
are not going to get there unless we have real dramatic action and 
now.  And  again,  10  megabits  per  second.  Look  at  where  we  would 
be on the chart even with that. 

Right  now,  the  only  progress  we  can  report  in  the  last  year  is 
that  the  FCC,  with  your  help,  has  increased  the  definition  of 
broadband  from  200  kilobits  to  768  kilobits  per  second.  That  hap-
pened  only  this  year,  again,  more  than  a  year  into  our  campaign 
and  more  than  a  year,  as  Senator  Nelson  said,  since  this  bill  S. 
1492  was  introduced.  768  kilobits,  less  than  three-quarters  of  a 
megabit, and the global standard is actually 100 megabits per sec-
ond. 

And  so  part  two  of  Senator  Rockefeller’s  resolution  is  to  set  a 
standard  of  100  megabits  per  second  in  both  directions  because 
uploading matters as well. Otherwise, we are only receiving, we are 
not sharing. And his resolution would call for 100 megabits per sec-
ond  by  2015.  We  need  goals  like  this  and  we  need  the  action  to 
bring it about. 

How would we do that? 
First,  as  Mr.  Ramsey  said,  public-private  partnerships.  I  am  not 

going to repeat that. He covered that well. 

Actually first I would say is pass S. 1492. 
Second,  establish  the  kind  of  goals  that  Senator  Rockefeller  has 

talked about. 

Third, public-private partnerships. 
Fourth,  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  We  need  to,  in  the  future 
here, look at what we are funding with $6 billion a year. Dial tone 
does  not  need  that  kind  of  funding  anymore.  We  need  to  take,  in 
our  view,  the  funds  from  the  Universal  Service  Fund  and  focus  on 
high-speed  Internet  in  rural  and  underserved  urban  communities 
in  this  country.  They  are  not  going  to  get  it  through  the  market 
alone. 

And finally, as this Committee has discussed before as well, pre-

serving an open Internet with reasonable network management. 

If  we  do  all  these  things  together,  we  believe  that  this  chart 
could  look  different  at  least  two  or  three  years  from  now  and  that 
we are no longer talking about what are other countries doing, but 
once  again,  as  we  were  in  the  1990s,  we  are  talking  about  what 
this country is doing and how we are leading and how we are pro-
viding  the  kind  of  jobs  and  education,  telemedicine  and  the  other 
things  that  others  on  this  panel  will  talk  about  today  for  our  chil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

10 

dren,  for  our  parents,  for  our  communities,  for  our  future.  Thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Cohen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LARRY COHEN, PRESIDENT, 

COMMUNICATIONS WORKERS OF AMERICA 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify today on why broadband matters. 

I  am  Larry  Cohen,  President  of  the  Communications  Workers  of  America.  CWA 
represents  700,000  workers  in  communications,  media,  airlines,  manufacturing  and 
public  service.  Our  members  build,  maintain,  service,  and  create  the  content  that 
travels  over  our  Nation’s  vital  communications  networks.  Everyday  they  see  why 
broadband matters. 
Speed Matters on the Internet 

Two  years  ago  CWA  launched  our  Speed  Matters  campaign.  Over  these  past  24 
months,  CWA  activists  have  been  spreading  the  word  about  why  speed  matters  on 
the  Internet.  We’ve  talked  about  it  at  state  fairs,  in  union  halls,  before  educators 
and health care professionals and farm organizations, in dozens of state houses and 
city  council  chambers  and  state  broadband  commissions.  Everywhere  we’ve  gone, 
people  get  it.  Speed  Matters  on  the  Internet.  We’ve  helped  move  state  broadband 
initiatives  to  bring  the  benefits  of  this  technology  to  every  American  household, 
business, and community in America. 

Now it’s time to bring national leadership to this critical issue. It is long past time 
for  the  Senate  to  adopt  S.  1492,  the  Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act.  This  bill 
would  improve  Federal  broadband  data  collection,  provide  grants  to  states  for 
broadband  mapping  and  for  public-private  partnerships  to  stimulate  supply  of  and 
demand for broadband networks and services. States such as Kentucky, Tennessee, 
Ohio,  Virginia,  Washington,  North  Carolina,  California  and  others  have  dem-
onstrated  the  effectiveness  of  such  partnerships,  but  their  work  is  hampered  by 
state  fiscal  constraints  and  the  lack  of  a  nationally-focused  effort.1 Adopting  a  na-
tional  policy  to  stimulate  broadband  subscription  where  it  is  already  available,  and 
deployment where it is not, could have dramatic and far-reaching economic impacts, 
estimated  at  more  than  $134  billion.2 A  broad-based  alliance  of  31  groups  rep-
resenting health care, education, labor, rural and public interest organizations, tele-
communications  and  cable  companies,  and  trade  associations  have  joined  together 
to  urge  Congress  to  act  now  to  adopt  S.  1492  as  a  critical  first  step  in  moving  this 
Nation forward on a broadband agenda. (A copy of this letter is attached to my testi-
mony.) 

High-speed  broadband  is  the  critical  infrastructure  for  the  21st  century.  In  the 
same way that railroads, canals, and the postal service drove economic development 
in the 19th century, and interstate highways and universal telephone service helped 
make us the richest nation on earth in the 20th century, high-speed broadband net-
works are the platform upon which we will grow jobs and our economy in the com-
ing  years.  Equally  important,  advanced  networks  support  innovations  in  health 
care, education, public safety, energy, and public services that will improve our lives 
and communities. 
U.S. Trails Behind Other Countries 

Our nation is falling behind other industrialized countries in the deployment and 
adoption  of  high-speed  Internet.  You’ve  heard  the  statistics.  The  U.S.  has  dropped 

1 States  that  have  adopted  the  Connected  Nation  public-private  partnership  model  include 
Kentucky,  Ohio,  Tennessee,  West  Virginia,  and  South  Carolina.  Additional  states  with 
broadband task forces, commissions, authorities or reports include Arkansas, California, Hawaii, 
Kansas,  Maine,  Maryland,  Massachusetts,  Minnesota,  Missouri,  Nebraska,  New  Hampshire, 
North Carolina, New York, South Carolina, Vermont, Virginia, and West Virginia. For more in-
formation  on  state  programs,  see  CWA  and  Alliance  for  Public  Technology,  ‘‘State  Broadband 
Initiatives,’’ 2008 (available at http://www.speedmatters.org/statepolicy) 

2 Connected  Nation  found  that  increased  broadband  adoption  by  7  percent  could  result  in  2.4 
million new jobs; $552 million annual health care savings; $6.4 billion annual savings from un-
necessary driving; $18 million in carbon credits associated with 3.2 billion fewer pounds of CO2 
emissions  per  years;  and  $35.2  billion  in  3.8  billion  hours  saved  from  accessing  broadband  at 
home.  Connected  Nation,  ‘‘The  Economic  Impact  of  Stimulating  Broadband  Nationally,’’ 
Feb.  2008  (available  at  http://www.connectednation.org/research/economiclimpactlstudy/ 
index.php). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

11 

to  15th  among  the  world’s  advanced  economies  in  home  broadband  penetration.3 
There’s  a  serious  digital  divide  based  on  income  and  geography.  Families  in  rural 
areas  are  much  less  likely  to  subscribe  to  broadband  than  those  living  in  urban  or 
suburban  communities.  And  only  one-quarter  of  low-income  Americans  have 
broadband, compared to 85 percent of those at the top of the income scale.4 

Moreover,  we’re  falling  behind  our  global  competitors  in  the  capacity  of  our 
broadband  networks.  Last  month,  CWA  released  the  results  of  our  second  annual 
survey  of  Internet  speeds  in  all  50  states.  You  can  see  the  results  on  the  chart— 
the United States continues to lag far behind other countries. 

According  to  the  survey,  the  median  Internet  download  speed  for  the  Nation  is 
2.3 megabits per second (mbps). Contrast this to Japan, where the median download 
speed is 63 megabits per second—30 times faster than in the U.S., and yet the Japa-
nese pay about the same as we do for their faster Internet connection. The U.S. also 
trails South Korea, Finland, France, Canada, and even Croatia.5 

Equally  troubling,  the  2008  speed  test  shows  that  the  median  Internet  download 
speed increased by only four-tenths of one megabit per second over last year. At this 
rate of progress, it will take the U.S. more than 100 years to catch up with current 
Internet speeds in Japan. 

The  CWA  report  details  median  Internet  download  and  upload  speeds  in  every 
state.  But  whatever  state  you  live  in,  your  Internet  connection  speed  likely  trails 
those  of  residents  of  our  northern  neighbor  Canada,  a  large  country  with  a  signifi-
cant rural population. 
Speed Matters for U.S. Economic Growth and Job Creation 

Why  does  speed  matter  on  the  Internet?  Speed  determines  what  is  possible.  I’m 
talking about more than the speed at which you can download movies. Job creation, 
rural  development,  telemedicine,  distance  learning,  even  solutions  to  global  warm-
ing all rely on truly high-speed, universal networks. 

High-speed  broadband  is  essential  for  economic  growth.  In  a  report  prepared  for 
the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  economists  found  that  communities  with 
broadband experienced a higher rate of job growth and new business start-ups than 
communities  without  high-speed  networks.  Another  study  of  the  central  Appa-
lachian  region  found  that  firms  in  communities  with  broadband  were  14  to  17  per-
cent more productive than those in communities without high-speed Internet access. 
A Brookings Institution paper calculated that build-out of broadband infrastructure 
to  all  households  would  add  $500  billion  to  gross  domestic  product  and  1.2  million 
additional  jobs.  Another  report  warned  that  the  failure  to  improve  broadband  per-
formance  could  reduce  U.S.  productivity  by  1  percentage  point  or  more  per  year.6 
Behind  these  statistics  are  real  stories  that  people  have  shared  with  our  Speed 
Matters team about the ways in which high-speed Internet creates economic oppor-
tunity and good jobs across our great nation. Just ask any of the 500 CWA members 

3 Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development,  2007  (report  available  at 

http://www.oecd.org/document/54/0,3343,enl2649l34225l38690102l1l1l1l1,00.html). 
The  U.S.  ranked  24th  in  broadband  subscribers  among  all  countries,  according  to  the  Inter-
national  Telecommunications  Union,  World  Telecommunications  Data  base  2007  (available  At 
http://www.itu.int/osg/spu/newslog/ITU+Broadband+Statistics+For+1+January+2005.aspx) 

4 Fifty-seven  percent  of  urban  households  and  60  percent  of  suburban  households  subscribe 
to  broadband,  compared  to  only  38  percent  or  rural  households.  Whereas  85  percent  of  Ameri-
cans  who  earn  over  $100,000  a  year  have  broadband,  only  25  percent  of  households  that  earn 
less than $20,000 subscribe. Only about one-half (49 percent) of middle-income families earning 
between  $30,000  and  $40,000  a  year  subscribe  to  broadband.  Pew  Internet  &  American  Life 
Project,  ‘‘Home  Broadband  Adoption  2008.’’  (available  at  http://www.pewinternet.org/PPF/r/ 
257/reportldisplay.asp) 

6 William  Lehr,  Carlos  A.  Osorio,  Sharon  E.  Gillett,  and  Marvin  Sirbu, 

5 For international data, see Robert D. Atkinson, Daniel K. Correa, Julie K. Hedlund, Explain-
ing International Broadband Leadership, Washington, D.C.: The Information Technology and In-
novation  Foundation,  May  2008 
(available  at  http://www.itif.org/files/ExplainingBB 
Leadership.pdf).  The  CWA  Speed  Matters  2008  report  is  available  at  http://speedmatters.org. 
‘‘Measuring 
Broadband’s  Economic  Impact,’’  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  Economic  Development  Admin-
istration  (Feb.  2006)  (available  at  http://www.eda.gov/ImageCache/EDAPublic/documents/ 
pdfdocs2006/mitcmubbimpactreportl2epdf/v1/rnitcmubbimpactreport.pdf);  Mark  L.  Burton 
and Michael J. Hicks, ‘‘The Residential and Commercial Benefits of Rural Broadband: Evidence 
from Central Appalachia,’’ June 2005, Paper prepared for the West Virginia Development Office, 
Center  for  Business  and  Economic  Research,  Marshall  University;  R.  Crandall  and  C.  Jackson, 
‘‘The  $500  Billion  Opportunity:  The  Potential  Economic  Benefit  of  Widespread  Diffusion  of 
Broadband  Internet  Access,’’  Criterion  Economics,  2001  (available  at  www.ntia.doc.gov/ 
ntiahome/broadband/comments/verizon/ExhibitA.pdf);  C.  Ferguson, 
‘‘The  United  States 
Broadband  Problem:  Analysis  and  Recommendations,’’  Brookings  Institution  Working  Paper, 
2002 
http://www.brookings.edu/views/papers/ferguson/workinglpaperl 
20020531.pdf) 

(available 

at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

12 

working  at  an  AT&T  call  center  in  southwestern  Virginia,  an  area  suffering  from 
the  decline  of  the  coal  and  tobacco  industries.  They’ll  tell  you  that  building  a  fiber 
backbone  to  their  region  was  literally  a  lifeline  for  themselves  and  their  families. 
Or  ask  Daniel  and  Karen  Fortin  of  rural  northern  Vermont,  who  told  us  that  their 
broadband  connection  allowed  them  to  double  their  maple  syrup  business  through 
Internet  marketing  and  sales.  A  hog  farmer  in  Iowa  let  us  know  that  direct  mar-
keting  to  customers  around  the  globe  using  broadband  boosted  his  profit  margin. 
And  the  owners  of  several  small  businesses  in  the  Appalachian  region  of  southern 
Ohio  told  us  that  they  were  able  to  create  60  new  jobs  once  Connect  Ohio’s  public- 
private partnership found a way to bring a high-speed connection to their industrial 
park. The examples go on and on . . . 
Speed Matters Offers Solutions to High Gas Prices and Global Warming 

High-speed  broadband  also  offers  opportunities  to  address  our  energy  crisis  and 
to save on gas expenses through reduced travel time. Telehealth, distance learning, 
teleconferencing, and telecommuting allow people to learn, work, and receive health 
care  services  at  home  without  getting  in  their  car.  One  study  estimates  that  wide-
spread adoption of these broadband applications over 10 years could save the equiv-
alent  of  11  percent  of  annual  U.S.  oil  imports.7 Other  nations  and  some  states  and 
localities  are  experimenting  with  the  use  of  smart  meters  and  electric  grids  to  re-
duce  energy  consumption  by  transmitting  real-time  information  about  energy  use 
over two-way broadband networks. A statewide pilot project in California found that 
the  information  provided  to  consumers  using  smart  meters  reduced  energy  bills  by 
10  percent.  The  Electric  Power  Research  Institute  estimates  that  investment  in 
smart  grid  technology,  including  a  modernized  high-speed  Internet  communications 
system,  would  yield  a  20-year  benefit  of  ranging  from  $638  billion  to  $802  billion.8 
Speed Matters for Education and Lifelong Learning 

Advanced  broadband  networks  open  opportunities  for  students  to  participate  in 
online learning and lifelong education. Almost 3.5 million students take one or more 
courses  online  every  year,  according  to  the  Sloan  Foundation.9 Many  of  these  are 
non-traditional  students—working  parents,  employees  who  want  to  advance  their 
careers,  or  unemployed  adults  entering  the  work  force.  They  find  the  convenience 
of  online  learning  allows  them  to  take  courses  without  the  conflicts  of  child  care, 
busy  schedules,  or  non-traditional  work  hours.  Online  learners  who  have  two-way, 
video  connections  carried  over  truly  high-speed  broadband  can  participate  in  class 
discussions  and  ask  questions  in  real-time,  creating  a  virtual  classroom  experience. 
States such as New Jersey and Texas have used Federal job training monies to help 
low-income  adults  gain  new  skills  through  online  coursework.10 CWA  offers  online 
education and training programs in three areas—telecommunications, digital media, 
and  criminal  justice.  Our  CWA/NETT  Academy,  as  we  call  it,  allows  our  members 
to meet new technical requirements and branch into new areas of study in rapidly- 
changing  industries  so  they  can  succeed  in  their  careers.  As  the  quality  of  U.S. 
broadband networks improves, our university partners are able to provide ever-more 
engaging interactive, multi-media learning experiences for our members.11 
The U.S. Must Adopt a National Broadband Policy 

The United States is the only industrial nation without a national broadband pol-
icy to promote high-speed broadband. There are a number of bold but specific steps 
that  the  U.S.  should  take  to  recover  our  lost  leadership  and  competitive  position  to 
ensure that all residents benefit from affordable, high-speed Internet access. 

First,  we  must  improve  our  broadband  data  collection.  The  Federal  Communica-
tions  Commission  took  a  first  step  earlier  this  year,  requiring  all  carriers  to  report 
the  number  of  broadband  subscribers  at  the  census  tract  level  by  technology  type 

7 Joseph P. Fuhr and Stephen B. Pociask, ‘‘Broadband Services: Economic and Environmental 
Benefits,’’  Oct.  2007  (available  at  http://www.internetinnovation.org/Portals/0/Documents/ 
FinallGreenlBenefits.pdf). 

8 See  Report  of  Governmental  Affairs  Division,  Committee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  New  York 
City  Council,  Nov.  15,  2006  (available  at  http://webdocs.nyccouncil.info/attaehments/75 
229.htm); Economic Power Research Institute, ‘‘Power Delivery System of the Future: A Prelimi-
nary  Estimate  of  Costs  and  Benefits,’’  2006  (available  at  http://my.epri.com/portal/serv-
er.pt?open=512&objID=210&mode=2&inlhiluserid=2&cached=true). 

9 The  Sloan  Consortium  of  Institutions  and  Organizations  Committed  to  Quality  Online  Edu-

cation (available at http://www.sloan-c.org/) 

10 Dr. Mary Gatt, ‘‘The New Digital Divide for Workforce Development Policy: Broadband Ac-
cess  and  Skills  Training,’’  Sloan  Center  on  Innovative  Training  and  Workforce  Development, 
Center  for  Women  and  Work,  Rutgers  University,  2006  (available  at  http://www.itwd 
.rutgers.edu/mainPages/index.htm). 

11 For more information, see CWA/Nett Academy at http://www.cwanett.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

13 

and  upload  and  download  speed.  Now,  the  Commission  is  considering  reporting  re-
quirements on broadband infrastructure. 

S.  1492,  the  Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act,  would  fill  in  important  gaps  in 
the Commission’s broadband data collection. For example, the bill would require the 
Commission  to  analyze  demographic  information  in  areas  without  broadband  and 
report on international broadband comparisons; it would require the Census Bureau 
to collect detailed information about broadband prices, technology, applications, and 
subscription  in  its  annual  consumer  survey;  and  it  would  require  the  Government 
Accounting  Office  to  study  best  practices  for  reporting  broadband  price,  speed,  and 
other critical issues. 

As  I  noted  earlier,  S.  1492  would  also  authorize  a  program  of  grants  to  states  to 
conduct  broadband  mapping  and  fund  initiatives  to  stimulate  broadband  adoption 
where it is available, and deployment where it is not. In Kentucky, such a program 
resulted  in  a  three-year  increase  in  broadband  availability  from  60  percent  to  95 
percent of households.12 CWA members sit on a number of state broadband commis-
sions, and know first-hand the fiscal limitations those bodies face in moving forward 
with their work. I strongly urge Congress to pass S.1492 this session to improve our 
knowledge base on broadband deployment and adoption, and to assist states in their 
important efforts. 

Looking  ahead,  CWA  supports  a  number  of  other  policies  to  stimulate  broadband 
deployment and adoption. First, we must establish a national policy goal. CWA rec-
ommends  we  set  a  two  tiered  goal  of  build-out  of  networks  with  enough  capacity 
for  10  megabits  per  second  downstream  and  1  megabit  per  second  upstream  by 
2010, and capable of delivering 100 megabits per second in both directions by 2015, 
as  proposed  by  Senator  Rockefeller  in  S.  Res.  191.  Second,  we  need  to  reform  our 
universal service system to support affordable high-speed Internet for all. Third, we 
should  adopt  policies  that  spur  deployment  of  faster,  second-generation  networks 
through  tax  incentives  and  low-interest  loans.  Fourth,  we  should  support  demand- 
stimulation  programs  that 
for  community-based  public-interest 
broadband applications and services, digital literacy programs, and provision of free 
and  low-cost  computers  to  low-income  households.  Finally,  we  must  preserve  an 
open  Internet,  subject  to  reasonable  network  management.  In  all  these  initiatives, 
we must continue to safeguard consumers and promote good career jobs for workers 
in the industry. 

I  want  to  conclude  with  a  story  that  captures  how  Speed  Matters  can  erase  the 
barriers  of  time  and  distance  to  improve  lives.  This  past  summer,  Marine  Lance 
Corporal  Michael  Cintron  was  6,000  miles  away  from  home  when  his  wife  Jeanine 
gave birth to his son. Cintron was able to watch the birth over a four-hour webcast 
from  Maimonides  Medical  Center  in  Brooklyn,  New  York.  As  reported  in  the  New 
York  Daily  News,  this  soldier  stationed  in  Iraq  heard  the  baby’s  heartbeat  and  got 
to  see  his  son  in  New  York  even  before  the  birth  mother,  as  they  put  the  webcam 
up to the side of the baby. (A copy of the article is attached) 

fund  grants 

This  is  the  power  of  broadband.  It’s  up  to  us  to  make  sure  that  every  American 

has access to the power of this technology. Speed Matters. 

Thank you. 

ATTACHMENT A 

July 11, 2008 

Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Chairman, 
Senate Commerce Committee, 
Washington, DC. 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Vice Chairman, 
Senate Commerce Committee, 
Washington, DC. 

Hon. JOHN D. DINGELL, 
Chairman, 
House Committee on Energy and 

Commerce, 

Washington, DC. 
Hon. JOE BARTON, 
Ranking Member, 
House Committee on Energy and 

Commerce, 

Washington, DC. 

Dear  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Chairman  Dingell  and  Ranking 

Member Barton: 

The  undersigned  organizations  write  to  express  our  strong  support  for  Congres-
sional  action  to  promote  greater  availability  and  adoption  of  broadband  high-speed 
Internet services. 

12 Information on Connect Kentucky available at http://www.connectkentucky.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

14 

The leading bills pending before Congress (S. 1492, the Broadband Data Improve-
ment Act and H.R. 3919, the Broadband Census of America Act of 2007) would im-
prove information-gathering about current broadband deployment and assist in tar-
geting resources to areas in need of such services. A recent FCC order requires more 
focused  broadband  data  collection  from  broadband  providers  but  does  not  address 
other  important  broadband  mapping  elements  contained  in  the  pending  legislation. 
We believe Congress should adopt legislation this year that provides Federal Gov-
ernment  support  for  state  initiatives  using  public-private  partnerships  to  identify 
gaps  in  broadband  coverage  and  to  develop  both  the  supply  of  and  demand  for 
broadband  in  those  areas.  The  ability  to  accelerate  deployment  and  adoption  by 
bringing together government, broadband providers, business, labor, farm organiza-
tions,  librarians,  educators,  and  consumer  groups  in  public-private  partnerships  is 
greater than the ability of these diverse players standing alone. 

Adopting a national policy to stimulate subscription where it is already available, 
and deployment where it is not, could have dramatic and far-reaching economic im-
pacts. For example, a Connected Nation study released February 2008 estimated the 
total  annual  economic  impact  of  accelerating  broadband  across  the  Nation  to  be 
more than $134 billion. In addition to the $134 billion total benefit, the study found 
that increasing broadband adoption by another 7 percent could result in: 

• $92  billion  through  an  additional  2.4  million  jobs  per  year  created  or  retained; 
• $662 million saved per year in reduced healthcare costs; 
• $6.4 billion per year in mileage savings from unnecessary driving; 
• $18  million  in  carbon  credits  associated  with  3.2  billion  fewer  pounds  of  CO2 

emissions per year in the United States; and 

• $35.2 billion in value from 3.8 billion more hours saved per year from accessing 

broadband at home. 

We  cannot  afford  to  let  another  year  go  by  without  adopting  policies  that  will 
stimulate  the  economy  in  such  ways,  while  expanding  use  of  the  networks  that  are 
already deployed and providing broadband in previously underserved areas. That is 
why we urge you to work in a bipartisan, bicameral way to enact Federal legislation 
this year. 

Thank you for your timely consideration of this important issue. 

Internet Innovation Alliance 
NIC, Inc. 
National Cable and Telecommunications 

Association 

National Farmers Union 
The National Grange 
National Rural Health Association 
Organization for the Promotion and 

Advancement of Small 
Telecommunications Companies 

Qwest 
Time Warner Cable 
U.S. Cattlemen’s Association 
U.S. Chamber of Commerce 
United States Telecom Association 
Verizon 
Western Telecommunications Association 
Windstream 

Sincerely, 

AT&T 
Alliance for Public Technology 
American Association of People with 

Disabilities 

American Library Association 
Cablevision 
Charter Communications 
The Children’s Partnership 
Comcast 
Communications Workers of America 
Connected Nation 
Cox Communications 
EDUCAUSE 
Embarq 
Independent Telephone & 

Telecommunications Alliance 

Information Technology Industry Council 
International Brotherhood of Electrical 

Workers 

ATTACHMENT B 

New York Daily News Writers—Thursday, July 10, 2008, 4.58 PM 

MARINE SEES BIRTH, THANKS TO 6,000-MILE WEB HOOKUP 

By Jenny Merkin and Owen Moritz 

He  was  6,000  miles  from  Brooklyn,  but  Marine  Lance  Cpl.  Michael  Cintron  got 

a glimpse of his newborn son before his wife did. 

‘‘Hi. I’m your daddy,’’ Cintron announced to his minutes-old son. ‘‘Look, your nose 

is squishy.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

15 

In  a  remarkable  four-hour  Web  cast  from  a  maternity  ward  at  Maimonides  Med-
ical  Center,  mom  Jeannine  Cintron’s  delivery  of  son  Michael  James  Cintron  was 
beamed clear across ocean and land to his 26-year-old father in Iraq. 

The  baby  weighed  in  at  7  pounds,  3  ounces  and  the  new  dad  weighed  in  with  a 

fatherly shriek: ‘‘Look! He’s looking at me!’’ 

In  Maimonides’  first  ever  video  conference  of  a  baby  delivery,  Cintron  first  heard 

the baby’s heartbeat. 

‘‘What’s that knocking sound I hear,’’ laughed the Staten Island native. 
Then the camera followed as Jeannine was wheeled into an operating room to un-
dergo a C-section on Tuesday. That’s when the Marine got to see the baby emerging 
from his wife’s womb. 

‘‘He got to see our son first from 6,000 miles away,’’ Jeannine marveled. ‘‘He actu-
ally saw the baby before I did. They put the Webcam up to the side with the baby.’’ 
The  video  conference  was  initiated  by  a  nonprofit  organization  called  Freedom 

Calls, which arranged with Maimonides for covering little Michael’s birth. 

The proud parents were still in a state of disbelief Wednesday, not only about the 
birth  of  their  first  child,  but  the  electronic  wizardry  that  gave  dad  a  real-time  ma-
ternity room experience. 

‘‘This  is  surreal,’’  Jeannine  said.  ‘‘I  didn’t  expect  this.  I  feel  so  blessed.  There  are 

so many women in my situation that don’t have this. 

‘‘I didn’t know what I was in for,’’ she added. ‘‘It’s only my first baby.’’ 
‘‘Pretty  much  throughout  my  entire  pregnancy,  I  was  most  sad  about  doing  it 
[birth]  by  myself,’’  she  went  on.  ‘‘Delivering  by  myself  was  horrifying.  No,  he 
couldn’t hold my hand, but he was there for hours.’’ 

Jeannine,  25,  who  works  in  sales  for  Clear  Channel  and  hails  from  Sheepshead 
Bay, and Michael, 26, a sanitation worker from Staten Island assigned to First Sup-
ply Battalion S6, were married last year. 

The  couple  found  out  Michael  was  going  to  Iraq  only  a  few  weeks  after  they 

learned Jeannine was pregnant. 

‘‘I think I’ll keep him [the baby],’’ the ecstatic mom said. 
For  more  information  on  how  to  donate  to  the  Freedom  Calls  Foundation,  visit 

www.freedomcalls.org 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
I  would  like  to  advise  the  panel  that  their  full  statements  will 
be made part of the record, and if you wish to add, please feel free 
to do so. 

Next we have Mr. Jonathan Linkous. 
STATEMENT OF JONATHAN D. LINKOUS, CHIEF EXECUTIVE 

OFFICER, AMERICAN TELEMEDICINE ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  LINKOUS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  here  as  the  CEO 
of  the  American  Telemedicine  Association.  We  are  a  national  and 
international  organization  composed  of  physicians,  hospitals,  pro-
viders of health care, as well as telecommunications companies and 
others  around  the  country,  around  the  world  that  are  providing 
telemedicine to patients no matter where they live. 

My  thoughts  on  broadband  this  morning  are  really  shaped 
around  my  own  personal  experience.  I  came  to  Washington,  D.C. 
working with the Appalachian Regional Commission. My mom and 
dad  were  both  born  in  the  Appalachian  Region  and  suffered  from 
the  isolation.  When  President  Johnson  started  the  Appalachian 
Commission,  we  realized  the  Federal  Government  could  best  help 
those people by building a highway system and opening up the iso-
lation  of  Appalachia  by  building  those  highways  to  give  them  ac-
cess  to  education  and  jobs  and  health  care.  The  highways  of  today 
are  communication  lines,  and  it  is  just  as  important  to  provide 
high-speed telecommunications, broadband, to open up the isolation 
of a lot of Americans, no matter where they live. 

Twenty years ago, telemedicine was largely composed of federally 
funded  grants  and  demonstrations  that  provided  access  to  rural 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

16 

clinics  linking  them  together  with  the  major  hospital  systems.  A 
good example is what we have certainly in Hawaii, as well as Alas-
ka, and pretty much every state in the country. We now have about 
200  hospital-based  networks  reaching  out  to  3,000  sites  across 
America. 

The  rural  health  care  program,  as  part  of  the  Telecommuni-
cations  Act  that  was  established  by  Senator  Rockefeller  and  Sen-
ator  Snowe,  has  certainly  been  a  tremendous  help  to  establishing 
these hub and spoke networks. The program probably should be re-
visited and expanded as we are today, but nevertheless, it is really 
vital to those people that have it. And no other state has benefited 
more, I might add, than the state of Alaska, which has had tremen-
dous  access  to  those  programs  and  has  shown  really  what  can  be 
done. 

But  having  built  those  networks,  we  now  need  to  ensure  that 
their  interconnections  are  available  on  a  continuous  basis,  that  we 
have  the  broadband  networks  that  connect  them,  as  well  as  to  the 
patients that they serve. 

The  second  stage  of  telemedicine  is  moving  into  the  home.  We 
now  have  about  80,000  Americans  that  are  receiving  their  vital 
signs  directly  into  their  home,  transmitting  those  to  health  care 
professionals, people with chronic diseases who are being managed 
and  monitored  on  a  daily  basis.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  people  with 
cardiac  devices  or  with  the  heart-implantable  pacemakers—there 
are  almost  a  million  Americans  that  are  now  having  those  mon-
itored  remotely  using  telecommunications  lines.  Many  of  these  are 
based  on  plain  old  telephone  service,  but  we  have  new  emerging 
applications that are now going to require broadband. 

So  today,  we  are  entering  really  the  third  stage  of  telemedicine 
that moves beyond the hospitals and clinics and even moves beyond 
the  home.  And  these  are  using  applications  that  are  being  devel-
oped  actually  by  the  patients  themselves  and  by  the  doctors.  They 
allow  users  to  track  their  own  vital  signs,  to  go  on  a  weight  loss 
diet, to track for drug interactions. 

A good example is the new iPhone that was introduced this year 
now  has  over  100  applications  dealing  with  health  care.  The  num-
ber  one  health  care  application  is  something  called  Hippocrates, 
which  your  physician  might  use  if  you  go  there  to  have  your  drug 
interaction  checked  with  other  drugs.  Now  consumers  are 
downloading it into their own phone and using it themselves. 

There are a lot of other applications that allow doctors to use cell 
phones  to  transmit  medical  MRIs  or  other  types  of  images.  They 
will send tissue samples by video or single images using the phone 
lines to pathologists. It is kind of amazing what is going on. 

Online  video  game  support  like  Second  Life  now  has  major  sup-
port  groups  for  diabetes,  alcoholics,  people  with  various  types  of 
diseases. And it is really expanding as a part of health care. 

I  would  like  to  share  a  personal  story  to  really  illustrate  what 
this  broadband  has  meant  to  people  and  really  starting  very  per-
sonally,  my  own  sister  Diana.  She  was  diagnosed  with  stage  3 
breast cancer, and she is 60 years old. She lives alone. She is about 
30  miles  outside  of  Washington  in  a  rural  area.  And  since  getting 
her  diagnosis,  Diana  has  relied  on  access  to  the  outside  world  via 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

17 

telecommunications. She has no car. She is very isolated where she 
is. 

She  looks  up  the  complicated  terms  that  her  doctors  give  her  by 
going  on  the  Internet.  She  logs  into  the  American  Cancer  Society 
site  to  find  out  what  types  of  applications  and  where  she  can  go. 
She  relies  on  friends  that  she  has  developed  through  her  own  on-
line  community  as  part  of  the  video  activities  that  she  is  involved 
in,  which  is  now  her  personal  support  group.  She  has  an  online 
blog  in  an  effort  to  reach  out  to  others,  and  she  even  uses  the 
Internet site to occasionally order groceries from a delivery firm. 

Broadband  has  allowed  my  sister  to  get  help  with  her  health 
care.  It  has  certainly  reduced  her  costs  for  what  she  has.  And  it 
has improved her life. I would say broadband is my sister’s lifeline 
and it is extremely important for her well-being. 

This is what I call telemedicine 3.0. It is where we are today for 

some Americans, but not all Americans. 

Other  countries,  as  the  previous  testifier  just  mentioned,  have 
had  a  lot  more  experience  and  progress  than  we  have.  I  note  that 
Canada  and  several  Scandinavian  countries  have  established  spe-
cific national goals. Certainly Japan has done an excellent job, and 
Korea.  I  was  just  in  Korea  2  months  ago  looking  at  their  system, 
and I was very impressed with what they have been able to do. 

But  we  are  finding  actually  even  countries  in  Africa  have  leapt 
ahead  of  the  United  States  in  terms  of  providing  cell  phone  wire-
less  applications  and  broadband  deployment.  And  they  are  having 
access  to  certain  applications  that  are  own  citizens  do  not  have 
these days. 

So it is really important whether someone is living in the remote 
islands  of  Hawaii  or  if  they  are  living  in  a  remote  area  of  Alaska, 
if  they  are  on  the  plains  of  west  Texas,  or  even  if  they  are  down-
town  in  Washington  and  isolated  at  home,  if  they  are  homebound, 
they  all  need  access  to  the  communications,  all  need  access  to  the 
services  just  the  way  my  mom  and  dad  did  in  Appalachia.  So  we 
cannot  concentrate  on  building  concrete  and  blacktop  everywhere, 
but  we  can  use  telecommunications  to  open  up  their  lives.  So  I 
think  that  should  be  a  priority  for  this  Congress,  as  well  as  the 
next Congress and the next Administration. 

So  finally,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  support 
over  the  years  for  the  expansion  of  telemedicine  and  the  support 
of  other  Members  of  this  Committee.  It  has  really  benefited  for 
what  we  have,  and  I  think  the  future  holds  even  more  promises. 
Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Linkous follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JONATHAN D. LINKOUS, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

AMERICAN TELEMEDICINE ASSOCIATION 

Mr. Chairman: 
I am grateful for the opportunity to speak to this Committee about the importance 
of broadband networks for healthcare. I am the CEO of American Telemedicine As-
sociation.  ATA  promotes  telemedicine,  sometimes  called  telehealth  or  telecare,  and 
resolves barriers to its deployment. Members of ATA include physicians, administra-
tors  and  other  health  providers  as  well  as  hospital  networks  and  suppliers  of  tele-
communications and technology used in telemedicine. 

My thoughts on broadband are shaped by my personal experience. My mother and 
father  were  born  and  raised  in  Appalachia.  So,  it’s  no  surprise  that  when  I  came 
to Washington, D.C. in 1975, I went to work for the Appalachian Regional Commis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

18 

sion. At the Commission, I learned the importance of opening up isolated rural com-
munities  by  the  construction  of  a  networked  highway  system  throughout  the  Appa-
lachian  Mountains  providing  access  to  education,  jobs  and  health  care.  The  high-
ways  of  today  are  located  providing  healthcare  through  telecommunications  tech-
nology  on  the  wired  and  wireless  communications  lines  that  open  up  the  isolation 
of Americans, no matter where they live. 

For the last two decades telemedicine has been evolving in stages. Each stage has 
dramatically  changed  the  way  we  get  healthcare  and  changed  the  need  for 
broadband networks. 

Twenty  years  ago  telemedicine  was  largely  composed  of  federally  funded  dem-
onstration grants and small projects that connected large hospitals with rural clinics 
to  provide  access  to  basic  medical  services  and  specialty  care  where  it  wasn’t  pre-
viously  available.  Since  then,  these  first  stage  initiatives  blossomed  into  200  hos-
pital-based  networks  reaching  out  to  over  3,000  sites  across  America.  The  rural 
healthcare  program  established  by  Senators  Olympia  Snowe  and  Jay  Rockefeller  in 
the  1996  Telecommunications  Reform  Act  targeted  the  growth  of  these  hub-and- 
spoke  networks.  Although  the  program  has  been  smaller  than  originally  expected, 
for Americans living in some of the most remote parts of the country it has allowed 
them  access  to  healthcare.  Having  built  these  networks,  we  now  need  to  ensure 
their use by interconnecting them and ensuring we have affordable broadband serv-
ices  to  all  healthcare  centers  as  well  as  having  physicians  fully  reimbursed  when 
they use telemedicine to provide care. 

The  second  stage  of  telemedicine  provides  healthcare  directly  into  the  home 
through the use of remote monitoring for those with chronic ailments. Today, almost 
80,000  Americans  are  having  their  vital  signs  remotely  monitored  by  a  healthcare 
professional, helping them to manage their disease and providing an early warning 
for  any  complications.  Over  a  million  patients  are  using  home-based  remote  moni-
toring for their heart rhythms or check up on their pacemakers. This is saving thou-
sands  of  lives  and  saving  millions  of  dollars  by  keeping  people  out  of  emergency 
rooms,  hospitals  and  nursing  homes  and  allowing  them  to  stay  in  their  own  homes 
and communities. 

Because  many  of  these  home  based  monitoring  services  use  plain  old  telephone 
service  for  their  connections,  for  several  years  I  was  not  convinced  that  broadband 
connections to the home was a priority for telemedicine. 

However,  today,  we  are  entering  the  third  stage  of  telemedicine,  moving  beyond 
the  walls  of  hospitals  and  clinics  and  even  beyond  the  home.  In  many  cases,  this 
is a consumer-based initiative, piggybacking on popular PC programs and using cell 
phones to help the patients help themselves. In fact, these remote healthcare appli-
cations  are  often  designed  and  developed  by  patients  and  caregivers.  They  allow 
users to track their own vital signs, get information about drug interactions or start 
on  a  weight  loss  diet.  There  are  already  over  100  health-related  applications  avail-
able  for  download  just  for  the  new  Apple  iPhone.  Other  applications  allow  physi-
cians  to  use  their  new  cell  phones  to  look  at  diagnostic  images  such  as  an  MRI  or 
transmit  images  of  tissue  samples  to  pathologists.  Online  and  video  game  support 
groups for patients have exploded. There are active healthcare support groups in the 
video  game  Second  Life  dealing  with  alcoholism,  diabetes,  and  domestic  violence 
among  others.  These  are  not  novelty  applications.  They  are  an  emerging  part  of 
healthcare  delivery  around  the  world  and  it  is  having  a  major  impact  on  how  our 
life and children’s lives are lived. 

I want to share a personal story to illustrate the impact of this stage of telemedi-
cine.  About  3  months  ago,  my  sister,  Diana,  was  diagnosed  with  stage  three  breast 
cancer.  She  is  over  60,  lives  alone,  without  a  car,  about  30  miles  outside  of  Wash-
ington,  D.C.  Since  getting  her  diagnosis,  Diana  has  relied  on  her  access  to  the  out-
side  world  via  telecommunications  in  a  variety  of  ways.  She  looks  up  the  com-
plicated  terms  used  by  her  doctors  using  the  Internet  and  logs  on  to  the  American 
Cancer  Society’s  site  to  find  out  about  the  latest  advances  in  treatment.  She  relies 
on  friends  she  developed  and  communicates  with  through  an  online  community  as 
part of her own personal support group. She has started an online blog in an effort 
to reach out to others. She uses an Internet site to occasionally order groceries from 
a local delivery firm. Broadband has allowed my sister to access help for her health. 
It  has  certainly  reduced  her  costs.  And,  it  has  improved  her  life.  Broadband  is  my 
sister’s lifeline. 

This  is  telemedicine  3.0  and  it’s  a  reason  why  we  need  to  ensure  all  citizens  of 
the  U.S.  have  access  to  broadband  communications  no  matter  where  they  live  and 
no matter where they travel. 

Other  countries,  notably  Canada  and  several  Scandinavian  countries  have  estab-
lished  specific  national  goals  toward  universal  deployment  of  high  speed  tele-
communications.  Even  underdeveloped  nations  are  leaping  ahead  of  the  United 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

19 

States  in  deploying  wireless  broadband.  Congress  and  the  next  administration 
should  establish  goals  to  ensure  the  availability  of  broadband  telecommunications 
to every business, every home and every citizen in America. 

Whether  someone  is  living  on  a  remote  island  of  Hawaii  or  on  the  plains  of  west 
Texas  or  in  an  urban  area  living  homebound  and  alone,  they  are  just  as  isolated 
as the people living in the hollows of Appalachia. We can’t use concrete or blacktop 
to  build  highways  to  everyone  but  we  can  use  telecommunications  to  open  up  their 
isolation and help them build a better life. 

Finally,  I  want  to  thank  the  Chairman  for  your  strong  support  and  your  leader-
ship  over  the  years  in  getting  important  legislation  passed  that  has  helped  the  de-
ployment  of  telemedicine.  I  will  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  may  have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
May I now call on Dr. Mayor? 

STATEMENT OF MARA MAYOR, PH.D., MEMBER, 

BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 

Dr.  MAYOR.  Chairman  Inouye,  Members  of  the  Commerce  Com-
mittee, I am honored to appear here before you this morning on be-
half  of  AARP  to  provide  our  perspective  on  the  question  of  why 
broadband matters. 

I  am  Mara  Mayor  from  Bethesda,  Maryland  and  a  member  of 
AARP’s  Board  of  Directors.  In  my  professional  career  as  an  educa-
tor,  I  have  focused  on  extending  learning  opportunities,  particu-
larly  to  adults,  in  both  formal  and  informal  settings,  especially 
through the creative uses of technologies. 

Broadband  matters  to  AARP’s  40  million  members.  High  quality 
broadband networks have the potential to make the world more ac-
cessible  to  people  over  age  50  and,  in  turn,  to  enable  them  to  con-
tribute in many ways. 

Let me just touch on three key areas where broadband can make 
a  major  difference:  livable  communities,  work  opportunities,  and 
lifelong learning. 

Creating  livable  communities  is  an  important  policy  goal  for 
AARP. Livable communities seek to combine diverse and affordable 
housing,  adequate  mobility  options,  employment  opportunities,  en-
tertainment,  and  supportive  services  that  allow  people  of  all  ages 
to  remain  independent,  active,  and  engaged.  Livable  communities 
are  connected  communities.  We  tend  to  think  of  community  in 
terms  of  the  immediate  neighborhood,  but  in  fact,  our  definition  is 
being  transformed  by  broadband  to  include  not  only  the  people 
down  the  block,  but  groups  of  like-minded  people  who  may  live 
anywhere. 

While  all  have  a  fundamental  need  to  connect  with  one  another, 
staying connected is particularly important for older adults, and we 
need  to  abandon  our  outdated  image  of  older  adults.  Most,  regard-
less  of  chronological  age,  are  vibrant  and  eager  to  live  well  and 
enjoy life. They often find that the later years present more poten-
tial  opportunities  for  enhanced  working,  learning,  and  social  con-
tact than ever before. And with the 50-plus population projected to 
increase  by  21  percent  by  2020,  which  is  around  the  corner,  and 
those  over  65  growing  by  33  percent,  all  communities  need  to  find 
ways to keep this growing population connected and productive. 

Connectivity  also  makes  it  easier,  as  you  have  just  heard  from 
Mr.  Linkous,  to  monitor  and  maintain  our  health.  Telemedicine, 
support monitoring devices, interactive video, and home health care 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

20 

all  become  more  viable  options  for  consumers  with  broadband  in 
their  home  and  particularly  benefit  those  with  limited  mobility  or 
not well enough to travel. 

AARP  views  broadband  Internet  technology  as  the  21st  century 
bridge  and  facilitator  for  enhanced  connectivity  and  successful 
aging.  It  believes  that  the  goal  of  Federal  policy  should  be  to  en-
sure sufficient or requisite connectivity, which has been defined as 
maintaining contact at the rate, richness, and intensity that we de-
sire for a given task or social outcome. 

High  quality  broadband  networks  will  help  many  older  Ameri-
cans  achieve  that  requisite  connectivity.  Broadband  allows  for 
greater  information  carrying  capacity  and  speed  than  earlier  net-
works  and  really  equally  important,  enables  real-time  interaction 
and  more  precise,  expressive  communication  almost  of  the  kind 
that  you  have  a  in  a  face-to-face,  in-person  meeting.  With  it,  we 
can  have  livable  communities  with  people  staying  in  their  homes, 
which  we  know  is  where  they  want  to  be,  in  which  we  are  truly 
connected. 

Creating  work  opportunities  is  a  second  area  where  access  to 
broadband  can  make  a  huge  difference.  Many  of  AARP’s  50-plus 
members  are  still  active  in  the  work  force,  and  they  find  telecom-
muting  very  attractive  with  the  high-speed  broadband  connection. 
Trends indicate that people will work much longer as they continue 
to  mature.  Access  to  broadband  makes  it  easier  to  have  flexible 
work  schedules,  to  work  part-time  where  that  is  appropriate,  to 
take  on  consulting,  and  most  important  to  continue  to  earn  a  liv-
ing. 

And  in  addition,  access  to  affordable  broadband  can  make  tele-
commuting  an  option  for  volunteer  work  which  is  so  important  to 
our nonprofit institutions and the millions they serve. 

A third key area of importance to people over 50 is access to dis-
tance  learning.  Years  ago,  I  was  Director  of  something  called  the 
Annenberg Projects at the Corporation for Public Broadcasting, and 
in  those  days—it  was  the  early  1990s—we  pioneered  technology- 
based  distance  learning  which  initially  meant  using  television  and 
radio to reach people. 

And  then  with  the  Internet  came  the  possibility  for  true  inter-
activity  between  faculty  and  students  and  among  students.  With 
broadband,  distance  learning  can  occur  at  convenient  times  and 
places and with greater visual enhancement than previously avail-
able, especially for those with jobs or disabilities or family care re-
sponsibilities  that  make  it  difficult  for  them  to  travel  to  a  class-
room.  Lifelong  learning  is  important  in  so  many  ways.  It  keeps  us 
mentally  stimulated,  opens  new  doors,  and  enables  us  to  keep  our 
skills  and  knowledge  base  relevant  in  a  high-tech  world.  Again, 
broadband is the key. 

However,  despite  the  bright  promise  of  the  Telecommunications 
Act  of  1996,  as  well  as  know,  universal  access  has  not  been  fully 
realized. Simply put, the digital divide for older Americans remains 
far  too  wide  in  just  two  statistics.  Only  50  percent  of  adults  aged 
50  to  64  and  19  percent  of  those  65  and  older  have  broadband  in 
their home, and only 38 percent of rural adults have broadband at 
home  compared  to  57  percent  for  urban  adults  and  60  percent  for 
suburban adults. We have to do better. A new public policy toward 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

21 

broadband  is  needed  to  stimulate  the  development  of  universally 
available, affordable, and high-quality broadband. 

AARP  would  encourage  Congress  to  pass  broadband  mapping 
legislation. Senate bill 1492 and House-passed legislation 3919 will 
help  local  communities  and  States  assess  their  broadband  inven-
tory.  Broadband  mapping  will  collect  accurate  data  that  dem-
onstrate  current  deployment,  forecast  deployment  milestones,  and 
identify areas where follow up measures are required. The informa-
tion that these bills provide is extremely important and, as you all 
know, is needed now. 

Mr. Chairman, helping people aged 50 and older stay connected, 
informed,  and  engaged  is  central  to  AARP’s  commitment  to  its 
members.  The  potential  of  affordable  broadband  technology  can 
greatly  enhance  the  ability  of  older  Americans  to  remain  inde-
pendent,  in  their  homes,  in  their  communities,  work  longer  in  set-
tings that are supportive, and continue to learn and grow. 

Thank you for this opportunity to speak to you this morning. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Mayor follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARA MAYOR, PH.D., MEMBER, 

BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and  Members  of  the  Commerce 
Committee, I am Mara Mayor from Bethesda, Maryland. I am a member of AARP’s 
Board  of  Directors.  I  am  honored  to  appear  before  the  Committee  this  morning  on 
behalf  of  AARP 1 to  provide  our  perspective  on  the  question  of  ‘‘Why  Broadband 
Matters.’’ 

Broadband  matters  to  AARP  Members.  High-quality  broadband  networks  have 
the  potential  to  make  the  world  more  accessible  to  persons  over  age  50,  providing 
convenient pathways to the economic and social activities that are not only vital for 
leading  comfortable  and  meaningful  lives,  but  also  for  fostering  and  sustaining  liv-
able  communities.  Creating  livable  communities  is  an  important  policy  goal  for 
AARP.  More  than  just  a  concept,  livable  communities  seek  to  combine  diverse  and 
affordable housing, adequate mobility options, employment opportunities, entertain-
ment and supportive community services to allow persons of all ages to remain inde-
pendent, active and engaged. 

Livable  communities  are  connected  communities.  While  all  people  have  a  funda-
mental need to connect with one another and be part of a broader community, stay-
ing connected is particularly important for older adults. ‘‘Gerontologists identify ac-
tive engagement with life, which involves continued involvement with productive ac-
tivities and maintenance of social ties, as a critical component of successful aging.’’ 2 
Older  adults  often  find  that  later  life  presents  more  potential  opportunities  for  en-
hanced  working,  learning  and  social  contact  than  ever  before.  And  with  the  age  50 
and  older  population  projected  to  increase  by  21  percent  by  2020,  and  those  over 
65 growing by 33 percent, all communities need to find ways to keep this large and 
growing senior population connected and engaged.3 

AARP  views  broadband  Internet  technology  as  the  21st  century  bridge  and 
facilitator  for  enhanced  connectivity  and  successful  aging.  Available  and  affordable 
broadband  can  overcome  many  critical  limitations  for  older  users  that  are  inherent 
in current communications technology. Communicating through telephone calls or e- 
mails does not involve the physical presence that occurs with in-person meeting and 
thus  does  not  convey  visual  and  physical  cues,  such  as  facial  features  or  body  lan-
guage, that not only enrich conversations, but convey critical information. For exam-

1 AARP is a nonprofit, nonpartisan membership organization that helps people age 50+ main-
tain  independence,  choice,  and  control  in  ways  that  are  beneficial  and  affordable  to  them  and 
to  society  as  a  whole.  With  40  million  members,  it  is  the  largest  organization  representing  the 
interests of Americans age 50 and older and their families. 

2 Rowe, J.W., Kahn, R.L. (1988), Successful Aging, New York: Random House, define success-
ful aging as the ability to maintain three key behaviors or characteristics: (1) low risk of disease 
and disease related disability, (2) high mental and physical function, and (3) active engagement 
with life. 

3 Beyond  50.05:  A  Report  to  the  Nation  on  Livable  Communities,  ‘‘Creating  Environments  for 

Successful Aging. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

22 

ple, doctors trying to diagnose or treat a patient by telephone would not benefit from 
important  visual  cues,  such  as  the  grimace  of  a  patient  in  pain  or  the  lack  of  eye 
contact  from  a  depressed  patient.  E-mails  are  often  open  to  misinterpretation  be-
cause of the inherent difficulty in conveying emotion or tone in written communica-
tion.  In  addition,  sending  an  e-mail  does  not  guarantee  an  immediate  response, 
making it an ineffective tool for communicating urgent or emergency messages. 

All  persons  should  have  the  means  to  stay  connected  to  an  extent  that  ensures 
independence  and  quality  of  life.  In  this  regard,  the  goal  of  Federal  policy  should 
be  one  of  assuring  sufficient  or  requisite  connectivity:  which  is  ‘‘the  state  of  having 
robust and reliable communication and/or transportation modes, with operable alter-
native  work-around  options,  so  that  contact  may  be  initiated  or  maintained  at  the 
rate, richness, and intensity that we desire for a given task or social outcome.’’ 

High-quality  broadband  networks  will  help  many  older  Americans  achieve  ‘‘req-
uisite connectivity’’. Broadband allows for greater information-carrying capacity and 
speed than earlier networks and enables real-time interaction and more precise, ex-
pressive communication, almost of the kind that can occur during an in-person, face- 
to-face meeting.4 

Telemedicine, support monitoring devices, interactive video and home health care 
all  become  more  viable  options  for  consumers  with  broadband,  particularly  persons 
with limited mobility or those not well enough to travel. In a recent survey of Older 
Americans age 65 and over, 98 percent of respondents agree that they like to know 
as  much  as  they  can  about  their  health  conditions  regardless  of  their  demographic 
characteristics.  Furthermore,  almost  all  (96  percent)  of  respondents  agreed  they 
would  like  to  help  their  doctor  monitor  their  health.  More  than  a  majority  of  re-
spondents agreed they wish their doctor had a device that allows him/her to perform 
a  variety  of  standard  telepharmacy  tasks  such  as  checking  medication  history,  pre-
scription drug benefits, insurance coverage of specific medications and electronic for-
warding of prescriptions to their pharmacy to be filled before travel for pick-up.5 

Distance  learning  is  not  only  facilitated  with  broadband,  but  can  be  conducted 
with  greater  personal  convenience  and  with  greater  visual  enhancement  than  pre-
viously available. This is especially true for persons with jobs, disabilities or family 
care responsibilities that make it difficult to travel to a classroom. 

Many  of  AARP’s  age  50+  members  are  still  active  in  the  workforce  and  find  tele-
commuting very attractive with a high-speed broadband connection. Trends indicate 
that people will work much longer as they continue to mature: 

• According  to  an  AARP  study  on  work  and  careers,  69  percent  of  workers  age 

45 to 74 plan to work in some capacity during their retirement years. 

• Many,  however,  want  to  work  on  different  terms,  with  more  flexibility  and  au-

tonomy, than they did during their earlier careers. 

• In fact, 70 percent of workers age 45 to 74 say they are looking for ways to bet-
ter balance their work and personal lives, and 41 percent report that the ability 
to work from home is an absolutely essential part of their ideal job.6 

Not only can affordable access to broadband Internet make telecommuting a more 
realistic  option  for  older  workers,  it  can  enhance  opportunities  for  volunteer  work 
as  well.  For  organizations  facing  shortages  of  volunteers,  virtual  volunteer  with 
broadband  technology  will  allow  greater  numbers  of  people  with  time  constraints, 
physical limitation or home care obligations to engage in needed charitable activities 
with organizations in their own communities and around the world. 

Where  broadband  is  widely  available,  innovative  uses  of  videoconferencing  can 
provide  older  consumers  with  unlimited  opportunities  to  expand  their  civic  and  so-
cial ties and enrich their lives. 

However,  despite  the  bright  promise  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  uni-
versal  access  of  advanced  telecommunications  services  has  not  been  fully  realized. 
With  all  of  the  research  and  potential  benefits  of  high-quality  broadband  Internet 
technology,  our  Nation  that  invented  the  Internet  is  losing  its  place  as  a  leader  in 
the deployment of broadband Internet technology. Simply put, the digital divide for 
older Americans remains far too wide: 

• Thirty-eight percent of rural adults have broadband at home, as compared with 

57 percent for urban adults, and 60 percent for suburban adults. 

4 AARP Public Policy Institute, Connecting for Successful Aging: Promoting Broadband for the 

Opportunities and Challenges of Later Life, Chris A. Baker. 

5 AARP ‘‘Healthy @Home’’, Knowledge Management. Linda L. Barrett, Ph.D. 
6 AARP ‘‘Healthy @Home’’. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

23 

• Twenty-five  percent  of  households  with  income  under  $20,000  per  year  have 
broadband at home, as compared to 85 percent of households with income great-
er than $100,000 per year. 
• Fifty  percent  of  adults  age  50  to  64  and  19  percent  of  those  65  and  older  have 

broadband in their home.7 

A  new  public  policy  toward  broadband  is  needed  to  stimulate  the  development  of 

universally available, affordable and high-quality broadband. 

A  new  public  policy  for  broadband  deployment  should  incorporate  the  following 

principles: 

1. Greater promotion of broadband adoption, especially among the older and un-
derserved populations; 
2. Promotion of open and standardized broadband platforms; 
3.  Transparency  and  accountability  that  ensures  the  collection  and  public  re-
porting of timely and accurate data on the quality of the broadband technology 
being  deployed,  the  prices  at  which  the  broadband  technology  is  available,  and 
the interoperability of networks and technologies; and 
4.  Increased  use  of  broadband  mapping  to  ensure  the  efficient  utilization  of  re-
sources to achieve rapid advance of broadband deployment.8 

AARP  encourages  Congress  to  pass  broadband  mapping  legislation.  Senate  bill 
1492,  the  Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act  passed  by  this  Committee  and  House- 
passed  legislation  H.R.  3919,  the  Broadband  Census  of  America  of  2007,  will  help 
local communities and states assess their broadband inventory. Broadband mapping 
will  collect  accurate  data  that  demonstrate  current  broadband  deployment,  forecast 
deployment  milestones  and  identify  areas  where  follow-up  measures  are  required. 
The  information  that  these  bills  provide  is  extremely  important  and  is  needed  now 
if all American are to realize the promise of broadband technology. 

Mr. Chairman, helping people age 50 and older stay connected, informed and en-
gaged is central to AARP’s work of encouraging positive social change and fostering 
more  livable  communities.  The  potential  and  possibilities  of  affordable  broadband 
technology are unlimited. Increased broadband deployment can greatly enhance the 
ability  of  older  Americans  to  remain  independent  in  their  communities,  providing 
convenient  access  to  the  services  and  activities  they  need  to  address  the  complex-
ities of aging and lead more comfortable and meaningful lives. 

Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
May  I  now  call  upon  the  Missouri  State  Librarian,  Ms.  Conroy? 
STATEMENT OF MARGARET M. CONROY, MISSOURI STATE 

LIBRARIAN, ON BEHALF OF THE AMERICAN LIBRARY 

ASSOCIATION (ALA) 

Ms.  CONROY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  It  is  with  great  pleasure  that  I  submit  this  testimony  on 
behalf  of  the  American  Library  Association,  the  ALA.  I  am  Mar-
garet  Conroy.  I  am  the  State  Librarian  of  the  State  of  Missouri, 
and  I  am  also  a  member  of  ALA,  which  is  the  oldest  and  largest 
library association in the world. 

Today  I  am  here  to  talk  with  you  about  the  importance  of 
broadband Internet in libraries and to share with you how the resi-
dents  of  the  ‘‘Show  Me’’  state  are  using  broadband  through  their 
public libraries. 

Some  had  predicted  that  the  rise  of  the  Internet  would  lead  to 
the  demise  of  the  public  library,  but  as  Missouri  native  Mark 
Twain  wrote,  ‘‘Reports  of  my  death  are  greatly  exaggerated.’’  Li-
braries  are  very  lively  places  and  they  are  at  the  forefront  of  the 
information age. By providing Internet access to the general public, 
libraries  have  become  the  social  and  economic  hubs  of  their  com-

7 AARP ‘‘Aging in Internet Time—Harnessing the Benefits of Broadband for Older Americans’’. 
8 AARP ‘‘Aging in Internet Time’’. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

24 

munities. They are often the only place Internet access is provided 
in  their  community,  and  especially  now  during  difficult  economic 
times,  use  is  growing  ever  higher.  Broadband  technologies  play  an 
increasingly  vital  role  in  enabling  public  libraries  to  provide  their 
essential services. 

Current  research  shows  that  while  computer  use  has  increased 
substantially,  many  homes  still  do  not  have  computers  or  Internet 
access.  Libraries  are  working  to  close  this  digital  divide.  Nation-
wide 73 percent of all public libraries report they are the only pro-
vider  of  no-fee  Internet  access  in  their  communities,  and  this  sta-
tistic rises to 83 percent in rural areas. 

How  do  our  patrons  use  the  Internet?  78  percent  of  libraries  re-
ported  that  education  resources  and  data  bases  purchased  for  K– 
12  students  are  their  most  important  service,  followed  closely  by 
job hunting and e-government services and information. 

Librarians  can  also  share  with  you  many  stories  about  how  li-
braries are increasingly involved with emergency preparedness and 
disaster  recovery  in  conjunction  with  local  and  State  governments. 
For  example,  residents  of  Marble  Hill  flocked  to  their  library  this 
spring  to  file  FEMA  paperwork  when  their  homes  were  flooded. 
Even though the library had also been flooded by the rise of a local 
creek,  it  remained  open  to  provide  access  for  their  distressed  resi-
dents in Marble Hill. 

Some other stories, from a librarian in Nevada, Missouri. I have 
been  moved  when  I  helped  a  wife  who  needed  to  instant  message 
her husband in Iraq or a grandmother who, for the first time, saw 
her  grandchild  on  the  Internet,  or  a  child  who  needed  to  find  a 
Martin  Luther  King,  Jr.  speech.  None  of  these  people  have  com-
puters in their homes. 

From  McDonald  County,  which  is  down  by  the  Arkansas  border: 
During  a  3-hour  period  last  week,  I  encountered  five  different  lan-
guages  at  one  time,  helped  Somali  refugees  fill  out  citizenship 
forms,  observed  online  college  courses  being  taken,  and  helped  an 
older gentleman send an e-mail to his son in the military in Japan. 
From Wright County: In our rural community, the only public ac-
cess  to  broadband  is  the  library.  Business  people  come  in  to  re-
search  and  order  products  because  it  takes  them  less  time  to  use 
the  library’s  connection  than  it  does  to  use  the  connection  at  their 
businesses. 

From  Warrensburg:  The  Social  Security  office  in  Warrensburg 
closed  last  year.  Connections  are  faster  at  the  library,  so  they  can 
assist  those  who  cannot  travel  the  30  miles  to  the  nearest  Social 
Security office or those who have no computer or decent connection 
speed at home. 

From Morgan County: People come in to apply for jobs online on 
a weekly basis. More local companies, as well as chains like Target, 
Lowes, and WalMart now require online job applications. Truckers 
are even applying for jobs online now. 

From Columbia, Missouri: We are opening our computer training 
lab  on  Friday  mornings  for  Refugee  and  Immigration  Services  to 
help their clients. We also have added a special time each week in 
the computer training center to help people with online job applica-
tions and resume writing. This is in addition to normal classes and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

25 

partnering  with  AARP  to  provide  electronic  tax  filing  for  senior 
citizens and low-income members of the community. 

From  Oregon  County:  Internet  access  means  that  our  local  col-
lege  students  can  work  online,  communicate  with  their  professors, 
e-mail their assignments, take classes, and compete on a level play-
ing field with students from metropolitan areas. 

You can see from just these examples why librarians well under-
stand  the  essential  nature  of  the  importance  of  broadband.  Not 
only have librarians embraced the digital age, we also maintain our 
more traditional services, services that are now in ever greater de-
mand  because  technology  has  made  them  better  known  and  easier 
to share. 

While  our  efforts  to  enhance  Internet  connectivity  have  been  in-
credibly rewarding, we need to do more. 57 percent of public librar-
ies report that their broadband connections are inadequate to serve 
growing  demand.  Broadband  needs  for  a  library  are  not  the  same 
as  for  home  users.  Libraries  support  simultaneous  multiple  users 
both  in  the  building  and  people  connecting  from  home  or  their  of-
fices. In Missouri, we are lucky to have MOREnet which helps pro-
vide Internet connectivity for public education in libraries. And you 
can read more about MOREnet in my written testimony. 

Libraries across the country truly appreciate the foresight of this 
committee  in  originating  the  E-rate  discount  program.  Thank  you 
so  much.  The  E-rate  program  has  been  an  incredibly  valuable  re-
source  that  enables  many  libraries  to  afford  telecommunications 
and Internet services. The program is working. Without the E-rate, 
many of our libraries could just not afford the levels of connectivity 
that they need. 

There  are  some  adjustments  to  the  program  that  would  encour-
age  increased  library  participation  that  we  have  proposed  to  the 
FCC,  and  we  hope  that  the  commission  will  move  forward  on  our 
recommendations in the near future. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  cannot  say  strongly  enough  how  indebted  we 
are  to  your  leadership  and  to  this  Committee  for  the  enormous 
progress  we  have  made  in  the  last  decade.  On  behalf  of  the  Amer-
ican Library Association and the libraries in the State of Missouri, 
we  look  forward  to  working  closely  with  you  in  addressing  the 
issues  of  expanding  broadband  deployment  and  meeting  the  tele-
communications needs of all Americans. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Conroy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARGARET M. CONROY, MISSOURI STATE LIBRARIAN, ON 

BEHALF OF THE AMERICAN LIBRARY ASSOCIATION (ALA) 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  Members  of  the  Committee,  it  is 
with great pleasure that I submit this testimony on behalf of the American Library 
Association  (ALA).  My  name  is  Margaret  Conroy,  and  I  am  the  State  Librarian  for 
the  great  State  of  Missouri.  I  am  also  a  member  of  the  American  Library  Associa-
tion (ALA), the oldest and largest library association in the world with 66,000 mem-
bers who are primarily school, public, academic and some special librarians, as well 
as trustees, publishers and friends of libraries. 

I  am  here  to  share  with  you  how  the  residents  of  the  ‘‘Show  Me’’  state  are  using 
broadband (and too-often slower connectivity) through our public libraries. You will 
see  that  our  experiences  in  Missouri  track  closely  with  research  findings  in  the  re-
port,  Libraries  Connect  Communities:  Public  Library  Funding  &  Technology  Access 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

26 

Study  2007–2008,1 released  just  2  weeks  ago  by  the  American  Library  Association 
and the Information Institute at the College of Information at Florida State Univer-
sity.  This  report  assesses  public  access  to  computers,  the  Internet  and  Internet-re-
lated  services  in  public  libraries  across  the  United  States,  and  gauges  the  impact 
of  library  funding  changes  on  connectivity,  technology  deployment  and  sustain-
ability.  Chairman  Inouye,  I  request  that  the  Executive  Summary  of  this  report  be 
submitted into the record. 

Broadband technologies play an increasingly vital role in enabling public libraries 
to provide essential services to all, especially important for the ‘‘have-nots.’’ Because 
so  many  people  do  not  have  broadband,  libraries  are  trying  to  meet  all  of  the  new 
demands  that  our  patrons  need  because  we  are  the  only  institution  that  they  can 
come to for access and information. 

Some  naysayers  predicted  that  the  rise  of  the  Internet  would  lead  to  the  demise 
of  the  public  library.  But  as  Missouri  native  Mark  Twain  wrote,  ‘‘reports  of  my 
death are greatly exaggerated.’’ Libraries are now very lively places and at the fore-
front  of  the  ‘‘Information  Age.’’  By  providing  Internet  access  to  the  general  public, 
public  libraries  have  become  the  social  and  economic  hubs  of  their  communities, 
often times providing the only Internet access for many low-income and elderly peo-
ple, students, job seekers, immigrants, travelers, and many others. 

A Pew Foundation study on how Americans search for information released in De-
cember  2007  shows  that  people  who  used  the  Internet  were  more  likely  to  use  the 
library  than  people  who  do  not  use  the  Internet.2 This  was  true  regardless  of  in-
come.  This  study  also  revealed  significant  new  information  on  who  is  using  our  li-
braries. Traditionally, the profile of the library user was a middle-aged female. This 
study shows a dramatic shift in that profile to young people ages 18 to 30. This shift 
indicates  two  current  realities  about  our  libraries:  (1)  libraries  are  successful  in  of-
fering technology that attracts younger users; and, (2) it charges libraries with keep-
ing  pace  with  emerging  technologies  to  continue  to  support  the  information  needs 
of young people as they grow into adulthood. 

Libraries  offer  technology  to  link  communities  around  the  country  and  provide 
users  access  to  information  through  state,  regional,  national  and  international  net-
works. Librarians can also share with you the many stories about how libraries are 
increasingly  involved  with  emergency  preparedness  and  disaster  response  in  con-
junction with local governments and other organizations. Many libraries are part of 
statewide  networks  that  provides  enriched  content  data  bases  and  open  access  to 
resources, and services that our local libraries just cannot afford on their own. 

However,  while  computer  use  has  increased  substantially  in  the  United  States, 
many  American  households  still  do  not  have  computers  or  Internet  access  in  their 
homes.  Libraries  are  working  to  close  this  ‘‘digital  divide’’  in  many  of  our  Nation’s 
distressed  communities  by  providing  no-fee,  public  access  to  computers  and  the 
Internet. Nationwide, 73 percent of all public libraries report they are the only pro-
vider  of  free  Internet  access  in  their  communities.  In  rural  areas,  the  role  of  the 
library  is  even  more  critical  as  83  percent  of  libraries  are  the  only  no-fee  Internet 
provider. 

To  demonstrate  the  pervasiveness  of  public  libraries  in  America,  let  me  present 
this  comparison:  There  are  more  public  libraries  in  the  U.S.  than  McDonald’s  res-
taurants—a total of 16,549 public libraries, including branches. Statistics also show 
that  63  percent  of  adults  in  the  U.S.  have  public  library  cards.3 Furthermore,  na-
tionwide,  there  are  now  1.3  billion  visits  per  year  to  our  Nation’s  public  libraries. 
Over  2  billion  items  were  checked  out  in  2006,  when  ALA  conducted  a  poll  that 
found that 92 percent of respondents expect libraries to be needed in the future, de-
spite the increased availability of information on the Internet.4 

Why have libraries remained so essential? Part of the answer is that public librar-
ies  across  the  country  have  installed  thousands  of  computers  for  the  general  pub-
lic—some with help from organizations such as the Bill and Melinda Gates Founda-
tion, and also with major investment from local governments and creative budgeting 
by  library  administrators.  The  Federal  ‘‘E-rate’’  program,  which  originated  in  this 
very Committee and for which libraries and library patrons are enormously grateful, 
has played a tremendous role in expanding the ability of public libraries to connect 

1 Bertot,  John  Carlo,  et  al.  Libraries  Connect  Communities:  Public  Library  Funding  &  Tech-

nology Access Study 2007–2008. American Library Association. September, 2008. 

2 Leigh  Estabrook,  Evans  Witt,  and  Lee  Rainee,  Information  Searches  That  Solve  Problems: 
How people use the Internet, libraries, and government agencies when they need help, (Pew Inter-
net  and  American  Life  Project,  December  30,  2007).  Available  on  the  Internet  at  http:// 
www.pewinternet.org/PPF/r/231/reportldisplay.asp. 

3 American  Library  Association.  @  your  library:  Attitudes  Toward  Public  Libraries  Survey 

2006, p. 1. 

4 Ibid., p. 12. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

27 

patrons  to  the  Internet  connections.  Public  librarians  provide  training  to  educate 
users on how to use computer applications and the Internet. Furthermore, our stud-
ies  show  98.9  percent  of  public  libraries  now  provide  Internet  public  access  at  no- 
fee,  and  65.9  percent  of  public  libraries  also  provide  wireless  Internet  access  for 
those patrons who bring their own laptop computers.5 

Library  access  is  especially  important  in  rural  areas  and  for  low-income  families. 
Approximately 38 percent of rural households have broadband. The percentages are 
higher  in  urban  and  suburban:  57  percent  and  60  percent  respectively.  Among 
households  with  incomes  over  $100,000,  85  percent  have  broadband  access.  Among 
households  with  incomes  $20,000  and  under,  only  25  percent  have  broadband  serv-
ice.6 

The  ALA-Florida  State  report  found  that  America’s  16,543  public  libraries  are 
leveraging technology to help students of all ages succeed in school and support life-
long  learning.  More  than  83  percent  of  libraries  now  offer  online  homework  re-
sources,  including  live  tutors  and  collections  of  reliable  Web  sources—an  increase 
of  15  percent  in  1  year.  Libraries  also  reported  significant  increases  in  the  number 
of  audiobooks  and  podcasts  (33  percent  increase),  videos  (32  percent  increase),  e- 
books  (13.5  percent  increase)  and  digitized  special  collections  (13  percent  increase). 
As  Americans  are  changing  the  ways  they  meet  their  educational,  entrepreneurial 
and entertainment needs, libraries are changing with them and ensuring access for 
patrons in our libraries as well as for remote access users. 

How do our patrons use the Internet? The research shows: 
• 78% of the libraries reported that education resources and data bases purchased 
for  K–12  students  are  their  most  important  service.  Since  over  90  percent  of 
school districts are assigning homework that involves Internet usage and school 
library  media  centers  are  closing  across  the  country,  this  priority  is  not  sur-
prising. 
• 62%  reported  job-hunting  as  another  high  priority.  Given  our  challenged  econ-
omy,  and  knowing  that  the  majority  of  the  top-100  retailers  only  accept  elec-
tronic and online job applications, you can see why this is so important. Librar-
ies offer access to data bases with job listings, training for resume development 
and  interviewing  techniques—all  necessary  21st  century  skills  to  get  that  new 
job. 
• 55% of libraries reported that access to government information has become an-
other  high  priority.7 We  know  that,  at  every  level  of  government,  agencies  in-
creasingly require online-only interactions with residents for information, appli-
cations, appointments, and more. 

Note  also  the  increasing  use  of  media  services  over  the  Internet.  Libraries  report 
a 30 percent growth in both video and audio content over the last year.8 Also, librar-
ies  are  increasingly  using  two-way  videoconferencing  for  their  staff  to  reduce  costs. 
More and more students are relying on videostreaming for class lectures from their 
college  or  university  for  distance  learning  and  media  content  dissemination.  Some 
state  and  local  governments  now  require  video  training,  for  example  to  obtain  a 
driver’s  license.  More  and  more  websites  employ  Web  2.0  applications  that  involve 
greater  interaction  with  the  user.  Health  care  providers  and  businesses  are  inte-
grating streaming video into standard components of their websites. 

While this research is extraordinarily important, perhaps more memorable are the 
reports  I  received  from  my  libraries  in  Missouri.  In  preparation  for  this  hearing,  I 
asked  my  libraries  to  send  me  examples  of  how  their  Internet  access  has  benefited 
their communities. Here are a few of these examples. 

From a librarian in Nevada, MO: 

I have been moved when I helped a wife who needed to IM her husband in Iraq, 
or  a  grandmother  who,  for  the  first  time,  saw  a  grandchild  on  the  Internet,  or 
a child who needed to find a Martin Luther King, Jr. speech. None of these peo-
ple  have  their  own  computers  at  home.  This  is  like  the  whole  Carnegie  move-
ment  for  books,  i.e.,  it  tried  to  provide  information  to  the  people  who  could  not 
afford books. Now, the challenge that we face is that people cannot afford com-
puters  or  Internet.  This  is  especially  true  in  rural  America.  These  individuals 
might  have  computers,  but  getting  access  to  an  Internet  connection  is  difficult 

5 Bertot et al., p. 28. 
6 Communications Workers of America, Speed Matters: A Report on the Internet Speeds in All 

50 States, August 2008, p. 3. 

7 Bertot et al., p. 10. 
8 Ibid., p. 51. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

28 

if not impossible. I’ve seen all these examples and more and they always make 
me think that what we do is worth it. 

From a librarian in the McDonald County Library, Pineville MO: 

The  little  Noel  branch  library  has  a  small  computer  lab,  and  during  a  3-hour 
period  last  week,  . . .  I  encountered  5  different  languages  at  one  time,  helped 
Somali refugees fill out citizenship forms, watched a toddler in a diaper handle 
the mouse on the children’s computer like a pro, observed online college courses 
being  taken,  helped  an  older  gentleman  send  an  e-mail  to  his  son  in  Japan  in 
the military—the only way he could afford to communicate with him. Our little 
computer lab provided access to job searching and a way to ‘‘escape’’ this small 
rural impoverished town with our high-speed connection. 

From a librarian in Wright County, MO: 

In  our  rural  community  the  only  public  access  to  broadband  IS  the  library. 
Business  people  come  in  to  order  and  research  products  because  it  takes  them 
less time to do these tasks if they use our computers rather than use the slower 
ones they have at their places of business. We are an impoverished community 
and we have a lot of patrons that are going to college 2 days a week, they come 
into  the  library  and  download  their  lessons,  talk  to  their  professors,  do  some 
of  their  assignments  on-line  and  then  send  in  their  homework  on-line.  They 
often compliment us on having such a fast connection. 
We  do  our  cataloging  through  the  Internet  because  we  do  not  have  the  money 
in  our  budget  to  hire  a  professional  catalog  employee.  This  helps  our  library 
budget  out  tremendously  since  I  do  not  know  where  we  could  find  the  money 
for this position. I believe that this is one of the best things that the State helps 
us with—the fast Internet connections we have at all branches. 

From a librarian in Oregon County, MO: 

What Internet access means to the Oregon County Library District and our pa-
trons? It means that a 90-year-old great grandma can come into the library and 
read  her  e-mail,  see  a  picture  of  a  great  granddaughter  in  Texas  on  her  first 
day  of  kindergarten  and  print  out  the  picture  to  show  everyone.  It  means  that 
our  local  college  students  can  work  on-line,  communicate  with  their  professors, 
e-mail  their  assignments,  take  on-line  classes  and  compete  on  a  level  playing 
field  with  students  from  metropolitan  areas.  It  means  local  citizens  who  can’t 
afford personal home computers and a fast Internet connection can come to the 
public  library  and  use  our  resources.  You  must  keep  in  mind;  Oregon  County 
is  a  rural,  economically  disadvantaged  county.  The  Alton  Public  Library  is  lo-
cated about ‘‘fifty miles from anywhere’’. What does Internet access mean to us? 
It means everything! 

From a librarian in Warrensburg, MO: 

The Social Security office in Warrensburg closed last year. The nearest physical 
offices  are  now  in  Sedalia  or  Lee’s  Summit—a  30+-mile  drive  for  nearly  every-
one  in  the  two  counties  we  serve.  Since  many  of  the  activities  related  to  Social 
Security  (go  to  http://www.ssa.gov/onlineservices/  for  a  list)  can  be  done  on-
line,  it  is  crucial  for  the  80,000  residents  of  Johnson  &  Lafayette  Counties  to 
have  access  to  the  Internet.  Our  connections  are  quick  (T1  and  faster)  so  we 
can  assist  those  who  cannot  travel  to  the  Social  Security  offices  or  those  who 
have no computer or decent connection speed. 

From a librarian in Morgan County, MO: 

High-speed  Internet  access  is  critical  in  Morgan  County.  We  are  a  poor  rural 
community.  Students  who  cannot  afford  to  go  away  to  college  stay  at  home  to 
work  and  take  online  classes  and  we  proctor  many  of  their  tests  monthly.  We 
have kids who commute to the local community college and come to the library 
to  check  and  complete  assignments.  This  is  their  only  opportunity  to  continue 
their  education.  We  have  MANY  grandparents  for  whom  the  public  computer 
is their only link to children and grandchildren. We print a lot of family photos! 
Seniors  who  do  not  drive  great  distances  rely  on  us  to  bring  their  families  to-
gether. 
Society has made it necessary for almost everyone to have computer access. Peo-
ple  come  in  to  apply  for  jobs  online  on  a  weekly  basis  now  that  large  chain 
stores like Target, Lowe’s, Applebee’s, and Wal-Mart require people to apply for 
jobs  online.  More  local  companies  now  require  online  applications  and  even 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

29 

truckers apply for jobs online. Our community would be at a great loss without 
the Internet. 
The dad in a local family was being sent to Argentina for his job and the family 
wanted  current  information  on  climate,  food,  culture,  etc.  The  library  did  not 
have  books  on  modern  Argentina  (not  much  demand  usually),  so  the  Internet 
brought  Argentina  to  them.  Home-school  families,  who  do  not  have  a  school  li-
brary  computer,  use  our  library  to  access  the  Internet  for  world  news,  home-
work help and more. 

From a librarian in Centralia, MO: 

Internet is vital to Centralia patrons for online job applications. More and more 
companies are requiring job applications to be done by computer. The staff has 
helped  numerous  grateful  patrons  that  need  a  non-technical  job  but  have  no 
computer skills to apply. How sad it would be if community members were un-
employed just because they had no Internet access or computer skills. 

From a librarian in a suburb of St. Louis, MO: 

When  I  was  at  the  Richmond  Heights  Memorial  Library,  I  observed  a  nice 
young  man  who  came  in  frequently  to  use  our  computers.  I  never  really  knew 
what  he  was  doing,  but  one  afternoon  he  came  up  to  me  at  the  reference  desk 
and proudly announced, ‘I got into medical school!’ I congratulated him, and he 
thanked me, noting that he had done the entire application process right there 
on the library’s computers. I thought it was the kind of success story for which 
we live. 

From a librarian in the town of Ozark in southwest Missouri: 

I  remember  the  young  man  who  didn’t  live  in  Ozark  but  was  just  traveling 
through and came into the library on 9/11. His sister worked in the Twin Tow-
ers and he came to our library to check the news and send e-mails to his family 
in New York City. 

From a librarian at Wood Place Public Library: 

Providing reliable, fast Internet access has become an increasingly necessary li-
brary  service  in  my  small  rural  community.  Today  it  is  used  by  many  of  the 
lowest income patrons and is vital for anyone who is trying to ‘‘get ahead’’. The 
GED  classes  that  are  held  here  have  started  using  Internet  based  study  pro-
grams.  There  are  also  several  individuals  that  come  in  regularly  to  work  on 
their  on-line  college  classes.  Having  college  classes  available  is  making  it  pos-
sible for more non-traditional students in our community to take college classes. 
I  stopped  in  a  convenience  store  recently  and  the  clerk  was  one  of  the  middle- 
aged  patrons  that  have  been  coming  into  the  library  to  take  college  classes  on- 
line.  She  said  the  convenience  store  job  is  her  second  job  and  in  addition  to 
working  two  jobs  and  raising  a  family  she  is  slowly  working  her  way  through 
college  in  order  to  eventually  obtain  a  better  paying  job.  It’s  rewarding  to  see 
someone working so hard to become financially stable. 
I also see lots of individuals here that are not working or not able to make ends 
meet.  Their  first  step  toward  becoming  financially  independent  is  to  find  work, 
so they don’t need to rely on public aid for food and other necessities. The local 
McDonald’s  is  one  of  the  businesses  that  hire  individuals  with  no  prior  work 
experience.  McDonald’s  now  only  accepts  online  applications,  and  of  course 
many  of  the  people  who  need  these  jobs  don’t  have  access  to  the  Internet  at 
home.  We  help  many  individuals  find  their  way  into  the  online  application 
website for McDonald’s. 
We recently used an LSTA grant to fund an upgrade and expansion of our pub-
lic  access  computers.  I  thought  that  after  this  project  was  complete,  we’d  have 
all  the  Internet  services  needed  for  this  small  community.  I  was  wrong!  Every-
thing was done in June 2008 and already the demand has increased to the point 
where  people  are  often  waiting  for  their  turn  to  use  the  Internet.  We  have  set 
aside  a  room  to  add  a  computer  lab  and  have  furniture  available.  I  know  that 
there is an LSTA grant available that will partially fund the equipment we now 
need in order to meet the basic needs of our patrons. 
However,  we  don’t  currently  have  enough  funds  to  even  provide  the  25  percent 
match that is required with that grant. I don’t think the taxpayers will approve 
additional  funding  for  us  and  the  local  businesses  and  organizations  that  we 
used  to  rely  on  to  help  fund  library  projects  are  already  overwhelmed  with  re-
quests for financial assistance from other entities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

30 

I  hope  your  visit  to  Washington  will  help  inform  Congress  that  funding  for  in-
creased  broadband  Internet  access  at  libraries  is  necessary  for  the  good  of  our 
country. 

From a librarian at Macon Public Library: 

Here at Macon Public Library we feel our MOREnet Internet access is as impor-
tant  to  our  community  as  our  state  and  Federal  highways.  Our  computers  are 
used  daily  and  often  people  come  to  us  in  a  panic  like  the  lady  who  had  very 
little  travel  experience  and  had  ordered  airline  tickets  over  the  phone  but  was 
told she had to go online and print her tickets. She had no computer, no Inter-
net  access  and  no  computer  skills.  We  easily  helped  this  woman  and  lessened 
her stress so she could enjoy her trip. 
Wal-Mart  employees  use  our  public  terminals  to  access  their  pay  history.  They 
have  online  access  at  work,  but  when  they  need  assistance  and  have  privacy 
concerns, they prefer to ask us instead of someone at their place of employment. 
We do more and more online test proctoring for students of all ages and abilities 
who  are  often  on  a  budget  and  saving  travel  miles  really  makes  a  difference. 
These are just a few examples of how average citizens in a City of 5,500 people 
depend  on  public  broadband  access  in  their  libraries  and  feel  it  is  a  necessity. 

From a librarian at Daniel Boone Regional Library, Columbia, MO: 

We are opening our computer-training lab on Friday mornings for Refugee and 
Immigration  Services  to  help  their  clients.  We  also  have  added  a  special  time 
each week in the computer-training center to help people with on line job appli-
cations  and  writing  resumes.  This  is  in  addition  to  our  normal  classes  and 
partnering  with  AARP  to  provide  electronic  tax  filing  for  people  over  65  and 
low-income  members  of  the  community.  They  are  always  so  grateful—when  I 
walked by 1 day last week I was greeted with a round of applause for allowing 
AARP  to  use  the  space.  I  know  computer  access  means  a  lot  to  them.  At  CPL, 
we had 2,800 people log on using our wireless access just in July. We see more 
and more business people, travelers and students taking online classes and oth-
ers using our wireless capacity. 

From a librarian in the Doniphan-Ripley County Library: 

We  had  a  patron  who  had  a  good  deal  of  pain  due  to  blockages  in  the  veins 
in her legs and needed surgery. She had heard of a new kind of procedure with 
a cool laser that needed much less recovery time but she couldn’t find anybody 
who knew anything about it. With some research on the Internet, I found a sur-
geon  in  Springfield,  MO  who  specialized  in  the  surgery  and  successfully  per-
formed it on her. A year and a half later, the hospitals in Cape Girardeau, MO 
(closer to her home) had the equipment but it was too because the patron need-
ed the surgery immediately and we were able to help her avoid a long and pain-
ful recovery with the old technique. 

You  can  see  from  these  examples  why  librarians  well  understand  the  importance 
of  broadband.  Not  only  have  we  embraced  the  digital  revolution,  we  also  maintain 
our  more  traditional  services—services  that  are  now  in  greater  demand  because 
technology  has  also  made  our  traditional  resources  better  known,  increasingly  used 
and easier to share through interlibrary loans and online bibliographic catalogs. 

While our efforts to enhance Internet connectivity have been incredibly rewarding, 
we  need  to  do  more.  Broadband  needs  for  a  library  are  not  the  same  as  the  needs 
for  home  users.  Libraries  need  to  respond  to  a  wide  range  of  bandwidth-intensive 
applications requiring simultaneous robust connectivity for multiple users. We must 
support  user  needs  at  in-library  computer  workstations,  for  those  connecting  wire-
lessly on their laptops, and for those connecting remotely from home. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  the  Internet  has  grown  beyond  all  our  previous  wildest 
expectations,  and  libraries  across  the  country  are  constantly  playing  catch-up  with 
the  growth  in  demand.  Video-based  services  require  exceptional  levels  of  capacity. 
Even  ordinary  consumers  will  soon  be  demanding  huge  amounts  of  capacity  for 
basic  uses.  Or,  as  some  advocates  have  said,  ‘‘today’s  bandwidth  hog  is  tomorrow’s 
average Internet user.’’ 

While policy-makers and libraries have made extraordinary efforts to adapt to this 
rapidly changing environment, libraries are challenged to take maximum advantage 
of  these  new  services.  Public  libraries  across  the  country  are  struggling  to  find,  in-
stall  and  pay  for  large  enough  broadband  ‘‘pipes’’  to  meet  the  great  demand  for 
Internet  access.  Frequently,  patrons  must  wait  in  line  to  use  the  computers  and  li-
brarians  often  find  that  their  networks  slow  to  a  crawl,  especially  in  the  afternoon 
when  students  get  out  of  school  and  come  to  the  library  to  do  homework.  Several 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

31 

libraries  have  delayed  purchasing  popular  online  resources,  such  as  the  interactive 
homework  help  site  www.tutor.com,  in  an  effort  not  to  exacerbate  already  slow  ac-
cess speeds. 

These  problems  are  particularly  acute  because  of  the  rapid  innovations  of  Inter-
net-based  technologies.  As  Moore’s  Law  says,  Internet  usage  is  doubling  approxi-
mately  every  18  months,  and  public  libraries  are  no  exception.  Libraries  that  in-
stalled  a  basic  T1  connection  last  year,  believing  it  would  satisfy  several  years  of 
demand,  are  finding  that  the  capacity  is  already  overwhelmed  with  additional  de-
mand.  Our  studies  how  that  82.5  percent  of  public  libraries  have  fewer  computers 
available  than  patrons  who  want  to  use  them,  at  least  some  of  the  time  (up  from 
77.5  percent  in  2006–2007)  and  57.5  percent  of  public  libraries  report  that  their 
Internet  bandwidth  is  insufficient  to  meet  the  demand  some  or  all  of  the  time  (up 
from nearly 52 percent in 2006–2007).9 

There  are  many  reasons  why  public  libraries  cannot  satisfy  this  burgeoning  de-

mand. 

• Sometimes there is simply no broadband capacity available from any of the ex-
isting broadband providers. Many libraries, located in more rural areas, require 
connectivity  that  resembles  the  needs  of  a  large  business,  and  providers  may 
not even have sufficient pipes to satisfy library needs in those locations. 
• Sometimes the cost of the new capacity is prohibitively expensive. We often find 
that  there  is  little  competition  among  broadband  providers  so  there  is  little  in-
centive for them to reduce their rates to affordable levels. 
• Sometimes  local  budgets  cannot  bear  the  increased  costs,  even  with  E-rate  dis-

counts. 

In Missouri, we have taken special efforts to address the need for greater Internet 
connectivity.  Established  in  1991,  the  Missouri  Research  and  Education  Network 
(MOREnet)  provides  Internet  connectivity,  access  to  Internet2,  technical  support, 
videoconferencing services and training to Missouri’s K–12 schools, colleges and uni-
versities, public libraries, health care, state government and other affiliated organi-
zations. 

MOREnet  encouraged  the  state’s  telecommunications  providers  to  construct  a 
MOREnet-designed, advanced, high-speed, high-bandwidth network throughout Mis-
souri. These connections, managed by MOREnet on behalf of the state’s schools and 
libraries,  also  laid  the  groundwork  for  Internet  availability  to  thousands  of  rural 
Missourians.  MOREnet  is  tremendously  important  to  our  152  public  library  sys-
tems, with 372 physical library locations and 29 bookmobiles serving more than 5.1 
million residents. Currently, 245 of our physical library locations are served by con-
nections from 1.5 Mbps to 100 Mbps capacity. 

[Missouri’s  public  libraries  are  primarily  organized  as  library  districts  (88.6  per-
cent)  with  the  rest  organized  as  municipal  government  libraries  (9.4  percent)  and 
as association libraries within a municipality (1.3 percent).10] 

Unfortunately,  Missouri  is  the  exception  rather  than  the  rule,  as  most  states  do 
not  have  the  resources  to  adopt  such  a  framework.  Most  states  are  struggling  to 
meet a demand that simply will not wait. 

As  I  mentioned  before,  the  E-rate  program  is  an  incredibly  valuable  resource 
without  which  many  libraries  could  not  afford  telecommunications  and  Internet 
service. Libraries across the country have great appreciation for the foresight of this 
Committee in originating this program. In the coming months and years, the library 
community is ready to work with you, the FCC and other stakeholders to make ap-
propriate  refinements  that  could  enhance  the  program.  Many  libraries  cannot  ben-
efit  fully  from  this  program  because  of  the  burdensome  application  and  disburse-
ment process. Furthermore, the discount formula does not work as well for libraries 
as  it  does  for  schools  so  that  library  discount  rates  may  not  accurately  reflect  the 
local  poverty  levels.  To  encourage  more  library  participation,  ALA  has  submitted  a 
simplification proposal to the FCC. We hope that the Commission will move forward 
on  our  recommendations  in  the  near  future.  In  this  way  ALA  hopes  to  increase  li-
brary  participation  in  the  E-rate  and  our  libraries’  ability  to  serve  the  American 
public. 

Mr. Chairman, I cannot say strongly enough how indebted we are to your leader-
ship  and  to  this  Committee  for  the  enormous  progress  we  have  made  in  the  last 
decade.  We  know  that  99  percent  of  public  libraries  can  now  offer  the  public  some 
level of no-fee public access computing. We know that the American public is bene-
fiting from our services. Public libraries are at the forefront of the Information Soci-

9 Ibid., p. 29. 
10 Ibid., p. 97. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

32 

ety  and  provide  invaluable  access  to  the  Internet  that  cannot  be  obtained  in  other 
ways. 

But  as  we  champion  the  many  public  services  and  benefits  brought  to  us  by 
broadband,  we  want  to  ensure  that  public  libraries  can  continue  to  serve  and  en-
hance  our  service  to  the  public.  It  has  been  clearly  demonstrated  that  Americans 
need the services and applications that broadband technology delivers. Public librar-
ies  require  faster  and  cheaper  broadband  services  to  deliver  those  services  to  the 
public. 

I  applaud  this  Committee  for  expressing  interest  in  the  role  that  public  libraries 
play  in  increasing  the  availability  of  Internet  access  for  all  Americans.  On  behalf 
of  the  American  Library  Association,  we  look  forward  to  working  closely  with  you 
in  addressing  the  issues  of  expanding  broadband  deployment  and  meeting  the  tele-
communications needs of all Americans. 

ATTACHMENT 

Libraries Connect Communities 

Executive Brief 
The State of Technology and Funding in U.S. Public Libraries in 2008 

Libraries  Connect  Communities:  Public  Library  Funding  and  Technology  Access 
Study  2007–2008  marks  the  second  year  of  the  study,  funded  by  the  Bill  and 
Melinda  Gates  Foundation  and  the  American  Library  Association  (ALA),  and  con-
tinues the research of previous surveys conducted by John Carlo Bertot and Charles 
R.  McClure,  with  others,  since  1994.1 The  study  presents  national  and  state  data 
gathered  through  three  integrated  approaches:  a  national  survey  that  collected  in-
formation about public library Internet connectivity, use, services, funding and sus-
tainability  issues;  a  questionnaire  sent  to  the  Chief  Officers  of  State  Library  Agen-
cies (COSLA); and focus groups and site visits held in four states: New York, North 
Carolina, Pennsylvania and Virginia. 

This year’s study reinforces a key finding from 2006–2007: Library infrastructure 
(staffing, space and bandwidth) is being stretched to capacity. This year’s report ex-
pands  our  understanding  regarding  the  strain  on  public  libraries  to  provide  public 
access  to  the  Internet  and  other  technology,  and  sounds  a  warning  about  the  long- 
term sustainability and future quality of free public access to the Internet and other 
technology in our Nation’s libraries. Report highlights include: 

• Libraries serve a unique and important role in providing free access to all types 
of  information  and  telecommunications  services.  The  demand  for  such  services 
has  increased  significantly  with  growing  need  for  access  to  digital  and  online 
information—including e-government, continuing education and employment op-
portunities. Almost 73 percent of libraries report they are the only source of free 
access to computers and the Internet in their communities. 

• Funding  data  indicate  volatility  in  how  libraries  support  this  public  technology 
access. Even libraries with historically stable funding are experiencing flat lev-
els of local funding, and have reacted to this by shifting to soft funding sources 
(fees/fines, donations, grants, etc.) as a way to support public access computing 
services. Local government revenue and ‘‘other’’ (soft funding) account for nearly 
90 percent of overall public library funding.2 

• Staffing  levels  are  not  keeping  pace  with  patron  demand—both  for  those  staff 
who provide training and other direct patron services, as well as for those staff 
who maintain the information technology infrastructure. Libraries cite the need 
for  greater  staff  expertise  and  availability  as  a  barrier  to  being  able  to  support 
and manage public access technologies. 

• An increase in the number of libraries reporting connection speeds greater than 
769  kbps  (up  11  percent  from  last  year)  is  tempered  by  the  vast  majority  of  li-
braries (75 percent) who report their wireless and desktop computers share the 
same network, thus diminishing the effective speed of access to the Internet at 
the workstation. Further, libraries are not moving above the 1.5 Mbps speed as 
had been anticipated during 2006–2007. 

1 Information  about  the  reports  from  the  1994–2006  studies  is  available  at  http:// 

www.ii.fsu.edu/plInternet. 

2 National  Center  for  Education  Statistics.  Public  Libraries  in  the  United  States:  Fiscal  Year 
2005.  (NCESES  2008–301).  Washington,  D.C.:  NCESES,  2007.  http://nces.ed.gov/pubs2008/ 
2008301.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

33 

• Public  access  Internet  services  (including  homework  resources,  e-books,  audio 
and  video)  grew  dramatically  over  the  past  year.  These  resources  provide  far 
more  options  for  library  patrons  to  use  inside  the  library  and  remotely  from 
home,  work  and  school,  but  also  impact  the  library’s  public  services  and  tech-
nology infrastructure. 
• Many  library  buildings,  inadequate  in  terms  of  space  and  infrastructure  (e.g., 
wiring  and  cabling),  cannot  support  additional  public  access  computers  and 
technology infrastructure. 

The interconnectedness of funding, staffing, buildings and maintenance cannot be 
underestimated, as all have a direct impact on the amount and quality of public ac-
cess technology services that public libraries can provide to their patrons. 
Key Findings 

For  some  library  users  and  supporters,  library  technology  is  defined  simply  as  a 
working  computer  on  a  desk  with  Internet  access  and  a  printer.  Anyone  working 
in a public library, however, knows that simple definition inadequately describes the 
range  of  technology  infrastructure  support  needed  to  provide  current  public  access 
computing.  A  range  of  issues  detailed  in  this  report  require  attention  to  maintain 
and improve technology access, and can be dangerous if ignored. 

The  last  decade  has  seen  steady  growth  in  the  integration  of  public  access  com-
puting services within libraries. Public libraries provide an impressive array of serv-
ices  that  are  critical  to  the  communities  they  serve,  but  the  underlying  support 
needed to maintain and improve these services has been lagging for many U.S. pub-
lic  libraries.  As  libraries  introduce  more  computers  and  more  robust  technology- 
based services, keeping up with patron demand is an ongoing challenge. 
Funding Remains Flat for Many Public Libraries 

‘‘Money  is  going  to  be  tight.  There’ll  be  more  pressure  to  do  more  with  less  as 
we’ve been doing.’’ 

Between 2006–2007 and 2007–2008, overall budgets have remained level for most 
libraries. Although libraries experienced an average annual increase of 4 percent in 
operating funds from 1996–2005,3 preliminary national data suggest decreases dur-
ing Fiscal Year 2006 in both library expenditures and their distribution. Indications 
are  that  individual  libraries  have  experienced  a  shifting  of  expenditures  away  from 
collections to other line items (e.g., technology, utilities, building maintenance).4 Re-
distributing  existing  resources  to  other  types  of  expenditures  is  not  uncommon,  es-
pecially  with  staffing  expenses  being  the  most  inflexible  of  library  expenditures.  In 
a  2006  ALA  study  on  funding,5 libraries  reported  that  when  operating  budgets  de-
cline,  reductions  in  staff,  services  and  collections  follow  this  pattern,  in  priority  of 
order of cuts: 

1. Materials (average of 68.3 percent of libraries responding). 
2. Staffing (average of 41.6 percent of libraries responding). 
3. Hours open (average of 24.6 percent of libraries responding). 
4. Electronic access (12.6 percent of libraries responding). 

When  scrutinized  at  a  local  level,  expenditures  varied  much  more  than  could  be 
discerned  at  the  national  level.  For  instance,  when  comparing  anticipated  FY2007 
operating  expenditures  reported  in  the  2006–2007  Public  Library  Funding  and 
Technology  Access  Study  (PLFTAS) 6 with  actual  expenditures  in  this  year’s  study, 
it  is  apparent  that  projected  expenditures  were  not  realized.  Overall  operating  ex-
penditures fell short of anticipated levels by 15.5 percent, and varied by specific ex-
penditure type from those anticipated by as much 20 percent: 

• 20 percent below anticipated expenditures for salaries. 

3 National  Center  for  Education  Statistics.  Public  Libraries  in  the  United  States  (FY1996– 
2005).  http://www.nces.ed.gov/pubsearch/getpubcats.asp?sid=041#.  Note:  Beginning  in  fall 
2007, the Institute of Museum and Library Services (IMLS) began publishing the Public Librar-
ies  in  the  United  States  reports.  Individual  reports  are  now  online  at  http://harvester 
.census.gov/imls/pubs/pls/index.asp. 

4 Institute  of  Museum  and  Library  Services.  Compare  Public  Libraries,  Fiscal  Year  2006  [on-

line search tool of public library data]. http://harvester.census.gov/imls/compare/index.asp. 

5 American Library Association. Office for Research & Statistics. Funding Issues in U.S. Pub-
lic  Libraries,  Fiscal  Years  2003–2006.  (2006).  http://www.ala.org/ala/ors/reports/funding 
issuesinuspls.pdf. 

6 Libraries Connect Communities: Public Library Funding and Technology Access Study 2006– 
2007.  Chicago:  American  Library  Association,  2007.  http://www.ala.org/ala/ors/plftas/ 
0607report.cfm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

34 

• 0.8 percent below anticipated expenditures for collections. 
• 12.5 percent above anticipated expenditures for other expenditures. 
Libraries  reported  actual  spending  of  about  58  percent  of  operating  budgets  on 
salaries in FY 2007 and about 26 percent of the operating budget on ‘‘other’’ expend-
itures—building  maintenance,  technology,  utilities,  etc.  In  addition  to  the  steady 
shift of expenditures away from collections to ‘‘other,’’ it appears we may be starting 
to see a shift away from salaries to ‘‘other’’ expenditures, as well. 

In this year’s questionnaire to COSLA, a majority of state libraries reported level 
or modest increases in state funding for public libraries in FY 2007, similar to pre-
vious  years.  Coupled  with  the  2006  ALA  study  on  funding,  such  spending  suggests 
that  public  libraries  have  been  grappling  with  declining  purchasing  power  since  as 
early  as  2003.  State  funding  makes  up  about  10  percent  of  public  library  operating 
revenue.  Half  of  state  libraries  estimated  flat  or  1–2  percent  increases  in  overall 
funding  for  public  libraries,  and  28.6  percent  estimated  overall  funding  growth  at 
5–10 percent. The extent to which these gains can be sustained given the recent eco-
nomic downturn remains unclear. 

While  the  detailed  financial  data  section  of  this  study  provides  more  in-depth  in-
formation, it is important to note that a greater reliance on non-tax sources of fund-
ing  and  a  larger  proportion  of  expenditures  shifting  toward  ‘‘other’’  line  items  and 
away  from  staff  and  collections  expenditures  are  important  trends  to  watch.  These 
are  key  questions  to  track  when  the  national  public  library  data  (Institute  of  Mu-
seum and Library Services) are reported for FY2007. 
Staffing at a Standstill 

‘‘The technology was brought in, and a whole new service created, without addi-
tional staff. It was just double the work for no more money, you know.’’ 

Library  staff  members  at  all  levels  play  vital  intermediary  roles  in  supporting, 
managing  and  maintaining  public  access  to  computers  and  the  Internet.  For  first- 
time users, a computer is only as good as the library staff available to orient them— 
including  how  to  use  a  mouse,  how  to  open  an  e-mail  account  and  how  to  search 
the Internet effectively. In addition to the one-on-one assistance offered in all librar-
ies,  almost  three-quarters  of  libraries  (73.4  percent)  offer  information  technology 
training  for  library  patrons.  More  library  staff  report  they  are  scheduling  one-hour 
sessions  with  patrons  to  orient  them  to  the  broad  range  of  skills  necessary  to  do 
research,  find  jobs  or  apply  for  government  assistance.  Many  librarians  report  that 
applying for jobs and government services are among the most staff-intensive patron 
Internet needs. 

Another  impact  on  front-line  staff  is  evident  in  the  high  percentage  of  libraries 
reporting  that  managing  time  limits  imposed  on  patron  use  of  workstations  has  to 
be done manually. Close to half (45.9 percent) of all public libraries and 63.6 percent 
of  rural  libraries  manage  computer  time  limits  with  paper  lists  and  taps  on  the 
shoulder.  Not  only  is  this  labor  intensive,  but  many  library  staff  reported  that  it 
is  the  most  stressful  task  that  they  perform.  Libraries  increasingly  are  turning  to 
software solutions that allow users to reserve access to a computer and/or automati-
cally cutoff Internet sessions without staff intervention. While all library staff inter-
viewed prefer this time management method, they agree that it adds a level of com-
plexity to the computing environment, and implementation snags are common. 

Source: National Center for Education Statistics. Public Libraries in the United States (Fiscal 

Years 2000–2005). http://nces.ed.gov/pubsearch/getpubcats.asp?sid=041# 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
O
R
N
O
C
6
1
9

35 

While  the  reported  average  is  about  50  percent,  some  library  staff,  particularly 
those  on  library  reference  desks  and  in  libraries  that  manually  manage  computer 
time limits, estimate that as much as 80 percent of their time is spent in any given 
day on technology-related tasks. 

Beyond direct patron assistance and training, library technical staff develop tech-
nology  plans  and  hardware  replacement  schedules;  build  and  support  integrated  li-
brary  systems  for  circulation,  cataloging,  online  public  access  catalog,  acquisitions 
and  computer  management;  troubleshoot  hardware,  software  and  telecommuni-
cations  networks;  select,  purchase  and  organize  data  bases  and  other  electronic  re-
sources  for  patron  use;  plan  for  and  negotiate  telecommunications  networks;  build 
and  update  library  Web  pages;  raise  awareness  of  new  Internet  services  . . .  and 
more. 

Like additional cars on the interstate, additional computers and Internet services 
in libraries contribute to the ‘‘traffic’’ and create additional demands for staff to ori-
ent patrons and mediate public access to these resources. Along with an 86 percent 
increase in the number of computers in U.S. public libraries, there was an 18.6 per-
cent  increase  in  library  visits  from  1.15  billion  in  2000  to  1.36  billion  in  2005.  The 
number  of  full-time  equivalent  (FTE)  staff  grew  only  6  percent  over  the  same  time 
period.7 

When  examined  by  population  service  size,  the  impact  on  the  smallest  public  li-
braries  (serving  fewer  than  10,000  residents)  is  even  stronger.  Libraries  serving 
fewer  than  1,000  residents  saw  the  greatest  percentage  increase  in  the  number  of 
public computers (up 98 percent), along with a decline in the number of FTETE staff 
(¥3 percent). 

Responding to an open-ended question about the three most significant challenges 
libraries face in maintaining their public access computers and Internet access, ade-
quate  staffing  topped  the  list,  closely  followed  by  financial  concerns  and  computer 
maintenance  and  management.  These  challenges  included  staff  skill  levels  and 
training  needs,  availability  of  IT  staff  support  and  overall  inadequate  staff  levels. 
Rural  libraries  (65.2  percent)  were  more  likely  to  name  the  need  for  more  staff  as 
their  top  challenge,  when  compared  with  their  suburban  (60.5  percent)  and  urban 
(44.4 percent) counterparts. 

Staff Training Needs Outpace Supply 

‘‘I  really  wish  there  was  an  easier  way  to  get  the  technology  and  training.  We 
teach ourselves, and we try to help each other. It should be easier.’’ 

7 National  Center  for  Education  Statistics.  Public  Libraries  in  the  United  States  (FY  2000– 

2005). http://www.nces.ed.gov/pubsearch/getpubcats.asp?sid=041#. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
O
R
N
O
C
6
1
9

36 

The  impact  on  staff  to  support  the  increasing  services  is  often  expressed  with 
frustration.  There  is  a  limited  amount  of  time  for  staff  to  train  themselves  on  the 
new  technology-based  services  offered  to  the  public,  as  well  as  the  time  to  ade-
quately support their patrons’ needs for training and instruction. 

With almost 60 percent of libraries staffed by fewer than five full-time staff mem-
bers,8 the  difficulty  of  providing  coverage  for  staff  to  receive  training  elsewhere  is 
a challenge often compounded by long travel times for rural library staff. Scheduling 
time  for  in-library  training  is  also  complicated,  especially  when  there  is  little  over-
lap time in schedules for part-time and full-time staff. 

In  the  questionnaire  to  COSLA,  about  90  percent  reported  offering  some  formal 
training  to  public  library  staff  in  six  categories  that  build  skills  in  funding,  public 
awareness  and/or  management  of  technology  in  libraries.  Technology  planning  (34 
percent)  was  most  likely  to  be  offered  at  least  once  a  year,  followed  by  advocacy/ 
marketing (22 percent) and technology evaluation (19 percent). 
IT Support Lags 

‘‘It  comes  down  to  me.  I’m  learning  as  I  go.  I’ve  waited  up  to  a  week  to  get  a 
computer hard drive fixed by county IT staff.’’ 

The  need  for  dedicated  technology  support  staff  was  identified  as  one  of  three 
main themes that emerged from the 2006–2007 study, and this need continues unre-
solved, as evidenced by data collected during the current study. In fact, for the first 
time, the 2007–2008 survey asked who provides information technology (IT) support 
(e.g., troubleshooting desktop issues, Internet connectivity, the library Web page) for 
the library. The three most common types of support reported were: 

• Building-based staff, not trained as an IT specialist (39.6 percent) 
• System-level IT staff (38.5 percent) 
• Outside vendor or contractor (30 percent) 
The  disparities  are  once  again  pronounced  between  urban  and  rural  libraries, 
however.  Rural  libraries  are  far  more  likely  than  urban  libraries  to  depend  on  li-
brarians  or  other  library  staff  who  are  not  trained  in  IT  (44.1  percent)  and  on  out-
side  vendors  (36.3  percent)—or  even  volunteers  (14.4  percent)—to  support  their 
technology.  Urban  libraries  are  most  likely  to  have  system-level  IT  staff  (76  per-
cent). 

One  source  of  IT  support  for  about  21  percent  of  urban  libraries  and  16  percent 
of  suburban  libraries—county/city  IT  staff—can  be  both  a  benefit  and  a  challenge. 
Several library directors reported a clash between the library’s mission of providing 
open  access  to  computer  and  Internet  resources  for  a  wide  range  of  users  and  user 
abilities,  and  the  typical  county/city  IT  approach  that  protects  data  and  limits  ac-
cess, as would be more common in an office environment. One director reported this 
is  an  issue  for  ongoing  education  and  discussion—including  the  decisions  about 
when  to  schedule  live  updates  on  the  city/county  network,  and  what  may  be 
uploaded or downloaded via library computers. Additionally, many city/county IT de-
partments are understaffed, and libraries are one of many agencies in need of tech-
nology support. 

Another complicating factor for libraries working to hire and retain IT staff is the 
salary  available  to  compensate  these  high-demand  staff.  In  the  general  population, 
computer  and  information  systems  managers  are  compensated  at  an  average  of 
$101,580,9 compared  with  $59,974  in  a  public  library  setting.10 The  2007  average 
public library director salary is $77,200.11 
Internet Access Speeds Bump Up, Fall Short 

‘‘Our  IT  department  looked  at  our  bandwidth  (1.5  Mbps)  and  found  that  at  2 
p.m. in the afternoon, it was slower than dial-up, we had so many people using 
it.’’ 

A positive development is that the number of libraries reporting connection speeds 
of  769  kbps  or  faster  increased  11  percent  since  last  year.  More  than  half  of  urban 
libraries (51.6 percent), 42.1 percent of suburban and 32.1 percent of rural libraries 

8 National  Center  for  Education  Statistics.  Public  Libraries  in  the  United  States:  Fiscal  Year 
2005.  (NCESES  2008–301).  Washington,  D.C.:  NCESES,  2007.  http://nces.ed.gov/pubs2008/ 
2008301.pdf. 

9 U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. Occupational Outlook Handbook. 2008–09 edition. 
10 American  Library  Association-Allied  Professional  Association.  ALA-APA  Salary  Survey 
2007: A Survey of Public and Academic Library Positions Requiring an ALA-Accredited Master’s 
Degree. Chicago: American Library Association, 2007. 

11 Ibid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

37 

now  report  offering  a  T1  connection.  In  the  COSLA  questionnaire,  several  state  li-
brarians  suggested  T1  should  be  the  minimum  level  of  connectivity  for  all  libraries 
in  their  states.  Although  many  libraries  improved  access  by  moving  to  T1  from 
lower speeds, there was a slight decline (about 3 percent) in the number of libraries 
reporting access speeds above 1.5 Mbps. 

There  also  is  evidence  in  the  2007–2008  study  that  more  libraries  have  reached 
capacity  in  their  technology  infrastructure.  Even  with  more  libraries  at  T1  speeds, 
the percentage of libraries that report their connection speed is insufficient to meet 
patron  demand  some  or  all  of  the  time  is  up  about  5  percent  over  the  2006–2007 
study.  This  may  be  attributed  to  shared  connections  between  wireless  and  desktop 
computers (up 25 percent from last year), the broadband demands of online services 
and resources, and the continual use of library public access computers. 

About 17 percent of libraries reporting in 2007–2008 had plans to increase access 
speeds  in  the  coming  year,  up  about  3  percent  from  the  2006–2007  study.  Slightly 
more libraries reported that they were at their maximum connection speed available 
(17.1  percent  compared  with  16.6  percent  last  year),  or  were  unable  to  afford  addi-
tional  bandwidth  (21.2  percent  compared  with  18.1  percent  last  year).  Proportion-
ally,  all  libraries  (rural,  suburban  and  urban)  considered  the  cost  of  increasing  ac-
cess speeds to be a barrier hindering upgrades, but rural libraries (24.8 percent) dis-
proportionately reported that they are at the maximum level of connectivity. 

Although  funding  is  a  strong  indicator  of  growth  and  sustainability  when  pro-
viding  computer-based  services  for  the  public,  the  overall  quality  of  these  services 
depends  heavily  both  on  access  speeds  and  on  the  adequacy  of  hardware—having 
enough computers as well as the age of those computers. 

This year’s study revealed that the age range for library computers in use is quite 
broad;  libraries  in  all  types  of  communities  are  keeping  computers  older  than  4 
years in use to support patron demand. When asked about key factors affecting the 
replacement  of  public  access  computers,  89.6  percent  of  libraries  reported  cost  and 
33.1  percent  reported  maintenance  and  general  upkeep  issues  as  factors.  Clearly, 
the  impact  of  reliance  on  soft  funding  and  insufficient  IT  staff  are  recognized  as 
growing barriers to supporting ongoing public technology access. 
Internet Services Show Double-Digit Growth 

‘‘We’re not being used less; we’re being used differently.’’ 

In  addition  to  the  hardware  and  software  offered  in  every  U.S.  public  library 
building, most libraries have created increasingly robust virtual collections of online 
resources via their websites and online catalogs. This year’s survey found that near-
ly  every  category  of  public  Internet  service  offered  in  U.S.  public  libraries  in-
creased—sometimes dramatically—from the 2006–2007 study. 

The  survey  indicated  double-digit  growth  in  the  availability  of  a  range  of  re-

sources in five key online services: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
O
R
N
O
C
6
1
9

38 

• Audio content increased 33 percent (from 38 to 71 percent). 
• Video content is up 32 percent (from 16.6 to 48.9 percent). 
• Homework resources grew 15 percent (from 68.1 to 83.4 percent). 
• E-book availability increased 13.5 percent (from 38.3 to 51.8 percent). 
• Digitized  special  collections  increased  by  almost  13  percent  (from  21.1  to  33.8 

percent). 

Licensed  data  bases  to  support  education  (like  World  Book  and  test  preparation 
materials), business (like Standard and Poor’s) and life interests (such as genealogy) 
are  still  the  most  commonly  provided  Internet-based  services—available  in  98  per-
cent  of  urban  libraries,  93  percent  of  suburban  libraries  and  80  percent  of  rural  li-
braries. 

Also  of  interest  is  that  these  online  services  grew  in  libraries  of  all  sizes.  Urban 
libraries—which  generally  benefit  from  greater  Internet  access  speeds,  dedicated 
technology budgets and dedicated IT staff—lead in every category of online services. 
But  their  rural  counterparts  reported  the  greatest  percentage  growth  in  offering 
homework  resources  (up  15  percent)  and  audio  content  (up  34  percent).  Suburban 
libraries, too, increased all online services and led their counterparts in the percent-
age growth of online instructional courses/tutorials provision (up 13 percent). 

Library  staff  rank  the  top  two  uses  of  public  Internet  service  that  are  as  critical 
to  their  community:  education  for  K–12  students  (78.7  percent);  and  job-seeking 
services  (62.2  percent).  In  fact,  these  responses  increased  significantly  in  both  cat-
egories since last year. The third most critical use is providing access to government 
information  (55.6  percent),  which  has  now  grown  larger  than  the  service  categories 
for  providing  education  resources  and  data  bases  for  adults/continuing  education 
services (46.9 percent) or computer and Internet skills training (37.6 percent). 

In  addition  to  providing  these  informational  and  lifelong  learning  resources,  li-
braries  also  provide  peripheral  device  support  to  library  patrons.  The  2007–2008 
study  asked  about  these  devices  for  the  first  time  and  found  that  public  libraries 
allow  users  to  access  and  store  content  on  USB  storage  devices  (e.g.,  flash  drives, 
portable drives) or other devices (72 percent), make use of digital camera connection 
and manipulation (37.4 percent) and burn CDs/DVDs (34.7 percent). 

The  results  and  effects  of  these  increases  in  online  public  library  services  are 
manifold. The good news is that library users who visit the library in person or vir-
tually  via  its  website  have  more  access  to  more  resources—many  of  which  are  un-
available or too expensive to purchase at the individual consumer level. The tradeoff 
is that these services often come at the expense of reduced Internet speeds, funding 
for  other  library  resources  and  higher  expectations  by  patrons  for  library  staff  as-
sistance in using these resources. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
O
R
N
O
C
6
1
9

39 

Buildings and Infrastructure Further Stretched 

‘‘Our  headquarters  library  is  twenty  years  old  this  year,  and  it  was  built  with 
no provision for Internet access.’’ 

This  year  also  marked  the  first  increase  in  the  number  of  new  computers  in  li-
braries  since  2002.12 The  average  number  of  public  access  computers  increased  by 
1.3 per library in 2007–2008. Urban libraries gained the most—2.7 more, now aver-
aging  21  per  library.  Suburban  libraries  reported  modest  gains,  adding  about  one 
computer  per  library  and  now  averaging  nearly  14  computers  per  library  outlet. 
Rural  libraries  gained  the  least,  adding  only  about  0.4  computers,  averaging  about 
7.5 computers per library in 2007–2008. 

For the second year, libraries reported space issues and challenges in maintaining 
an adequate supply of building-based electrical and IT wiring to support technology- 
based  services.  More  than  three-quarters  of  libraries  (77.7  percent)  reported  that 
space limitations are a key factor when considering adding public access computers. 
Another  36.4  percent  reported  the  lack  of  availability  of  electrical  outlets,  cabling 
or other infrastructure as a barrier—up from 31.2 percent in 2006–2007. 

Although  purchasing  equipment  and  basic  building  maintenance  may  be  paid 
from  annual  operating  sources,  significant  building  improvements  are  typically 
made from capital revenue sources. Fewer than 50 percent of public libraries benefit 
from  capital  revenue  sources  and  most  receive  less  than  $10,000—an  inadequate 
amount  when  rewiring  or  significant  cabling  is  required  to  increase  technology- 
based services.13 A majority of library buildings are 25 to 50 years old, and 40 per-
cent of library buildings are estimated to be in fair or poor condition.14 

To respond to these challenges, many libraries have added wireless to support pa-
trons bringing their own computers to the library or to support laptop check-out for 
in-library users. Libraries also reported the growing need for staff training in imple-
menting wireless, as they continue to dedicate desktop computers to patron use, and 
rely  on  wireless  laptops  for  training  or  the  demonstration  of  new  Internet  services. 
During site visits, a number of library directors indicated there was high demand 
for  more  workstations  and  wireless  connectivity  at  their  libraries.  But,  for  the  rea-
sons  noted  above,  such  was  unlikely  to  occur.  Moreover,  obtaining  more 
workstations  or  wireless  connectivity  might  only  exacerbate  the  strain  of  providing 
technology  training  to  users  and  staff,  and  could  put  even  more  pressure  on  the  li-
brary’s  budget  to  purchase  additional  software  and  other  resources  for  the 
workstations,  as  well  as  require  additional  funds  to  address  workstation  mainte-
nance issues. 

Fifty-six  percent  of  libraries  have  no  plans  to  add  computers  in  the  coming  year. 
This,  together  with  the  issues  of  insufficiency  of  bandwidth  access,  ongoing  chal-
lenges to fund staff support for IT and the inadequacy of building capacity and tech-
nology infrastructure, suggest the growing strain that libraries face to keep up with 
user demand for public access computing. 
Call to Action 

There must be a greater awareness of the challenging issues facing public librar-
ies  and  a  renewed  focus  on  sustainable  solutions  that  improve  the  quality—as  well 
as the quantity—of public technology access in U.S. public libraries. 

Millions  of  people  throughout  the  United  States  depend  upon  libraries  for  their 
access  to  online  educational  opportunities,  job-seeking  assistance,  e-government 
interactions, and help in using information resources. Almost 73 percent of libraries 
report they are the only source of free access to computers and the Internet in their 
communities. 

This study also revealed that public libraries indicate that their workstations are 
in  near  constant  use.  Although  wireless  access  is  available  in  almost  two-thirds  of 
libraries,  there  are  also  increased  levels  of  service  and  resource  demands  for  e-gov-
ernment, digital content and a range of other patron services that impose a greater 
load and impact on available bandwidth. 

Public library advocates must focus on specific areas needing urgent attention: 

12 Bertot,  J.C.  and  C.R.  McClure.  Information  Use  Management  and  Policy  Institute,  Florida 
State  University.  Public  Libraries  and  the  Internet  2002:  Internet  Connectivity  and  Networked 
Services. (2002). http://www.ii.fsu.edu/plinternetlreports.cfm. 

13 National  Center  for  Education  Statistics.  Public  Libraries  in  the  United  States:  Fiscal  Year 
2005.  (NCESES  2008–301).  Washington,  D.C.:  NCESES,  2007.  http://nces.ed.gov/pubs2008/ 
2008301.pdf. 

14 Chief  Officers  of  State  Libraries  Agencies  (COSLA),  Legislative  Committee,  National  Con-

struction Survey, 2007. Prepared by the New Jersey State Library for COSLA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

40 

• Public libraries need stable and sustainable funding for technology services. Li-
braries currently are shifting expenditures to cover technology costs and/or rely-
ing  on  ‘‘soft’’  (non-tax)  support  to  fund  technology.  In  doing  so,  libraries  mask 
the  impacts  of  funding  cuts  and  increased  operating  costs—sometimes  until 
they are literally forced to close their doors. 
• Librarians and policymakers must re-think Federal and state support to public 
libraries. Only a small portion of public library funding (0.5 percent) comes from 
the Federal Government, yet public libraries have important social roles and re-
sponsibilities  to  American  society  and  overall  quality  of  life.  New  strategies  for 
national support to public libraries should be developed. 
• The  public  library  community  needs  to  develop  new  models  for  deploying  and 
managing  technology.  In  addition  to  participating  in  library  networks,  coopera-
tives  and  consortia  that  leverage  shared  resources,  libraries  need  to  develop 
strategies  to  work  with  other  community  organizations  to  promote  additional 
public access technologies. Collaboration with educational organizations, such as 
public  schools  and  community  colleges,  other  local  community  groups  and  pri-
vate sector firms may produce ideas and strategies that can integrate with, ex-
tend  and/or  enhance  public  library  networked  services.  Such  collaborations  can 
be an important component of the library’s advocacy strategy, alleviate pressure 
on the public library as the sole provider of public access and create a more ro-
bust community-wide public access infrastructure. 
• Investing  in  additional  public  library  staff  and  staff  training  activities  are  in-
vestments  in  technology.  The  one-on-one  and  formal  trainings  offered  in  librar-
ies  are  essential  for  many  patrons,  and  for  many,  this  is  the  only  avenue  for 
them to learn how to successfully use Internet-based resources for work, school 
and  life  interests.  Increasingly  complex  networked  environments  also  demand 
dedicated IT staffing. 

These  are  only  some  of  the  most  important  areas  where  public  library  advocates 
should  focus  their  attention.  Additional  suggestions  and  possible  strategies  are  dis-
cussed elsewhere in this report. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Ms. Conroy. 
May  I  now  call  upon  Senator  Stevens  to  introduce  our  final  wit-

ness? 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  we  should  thank  Mr. 
Peltola for being where he is because he came to his office at 6 a.m. 
this morning because of the 4 hour time zone difference. 

I want to show you first—this is a chart that shows the road map 
of  the  United  States,  the  roads  in  the  South  48  and  the  roads  in 
Alaska.  Now,  in  Alaska,  without  roads,  we  proceeded  to  adopt  the 
whole  concept  of  telemedicine,  and  the  YKHC,  headed  by  Gene 
Peltola, has led in this effort. 

The Chairman actually was with us as we went up to visit Gene 
in  Bethel,  Alaska  right  there.  This  is  a  map  that  shows  our  trans-
portation  system.  We  basically  have  no  transportation  system.  We 
have  gone  to  telemedicine  and  tele-education  in  Alaska  far  ahead 
of  the  rest  of  the  country.  And  the  leader  in  this  now  is  Gene 
Peltola,  who  heads  the  Yukon  Delta  area.  Really  it  is  the  Yukon- 
Kuskokwim Health Corporation now. 

And  Gene  I  thank  you  very  much  for  coming.  It  is  your  turn  to 

make your comments. Thank you for agreeing to do this. 

STATEMENT OF GENE PELTOLA, PRESIDENT 

AND CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER 

YUKON-KUSKOKWIM HEALTH CORPORATION 

Mr. PELTOLA. Thank you. Good morning, Chairman Inouye, Sen-
ator Stevens, Senator Hutchison. I am Gene Peltola, President and 
CEO of the Yukon-Kuskokwim Health Corporation. I thank you for 
giving me the opportunity to address you today by video teleconfer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

41 

encing  about  the  hugely  positive  impact  that  broadband  deploy-
ment has had on the delivery of health care services to some of the 
most  isolated  and  economically  challenged  citizens  in  the  United 
States. 

As I said, I am the President and CEO of the Yukon-Kuskokwim 
Health  Corporation,  also  known  as  YKHC,  a  consortium  estab-
lished  by  58  federally  recognized  Native  American  tribes.  We  pro-
vide  comprehensive  health  care  to  approximately  28,000  largely 
Yup’ik  Eskimo  people  living  in  50  communities  spread  across  the 
Yukon-Kuskokwim  Delta,  a  roadless  region  approximately  the  size 
of the state of Oregon. 

The  Yukon-Kuskokwim  Delta,  which  is  depicted  on  the  map  at-
tached  to  my  testimony,  is  located  on  the  Bering  Sea  on  the  west-
ern  coast  of  Alaska,  nearly  4,000  miles  away  from  Washington, 
D.C.  The  average  per  capita  income  of  our  patients  is  approxi-
mately $15,000 a year. 

Providing  health  care  for  YKHC’s  patients  is  a  profoundly  dif-

ficult challenge. 

First,  transportation  costs  in  the  Y-K  Delta,  where  villages  are 
reachable  only  by  plane,  boat,  or  in  the  winter  by  snow  machine, 
have  always  been  high.  Now  that  the  cost  of  gasoline  is  approach-
ing  $8  a  gallon  in  our  villages,  the  cost  of  transporting  a  patient 
from  a  village  to  a  subregional  clinic  or  to  our  regional  hospital  in 
Bethel for anything but the most essential services or the most se-
rious illnesses or injury has become cost prohibitive. 

Second,  during  our  long,  dark  winter,  the  Bering  Sea  generates 
some of the most violent weather in the world. This can isolate our 
villages for days or even weeks. 

Broadband  deployment  has  transformed  the  delivery  of  health 
care  services  in  the  Y-K  Delta.  Broadband  plays  a  critical  role  in 
YKHC’s efforts to manage the challenges I have just described. 

Five  years  ago,  YKHC  challenged  the  telecommunications  pro-
viders  in  the  Y-K  Delta  to  improve  their  satellite-based  broadband 
services.  In  response  to  YKHC’s  challenge  and  in  reliance  on  the 
Universal Service Fund’s rural health care program and other Fed-
eral broadband programs, private industry made a $50 million-plus 
investment  in  a  terrestrial  microwave  network,  which  we  call 
DeltaNet,  which  links  substantially  our  villages.  The  high  speed 
and  low  latency  of  this  new  network  are  ideal  for  medical  applica-
tions. 

We  are  proud  that  YKHC  now  leads  Alaska  in  the  delivery  of 
broadband  medical  services.  This  year,  YKHC  decided  to  increase 
bandwidth  to  3  megabits  per  second  for  all  of  our  clinics,  5  mega-
bits per second for our subregional clinics, and a 7.5 megabits link 
to the Internet in Anchorage. Key benefits of this higher-speed net-
work are found in the areas of telepsychiatry and teleradiology. 

The  need  for  behavioral  health  services  in  rural  Alaska  is  grow-
ing  disproportionately  to  the  size  of  the  population.  Rural  Alaska 
has  high  rates  of  alcoholism,  drug  abuse,  fetal  alcohol  syndrome, 
and  suicide.  In  2004,  Alaska’s  National  Guard  was  called  upon  for 
combat operations in Iraq and Afghanistan. Many of these guards-
men  have  completed  at  least  one  tour  and  have  returned  to  their 
villages,  bringing  with  them  the  same  mental  health  issues  affect-
ing  combat  veterans  across  our  country.  Rural  Alaska  veterans, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

42 

however, are a long way from the nearest Veterans Affairs facilities 
in Anchorage, Alaska. 

In conjunction with bandwidth increases, YKHC has deployed 53 
high  definition  video  teleconferencing  units  throughout  our  service 
area.  Using  high  definition  video,  YKHC  has  begun  delivering  be-
havioral  health  evaluation,  treatment,  and  consultation  for  vet-
erans  and  other  patients  at  its  residential  facilities  in  Bethel  and 
at  clinics  in  our  Y-K  Delta  villages  through  health  professionals 
working  from  Bethel  and  the  Alaska  Psychiatric  Institute  in  An-
chorage and soon with a psychiatric group out of the State of Min-
nesota. 

Because of our terrestrial broadband network, YKHC is now able 
to  offer  full  remote  diagnostic  imaging  services  to  its  patients  not 
only  in  Bethel,  but  also  in  our  four  subregional  clinics.  Those  are 
located in Aniak, St. Mary’s, Toksook Bay, and Emmonak. Because 
of our inability to recruit a full-time radiologist to Bethel, we must 
rely on teleradiology to meet our needs. We have two full-time radi-
ologists  reading  all  images  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week  from 
Dayton,  Ohio.  Using  our  broadband  network,  we  are  able  to  send 
patient  images  directly  to  the  radiologists  in  Dayton.  There  they 
read  the  exams  in  real  time.  There  is  no  delay.  They  are  waiting 
at  their  computers  for  the  exams  to  cover  over  the  Internet  and 
send  us  their  initial  evaluation  within  15  minutes  from  the  time 
the patient was imaged or X-rayed within our organization. 

Teleradiology  has  substantially  increased  patient  access  and 
operational efficiency in diagnosing a multitude of diseases such as 
pneumonia, fractures, head injuries, appendicitis, and cancers, just 
to name a few. It has also decreased the long wait times previously 
associated with patient treatment. 

For  example,  fractures  or  small  changes  in  a  chest  X-ray  can 
sometimes  be  missed  by  health  care  providers.  This  situation  usu-
ally requires calling the patients back into the health care facility. 
With  the  use  of  teleradiology,  we  have  the  ability  to  communicate 
and  consult  with  our  radiologists  on  every  case  to  ensure  that  we 
have the right diagnosis so that we can start appropriate treatment 
before our patient leaves the hospital or subregional clinic. 

We  recently  had  a  patient  involved  in  an  ATV  accident  in  the 
small  village  of  Lower  Kalskag.  We  were  able  to  send  the  patient 
to the Aniak subregional clinic, which is only 15 minutes away via 
plane, to have the patient’s lower leg X-rayed. Using teleradiology, 
it  was  determined  that  the  patient  fractured  his  fibula.  The  films 
were  then  sent  over  the  network  to  the  orthopedic  surgeon  in 
ANMC  hospital  in  Anchorage,  Alaska  who  made  the  call  that  the 
patient did not require surgery, only a cast. This not only saved the 
patient  from  coming  to  Bethel,  120  miles  away,  and  an  hour-long 
plane  ride,  but  also  saved  him  a  very  expensive  trip  to  Anchorage 
to see a specialist. 

All  of  this  broadband-related  progress  would  not  be  possible 
without  the  Universal  Service  Fund’s  rural  health  care  program 
which  the  chairman,  Senator  Stevens,  and  other  members  of  the 
Committee  and  the  Congress  have  supported  for  many  years.  On 
behalf  of  the  Alaska  rural  health  care  provider  community,  I  want 
to  thank  you  all  for  that  support,  which  has  saved  countless  indi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

43 

vidual  lives  in  Alaska  and  dramatically  has  improved  the  quality 
of life of all rural Alaskans. 

In  closing,  I  would  like  to  make  five  recommendations  to  the 

Committee. 

One,  expand  Medicaid  reimbursement  to  cover  telepsychiatry 
treatment,  including  patient-site  presentation  services  for  behav-
ioral health clinicians and case managers. 

Two,  address  licensing  and  reimbursement  issues  for  medical 
professionals  participating  in  distance  health  care  delivery  across 
State lines. 

Three,  encourage  the  Veterans  Administration  to  use  the  Indian 
Health  Service  and  IHS-contracted  medical  facilities  to  provide 
medical and behavioral health care to rural Alaska veterans. 

Four, increase the RHC support mechanism percentage for Inter-
net  access  from  the  current  25  percent  and  add  support  for  ad-
vanced  services  such  as  managed  videoconferencing  and  network 
management,  which  would  allow  YKHC  to  focus  on  the  delivery  of 
health care rather than managing core telecom infrastructure. 

Finally,  five,  expand  eligibility  of  USF  subsidies  to  cover  the  in-
frastructure  that  the  remote  providers  need  for  distance-delivered 
medical 
and 
videoconferencing hardware. 

services.  This  might 

bandwidth 

Once again, I thank you for the opportunity and honor to address 

include 

your Committee today. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Peltola follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GENE PELTOLA, PRESIDENT AND CHIEF EXECUTIVE 

OFFICER, YUKON-KUSKOKWIM HEALTH CORPORATION 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Hutchison,  Senator  Stevens,  and  other 
Members of the Committee. Thank you for giving me the opportunity to talk to you 
today by video teleconferencing about the hugely positive impact that broadband de-
ployment has had on the delivery of healthcare services to some of the most isolated 
and economically challenged citizens of the United States. 

I  am  the  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the  Yukon-Kuskokwim  Health 
Corporation,  also  known  as  YKHC,  a  consortium  established  by  58  federally  recog-
nized Native American tribes. We provide comprehensive healthcare to 28,000 large-
ly  Yup’ik  Eskimo  people  living  in  50  communities  spread  across  the  Yukon- 
Kuskokwim Delta, a roadless region the size of Oregon. The Y-K Delta, which is de-
picted  in  the  map  attached  to  my  testimony,  is  located  on  the  Bering  Sea  on  the 
western  coast  of  Alaska,  nearly  4,000  miles  away  from  Washington,  D.C.  The  aver-
age per capita income of our patients is $15,000 a year. 

Providing healthcare for YKHC’s patients is a profoundly difficult challenge. 
• First,  transportation  costs  in  the  Y-K  Delta,  where  villages  are  reachable  only 
by plane, boat, or the in the winter, snow machine, have always been high. Now 
that  the  cost  of  a  gallon  of  unleaded  gasoline  is  approaching  $8  in  these  vil-
lages,  the  cost  of  transporting  a  patient  from  a  village  to  a  subregional  clinic 
or  to  our  hospital  in  Bethel  for  anything  but  the  most  essential  service  or  the 
most serious illness or injury has become nearly prohibitive. 
• Second,  during  our  long,  dark  winter,  the  Bering  Sea  generates  some  of  the 
most  violent  weather  in  the  world;  this  can  isolate  our  villages  for  days  or 
weeks at a time. 

Broadband deployment has transformed the delivery of healthcare services in the 
Y-K  Delta.  Broadband  plays  a  critical  role  in  YKHC’s  efforts  to  manage  the  chal-
lenges I’ve just described. 

Five  years  ago  YKHC  challenged  the  telecommunications  providers  in  the  Y-K 
Delta  to  improve  their  satellite-based  broadband  services.  In  response  to  YKHC’s 
challenge,  and  in  reliance  on  the  Universal  Service  Fund’s  Rural  Health  Care  pro-
gram and other Federal broadband programs, private industry made a $50 million- 
plus investment in a terrestrial microwave network, DeltaNet, which links the sub-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

44 

stantial  majority  of  YKHC’s  villages.  The  high  speed  and  low  latency  of  this  new 
network are ideal for medical applications. 

We  are  proud  that  YKHC  now  leads  Alaska  in  the  delivery  of  broadband-based 
medical services. This year, YKHC decided to increase bandwidth to 3 Mbps (mega-
bits-persecond)  for  all  of  our  clinics,  5  Mbps  for  our  sub-regional  clinics,  and  a  7.5 
Mbps  link  to  the  Internet  in  Anchorage.  Key  benefits  of  this  higher-speed  network 
are found in the areas of telepsychiatry and teleradiology. 

The  need  for  behavioral  health  services  in  rural  Alaska  is  growing  disproportion-
ately  to  the  size  of  the  population.  Rural  Alaska  has  high  rates  of  alcoholism,  drug 
abuse,  fetal  alcohol  syndrome,  and  suicide.  In  2004,  Alaska’s  National  Guard  was 
called out for combat operations in Iraq and Afghanistan. Many of these guardsmen 
have completed at least one tour and have returned to their villages, bringing with 
them  the  same  mental  health  issues  afflicting  combat  veterans  across  the  country. 
Rural  Alaska  veterans,  however,  are  a  long  way  from  the  nearest  Veterans  Affairs 
facilities in Anchorage. 

In conjunction with bandwidth increases, YKHC has deployed 53 HD (high defini-
tion) video teleconference units through its service area. Using HD video, YKHC has 
begun  delivering  behavioral  health  evaluation,  treatment,  and  consultation  for  vet-
erans  and  other  patients  at  its  residential  facilities  in  Bethel  and  at  clinics  in  Y- 
K  Delta  villages,  through  health  professionals  working  from  Bethel  and  the  Alaska 
Psychiatric Institute in Anchorage, and soon with a psychiatric group in Minnesota. 
Using  its  terrestrial  broadband  network,  YKHC  is  now  able  to  offer  full  remote 
diagnostic  imaging  services  to  its  patients,  not  only  in  Bethel  but  also  in  our  four 
subregional  clinics,  Aniak,  St.  Mary’s,  Toksook  Bay,  and  Emmonak.  Because  of  our 
inability  to  recruit  a  full-time  radiologist  to  Bethel,  we  must  rely  on  teleradiology 
to  meet  our  needs.  We  have  two  full-time  radiologists,  reading  all  images  24  hours 
a day 7 days a week from Dayton Ohio. Using our broadband network, we are able 
to send patient images directly to the radiologists’ homes in Ohio. There, they read 
the  exams  in  real  time  (there  is  no  delay;  they  are  waiting  at  their  computers  for 
the exams to come over the Internet) and send us their initial evaluation within 15 
minutes from the time the patient was imaged in our x-ray departments. 

Tele-radiology  has  substantially  increased  patient  access  and  operational  effi-
ciency in diagnosing a multitude of diseases such as pneumonia, fractures, head in-
juries,  appendicitis  and  cancers,  just  to  name  a  few.  It  has  also  decreased  the  long 
wait times previously associated with patient treatment. 

For  example,  subtle  fractures,  or  small  changes  in  a  chest  x-ray,  can  sometimes 
be  missed  by  health  care  providers.  This  situation  usually  requires  calling  the  pa-
tients  back  into  the  healthcare  facility.  With  the  use  of  tele-radiology,  we  have  the 
ability  to  communicate  and  consult  with  our  radiologists  on  every  case  to  ensure 
that  we  have  the  right  diagnosis  so  that  we  can  start  appropriate  treatment  before 
our patient leaves the hospital or subregional clinic. 

We  recently  had  a  patient  involved  in  an  ATV  accident  in  the  small  village  of 
Lower  Kalskag.  We  were  able  to  send  the  patient  to  the  Aniak  subregional  clinic 
which  is  only  15  minutes  away  via  plane  to  have  the  patient’s  lower  leg  X-rayed. 
Using  teleradiology,  it  was  determined  that  the  patient  fractured  his  fibula.  The 
films were then sent over the network to the orthopedic surgeon at ANMC hospital 
in Anchorage who made the call that the patient did not need surgery, only a cast. 
This  not  only  saved  the  patient  from  coming  into  Bethel,  120  miles  away  and  an 
hour-long  plane  ride,  but  also  saved  him  a  very  expensive  trip  into  Anchorage  to 
see a specialist. 

All of this broadband-related progress would not be possible without the Universal 
Service  Fund’s  Rural  Health  Care  (RHC)  program  which  the  Chairman,  Senator 
Stevens,  and  the  other  Members  of  this  Committee  and  Congress  have  supported 
for  many  years.  On  behalf  of  the  Alaska  rural  healthcare  provider  community,  I 
want to thank all of you for that support, which has saved countless individual lives 
in Alaska and dramatically improved the quality of life of all rural Alaskans. 

In closing, I would like to make five recommendations to the Committee. 

1. Expand Medicaid reimbursement to cover telepsychiatry treatment, including 
patient-site presentation services for behavioral health clinicians and case man-
agers. 
2. Address licensing and reimbursement issues for medical professionals partici-
pating in distance healthcare delivery across state lines. 
3.  Encourage  the  Department  of  Veterans  Affairs  to  use  IHS  and  HIS-con-
tracted medical facilities to provide medical and behavioral health care to rural 
Alaska veterans. 
4. Increase the RHC support mechanism percentage for Internet access from the 
current  25  percent,  and  add  support  for  advanced  services  such  as  managed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

45 

video conferencing and network management, which would allow YKHC to focus 
on the delivery of healthcare, rather than managing core telecom infrastructure. 
5. Expand eligibility of USF subsidies to cover the infrastructure that the remote 
providers need for distance-delivered medical service. This might include bandwidth 
and video conference hardware. 

Thank you for the opportunity and honor to address your Committee today. 

The region served by the Yukon Kuskokwim Health Corporation 

DeltaNet—Broadband Microwave Network in the YKHC Region 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

.

s
p
e
1
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

Some of the Village DeltaNet Towers 

46 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

.

s
p
e
3
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

47 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
6
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

.

s
p
e
5
O
T
L
E
P
6
1
9

48 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  he  is  light  years  ahead  of  the 
rest  of  the  State.  That  is  the  main  point  I  want  to  make  to  the 
Committee.  We  have  not  been  able  to  do  this  all  over  Alaska.  We 
have  been  able  to  do  it  because  of  Gene  Peltola’s  initiative  in  his 
area. I urge that the rest of the members study this as far as their 
rural  areas  and  the  application,  particularly  the  psychiatric  appli-
cation,  is  going  to  be  very  interesting  for  veterans  throughout  the 
country. Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  the  witnesses  for  their 

testimony this morning. 

vens? 

If we may, we would like to question our witnesses. Senator Ste-

Senator STEVENS. I have no questions. 
I  must  say,  I  think  it  has  been  a  very  good  panel  and  I  support 
wholeheartedly the total recommendation that we find some way to 
expand  this  concept  so  that  we  are  covering  the  areas  that  are  in 
great  need,  particularly  our  veterans  services  in  rural  America. 
When we consider the fact that some of our veterans, as Gene has 
said,  are  literally  1,000  miles  from  the  nearest  real  veterans  serv-
ice,  it  is  going  to  be  very  difficult  to  keep  up  with  some  of  these 
people unless we do, in fact, adopt his recommendation that we use 
the Indian Health Service and other telecommunications services to 
keep track of these veterans. Under the law, the Veterans Adminis-
tration  is  now  required  to  keep  track  of  our  veterans  for  5  years 
after their separation. They can only do that through telecommuni-
cations. 

Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
First, I want to say how proud I am of Ms. Conroy for being here 
today. She is a terrific librarian, and I sincerely hope that not only 
do  we  continue  to  enhance  the  availability  of  the  Internet  through 
libraries,  that  we  never  lose  sight  of  that  unique  experience  of 
walking  into  a  library  and  seeing  those  grand  and  glorious  books 
everywhere.  And  the  ability  to  open  a  book  and  crack  that  cover 
and  be  able  to  turn  those  pages  is  something  that  was  an  incred-
ibly  important  part  of  my  childhood  and  I  hope  that  we  maintain 
that for children for many generations to come. 

Let  me  ask  you,  Ms.  Conroy.  Has  the  Library  Association—or 
maybe  some  of  the  other  witnesses  might  know.  Has  anyone 
tracked how much online higher education has gone up in the last 
5  to  10  years?  I  noticed  there  was  a  consistency  in  the  testimony 
about online higher education and particularly in these rural areas, 
particularly  because  of  the  costs  of  commuting  for  our  college  edu-
cation  and  the  impracticability  of  us  moving  campuses  to  many  of 
these locations. Do you know whether there has been any analysis 
of how much of this is going on and how much of it is, in fact, tak-
ing over in terms of classroom education? 

Ms.  CONROY.  Yes,  I  do,  at  least  for  the  state  of  Missouri.  I  men-
tioned  MOREnet  which  provides  Internet  connectivity  to  higher 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

49 

education  in  Missouri.  The  demands  of  higher  education  institu-
tions  for  bandwidth  has  grown  exponentially  in  that  sector,  and  I 
can provide you with those statistics when I get back home. 

I do know that local individuals are now able to go to school from 
their  rural  communities  where  before,  they  would  not  have  left 
their  communities.  And  they  are  doing  that  all  online.  So  I  could 
also provide you some statistics for those usages in the local public 
libraries. I am going to assume that this is true for the rest of the 
United States. I know it is true for Missouri. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  think  we  need  to  really  look  at  that  be-
cause  I  think  we  may  need  a  marketing  campaign  to  encourage 
more  young  people  to  use  online  education,  particularly  if  we  can 
get some follow-up studies as to how marketable those degrees are 
as compared to the traditional degree that occurs from someone sit-
ting in a classroom on a campus somewhere. 

How much money is the state of Missouri providing in Missouri, 
Ms.  Conroy,  in  this  whole  area  of  connectivity  in  terms  of  tele-
communication, online education, and telehealth? 

Ms.  CONROY.  What  I  can  answer  is  the  MOREnet  budget  which 
is  about  $22  million,  and  that  covers  all  those  sectors,  public,  K– 
12  education,  higher  ed,  libraries,  telehealth,  State  government 
services, and also some electronic data bases that the State library 
is able to purchase with that State money. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  Mr.  Peltola—is  that  how  you  say  your 

Senator STEVENS. Gene Peltola. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Gene Peltola? Thank you for being with us. 
Many of us have learned more about Alaska in the last few weeks. 
And I wanted to ask you. Missouri has a paltry $22 million that 
is going to this. What is the total in Alaska that is being set aside 
not  from  the  Federal  Government,  but  rather  from  Alaska  which 
we now all know has surpluses? What kind of money is being spent 
in Alaska by the State government? 

Mr. PELTOLA. I am not aware of that, ma’am. The infrastructure 
that  we  have  developed  out  here  in  the  Y-K  Delta  has  basically 
come from the private sector. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK.  And  some  help  from,  I  assume,  the 

Universal Service Fund? 

name? 

Mr.  PELTOLA.  The  Universal  Service  Fund  pays  the  majority  of 

the service costs for utilization of our DeltaNet. 

Senator MCCASKILL. OK, great. 
Mr. Ramsey, from where you sit, do you see the conflict between 
the  FCC  and  the  USDA  as  it  relates  to  the  universal  service  pro-
vider  and  the  funds  that  are  supposed  to  be  available  from  USDA 
for connectivity in rural areas? 

Mr.  RAMSEY.  Yes.  Senator  McCaskill,  I  think  it  is  a  great  ques-
tion.  I  would  answer  it  in  this  way.  I  really  concur  with  what  Mr. 
Cohen  was  saying  earlier  about  the  reform  that  is  needed  in  the 
Universal  Service  Fund,  how  it  is  being  used,  how  the  money  is 
being allocated. I think we need to do many more things that direct 
the money in a digital way and not looking at just sort of the dial- 
up  phone  system.  We  have  got  to  modernize  the  Universal  Service 
Fund to do more of these types of applications. It is really the only 
source that is available. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

50 

But I would also say one of the successes, of course, has been E- 
rate,  but  I  also  think  we  need  to  look  at  creating  a  way  to  get  to 
both  rural  individuals  and  more  low-income  individuals.  And  I 
think  one  of  the  innovative  ways  of  thinking  about  the  low-income 
population  is  looking  at  where  they  live,  and  I  think  we  have 
missed  something  in  not  looking  at  affordable  housing.  We  have 
launched  initiatives  around  saying  we  have  got  over  3,000  public 
housing authorities in the United States, and yet we are not doing 
enough  to  say  are  we  networking  those  buildings.  Are  we  making 
sure  broadband  is  there?  And  I  think  there  is  an  opportunity  to 
look  at  universal  service  and  also  look  at  the  E-rate  to  say  let  us 
go  for  the  poorest  of  the  poor  who  are  living  in  public  housing  in 
both  rural  and  urban  areas.  And  I  would  urge  that  that  be  some-
thing that we spend more time looking at. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  think  that  is  a  great  idea.  I  do  not  think 
people  realize  how  much  low-income  housing  there  is  in  rural 
America. I am certainly aware of that. 

Let  me  correct  the  record.  I  do  not  think  $22  million  is  a  paltry 
amount of money. It is compared to the Missouri budget of $20 bil-
lion.  So  $22  million  is  not  enough  out  of  a  budget  of  $20  billion  to 
go toward this from the State level. 

So thank you. 
Senator STEVENS. Will the Senator yield there, though? 
Senator MCCASKILL. Yes. 
Senator STEVENS. Maybe we should ask witnesses about the con-
tributions  to  this  fund.  You  know,  the  fund  really  started  on  as-
sessments  to  long  distance,  and  the  balance  is  still  coming  from 
long distance which is a declining income. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Right. 
Senator STEVENS. I wonder where do they suggest we should get 
the income for this fund if we are going to expand the demands on 
it. 

Mr.  COHEN.  Yes.  I  mean,  we  think  the  whole  Universal  Service 
Fund needs an overhaul, exactly the way you are describing it. We 
need  to  look  at  how  it  is  funded  and  then,  as  we  just  said,  how  it 
is  distributed.  And  we  would  say  there  needs  to  be  uniformity  in 
terms  of  how  it  is  collected  across  communications  services  rather 
than  just  essentially  a  tax  on  consumers  of  old  services,  as  you 
have  just  said.  I  mean,  we  should  relook  at  how  we  collect  it,  but 
particularly then how it is used. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  think  as  we  go  for-
ward—and  that  is  one  of  the  things  I  think  the  Florida  Senator 
and  I  are  talking  about.  How  do  we  find  some  way  to  sustain  this 
fund  if  the  assessment  against  long  distance  continues  to  decline? 
And I do think we have to do just what you have said, Mr. Cohen. 
I  think  we  have  to  find  some  way  to  say  that  telecommunications 
services per se—find some way to support universal service. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCaskill, are you finished? 
Senator MCCASKILL. I am. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

51 

Mr.  Ramsey,  let  me  start  with  you,  if  I  may.  There  was  an  edi-
torial  that  was  written  in  Arkansas  last  year  that  basically  makes 
the  comparison  between  the  rural  electrification  program  in  the 
1930s  to  deploying  broadband  today.  And  not  to  go  too  much  into 
this,  but  one  quote  is:  ‘‘According  to  one  historical  account,  al-
though  nearly  90  percent  of  urban  dwellers  had  electricity  by  the 
1930s, only 10 percent of rural dwellers did. Private utility compa-
nies who supplied electric power to most of the Nation’s consumers 
argued  that  it  was  too  expensive  to  string  electric  lines  to  isolated 
rural farmsteads.’’ Anyway, they say most farmers were too poor to 
be able to afford electricity. 

To me, that sounds like a familiar argument that we hear today 
when it comes to broadband deployment, and there is an inequality 
about how broadband is being deployed today. 

So  I  just  wanted  to  ask  you.  We  talked  a  little  bit  about  uni-
versal  service.  Do  you  think  that  that  is  the  best  way  we  can  get 
broadband deployed? Shall we do something like what the REA set 
up,  which  is  a  very  different  model?  But  what  do  you  think  we 
need to do in order to get broadband out to rural America? 

Mr.  RAMSEY.  I  think,  Senator,  it  is  a  great  analogy  that  you  are 
looking  at,  and  I  think  the  important  part  of  the  analogy  is  that 
there was a goal that was set, that the Federal Government played 
an important role and created a mechanism. 

It is not only the funding mechanism. Again, I go back to my ear-
lier  remarks.  It  is  an  issue  of  looking  at  this  from  a  standpoint  of 
judging  and  saying  is  it  affordable,  is  it  available,  and  if  it  is  not 
available,  how  do  you  we  make  sure  that  we  create  incentives  or 
the  right  kind  of  investments  around  availability.  And  then  third, 
it is the issue of the applications because in some cases, if we could 
create  the  right  kind  of  applications,  whether  it  is  telemedicine, 
whether  it  is  online  education  supporting  our  high  schools,  then 
you  would  get  more  private  involvement  along  with  government. 
There is a role for the private sector, a very important role for the 
private sector. 

And  I  think  if  we  are  working  together—you  know,  when  we 
started  One  Economy  8  years  ago  and  we  called  it  One  Economy, 
our goal has always been to say how do you we get the private sec-
tor, the NGO’s, and government working together on this issue. So 
in  that  analogy  that  you  give,  that  was  an  important  investment 
that  the  Federal  Government  said  had  to  occur,  and  I  think  that 
is very important. 

And  I  think  when  you  look  at  how  the  United  States  has  fallen 
behind, particularly on issues of speed, I do not want that issue to 
get  lost  either  because  I  wholeheartedly  endorse  what  Mr.  Cohen 
was  saying  earlier  about  speed.  And  I  think  we  have  got  to  relook 
at  all  of  that  because  we  are  falling  behind.  We  are  not  doing 
enough in applications and the supply and demand side. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Cohen, did you have any comments on that? 
Mr.  COHEN.  Yes.  I  think  it  is  three  things.  First  is  to  stimulate 

demand. A lot of good examples here about how you do that. 

Second, it is to do demonstrations, and I think there are good ex-
amples  for  granting  to  nonprofits,  again,  lots  of  the  groups  that 
spoke here today. They then demonstrate what is possible, whether 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

52 

it  is  telemedicine  or  education,  and  then  that  helps  stimulate  de-
mand. 

And  finally,  we  have  to  look  at  the  build-out  of  the  networks 
themselves in terms of our tax policy and what incentives we give, 
not only tax policy but in terms of regulation, that encourage high- 
speed  Internet  build-out  by  the  industry  that  is  going  to  build  it. 
I  mean,  it  has  to  come  from  somewhere,  and  we  have  to  continue 
to look at how we work with the industry, as Mr. Ramsey said ini-
tially,  to  stimulate  them  to  make  that  investment.  They  have 
choices  and  we  have  to  make  this  a  key  policy  so  that  when  they 
make a choice about cap ex, it goes to high-speed Internet. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Linkous,  I  appreciated  what  you  had  to  say 
about  telemedicine  because  especially  in  a  rural  state  like  Alaska 
or  Arkansas  or  many  of  the  other  states  represented  around  the 
table  today,  I  think  telemedicine  is  a  real  solution  for  some  of  our 
health  care  needs.  And  it  seems  to  me  if  you  do  not  have 
broadband  out  in  rural  America,  it  is  very  hard  to  provide  tele-
medicine services out in rural America. 

Did you have any more thoughts along those lines about what we 
need to do to make sure that rural America has access to telemedi-
cine? 

Mr. LINKOUS. Thank you, Senator. Yes. I think there was a great 
intent  when  the  1996  Telecommunications  Reform  Act  was  passed 
to  put  in  some  funds  to  support  rural  health  care.  The  utilization 
of  that  fund,  particularly  for  health  care,  has  been  extremely  dis-
appointing.  It  was  originally  envisioned  that  it  might  be  several 
hundred  million  dollars.  I  believe  somewhere  where  around  $20 
million a year is being sent in that area. So I think it is really im-
portant  for  this  Committee  to  revisit  the  Congressional  intent  and 
what  has  actually  been  done  by  the  Administration  in  imple-
menting that program. I think we have great opportunities that are 
being lost. 

And  second,  the  provision  of  health  care,  not  only  in  rural  areas 
but in urban areas, is very different than it was in 1996. As I had 
mentioned  in  my  testimony,  health  care  is  now  going  to  the  indi-
vidual.  The  original  intent  of  the  Health  Care  Reform  Act  was  to 
link  hospitals  with  major  medical  centers  in  rural  areas,  but  it  is 
now  actually  into  the  homes.  It  is  in  the  individuals.  So  to  really 
have  people  get  access  to  health  care  in  rural  areas  like  they  do 
in urban, you have got to make sure we have high-speed broadband 
to the individual as well. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr.  Peltola,  let  me  ask  you.  You  mentioned  in  your  testimony  a 
few  moments  ago—and  I  may  have  misunderstood  what  you  said, 
but  I  think  what  you  were  talking  about  is  the  professional  licen-
sure of doctors, et cetera that allows them to practice telemedicine. 
And  from  that,  I  assume  that  what  you  mean  is  that  in  some  cir-
cumstances, you may actually want to cross State lines in order to 
get  the  medical  help  people  need  using  telemedicine.  Is  that  what 
you were talking about? 

Mr. PELTOLA. Yes, I was. 
Senator  PRYOR.  But  usually  the  licensure—that  is  a  state  issue. 
Are  the  states  not  equipped  to  handle  that?  So,  for  example,  just 
hypothetically  if  Alaska  wanted  to  do  some  sort  of  consortium  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

53 

some  sort  of  agreement  with,  say,  the  state  of  Washington  or  Or-
egon  or  California  or  something  along  those  lines,  I  would  think 
that  the  states  could  work  that  out  and  you  probably  do  not  need 
Federal assistance to do that. Am I wrong on that? 

Mr. PELTOLA. You are correct on that, yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  do  want  to  thank  you  for  Alaska’s  exam-
ple  and  what  you  are  doing  there  in  your  area  because  I  think 
there  are  a  lot  of  lessons  there  for  the  rest  of  us  in  how  this  can 
work and how important this can be. 

So, Mr. Chairman, thank you for doing this hearing today. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Go ahead, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Linkous, did you want to say something? 
Mr. LINKOUS. Yes, if I could just add a comment. You had talked 
about  medical  licensure.  In  the  early  days  of  telemedicine,  it  was 
an  issue.  It  is  a  state  issue  and  most  medical  networks  are  within 
the  state.  But  it  is  now  a  national  issue.  And  let  me  give  you  one 
example. 

In the field of pathology, there are 60 subspecialties in pathology. 
I  know  that  Alaska  does  not  have  60  subspecialists  in  pathology. 
We  need  to  have  a  national  information  network  for  health  care 
just  like  we  do  for  other  things,  and  we  need  to  have  the  ability 
for  a  physician  who  is  a  subspecialist  in  California  to  be  able  to 
provide those services to the citizens of Alaska. For people who are 
working  in  the  Angels  Network  in  Arkansas,  they  can  provide 
those  services  to  the  people  in  Louisiana.  So  we  do  need  a  mecha-
nism  through  which  we  can  provide  these  medical  services  across 
state  boundaries.  We  are  not  saying  usurp  the  State  authority, 
which  is  very  important,  but  the  Federal  Government  to  step  in 
and  encourage  some  kind  of  a  sharing  relationship  among  the 
states. 

Senator  PRYOR.  But  can  the  states  not  do  that  by  some  sort  of 

compact or some sort of agreement between the states? 

Mr.  LINKOUS.  With  very  strong  Federal  encouragement,  that 

could happen. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman. 
Thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing,  and  thank  you  to  our  wit-
nesses. 

I  have  really  two  interests  in  this.  The  first  is  as  a  mother  of  a 
tech-savvy 13-year-old, I see the future all too closely. Her hardest 
moment  in  the  last  few  years  was  when  I  was  asked  on  a  college 
TV show what LOL meant, and I was stumped that it is laugh out 
loud.  And  I  came  home  and  she  said  that  was  the  most  embar-
rassing moment of the campaign. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  The  second  interest  I  have  is,  of  course, 
something  Mr.  Cohen  well  knows,  the  jobs  in  rural  America,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

54 

I just see that some of these jobs that are going to places like India 
and  Pakistan  could  be  going  to  Worthington,  Minnesota  or  Thief 
River Falls. 

So I guess I would start with you, Mr. Cohen, and I am very in-
terested  in  the  speed  issues.  From  what  I  have  heard,  places  like 
Japan  or  Korea  have  speeds  at  rates  that  are  sometimes  20  times 
as fast, and at one-half the price as what we get here. 

And also we have the issue that even our neighbor to the north, 
Canada,  neighbor  to  Minnesota  to  the  north,  seems  to  have  done 
smart  things.  Could  you  talk  a  little  bit  about  what  Canada  has 
done and if we can learn any lessons? 

Mr.  COHEN.  Sure.  I  think,  first  of  all,  the  bill  that  this  Com-
mittee is supporting for the most part, S. 1492—I mean, we do not 
even map out in our country where we stand on broadband. In our 
Speed Matters campaign, there is a page on every State, including 
the rural States. Here you see huge white spaces where there is no 
broadband at all. Step one is we need to know where we stand. In 
Canada,  they  have  done  that  kind  of  mapping.  The  equivalent 
there  of  the  FCC  is  ahead  of  us  in  that  regard.  So  I  think  that  is 
one. 

Two,  we  need  to  set  goals  like  the  kind  of  goals  Senator  Rocke-
feller has talked about in his resolution, very clear goals. And then 
we  must  figure  out,  well,  if  our  goals  are,  for  example,  we  would 
support  10  megabits  a  second  by  2010,  what  will  it  take  to  close 
the  gap  between  where  we  are  now.  Once  we  map  out  where  we 
are, and how we get there and then how we fund it. 

So I think the key difference, you know, whether it is Canada or 
Japan,  is  really  to  look  at  the  demand  side  and  the  supply  side, 
meaning  the  network  providers,  and  how  government  can  play  the 
role  of  bringing  them  together,  bringing  demand  together  with  the 
network  providers  and  obviously  closing  the  rural  and  urban  di-
vide.  Right  here  in  Washington,  D.C.,  we  do  not  have  high-speed 
Internet  for  most  of  the  city.  You  do  not  have  to  go  a  mile  from 
here  and  you  are  going  to  fall  off  the  chart  that  is  here,  let  alone 
go to rural Minnesota or Alaska. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Cohen,  how  about  public-private  part-
nerships? We have had a few towns in Minnesota try to do this on 
their own with mixed results, and they realize the best way is pub-
lic-private partnerships. Could you talk a little bit about that? 

Mr. COHEN. Yes, sure. I mean, the first thing is the level of cap-
ital  expenditure.  To  do  what  is  done  in  Japan,  that  is  fiber  to  the 
premise,  in  our  country  in  our  dollar  terms,  we  are  talking  about 
at  least,  just  to  pass  each  house,  $1,000  a  premise.  And  so  a  lot 
of the public-private partnerships that we talk about here use this 
very low definition of broadband, and so we get less than 1 megabit 
a  second  through  a  WiFi  kind  of  technology—better  than  nothing, 
for  sure—as  an  example  that  we  talk  about  in  many  small  towns 
in rural America. But it is not going to provide the kind of services, 
whether it is telemedicine, whether it is two-way video that we are 
talking about on a global basis. 

And  so  I  think  when  we  talk  here  about  public-private  partner-
ships, we are also talking about getting the network providers and 
saying  to  them,  the  market  is  not  working,  and  creating  the  com-
bination  of—I  guess  incentives  is  a  nicer  word,  but  also  regulation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

55 

that  pushes  up  what  broadband  means.  We  cannot  have  people 
paying  for  broadband,  as  you  said,  at  very  high  rates  and  getting 
very low speeds. People do not even know what the speeds are. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Peltola,  I  was  interested  in  what  you 

have done in Alaska. Can you hear me up there, Mr. Peltola? 

Mr. PELTOLA. Yes, ma’am. I can hear you real well. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Excellent. 
You decided to increase the bandwidth to an impressive amount. 

How were you able to accomplish the increase? 

Mr.  PELTOLA.  We  were  able  to  accomplish  the  increase  by  work-

ing with our private sector provider. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So  that  was  a  public-private  partnership 
with  your  tribes?  Was  it  a  partnership  with  the  tribes  and  the 
groups’ clinics? 

Mr.  PELTOLA.  It  is  far  from  the  100  megabits  per  second  that 

some other countries have in place right now. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  One  last  question  here  I  wanted  to  ask  of 
you,  Mr.  Ramsey,  and  that  is  about  One  Economy’s  public  interest 
channel.  Of  course,  Minnesota  is  the  home  of  Lake  Wobegon  and 
a  lot  of  work  in  the  public  radio  and  public  TV.  Could  you  talk  a 
little  bit  more  about  the  online  channel,  which  is  clearly  the  next 
step that should be taken with public TV and public radio? 

Mr. RAMSEY. Thank you, Senator. 
The  roots  of  this  public  Internet  channel  started  about  7  years 
ago  when  we  launched  the  website  called  the  Beehive,  which  was 
dedicated  to  basically  bringing  information  around  health,  work-
force development, education, and finance, helping people who had 
basic  literacy  issues  be  able  to  go  online,  be  able  to  find  informa-
tion, and make it easy for them. 

Over  time  as  we  have  developed  more  applications,  we  decided 
that  we  needed  to  cover  more  issues  like  emergency  preparedness, 
more  online  education,  community  news,  civic  engagement.  So  on 
December  11  of  this  year,  we  will  launch  this  network  made  up  of 
ourselves  and  many  other  partners  called  the  Public  Internet 
Channel. And our goal is really to provide information, engage peo-
ple,  and  make  it  easy  to  take  action.  We  do  not  want  it  to  just  be 
static.  Here  is  information.  But  we  want  you  to  be  able  to  go  to  a 
toolbox online and be able to click a button and be able to get that 
children’s  health  insurance  very  easily,  know  what  your  eligibility 
is. We say we want people to be online not in line. 

And so we are excited by that. We have even recruited people out 
of  Hollywood  to  help  us  to  make  the  content  engaging.  Barbara 
Townsend, who is a director/producer, is producing a program dedi-
cated  to  single  moms  that  will  make  it  compelling  and  help  them 
to  be  able  to  access  information.  So  that  network  will  start,  Sen-
ator, late this year and then we will, in future years, go from there. 
We  are  collaborating  with  entities  like  PBS  and  other  entities  to 
bring  that  compelling  content.  So  we  do  not  produce  it  all.  We  are 
aggregating it and producing that content. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Mr. RAMSEY. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Thune? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

56 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding the hear-
ing  on  this  very  important  subject  and  thanks  to  our  panelists  for 
sharing  your  thoughts  about  what  we  can  be  doing,  steps  we  can 
be  taking  to  increase  the  availability  of  broadband  and  penetrate 
areas  of  the  country  that  have  not  so  far  had  access  to  high-speed 
Internet. 

I just want to make a couple of quick observations and then ask 
really  one  question,  which  is  a  follow  up  to  something  that  has  al-
ready been asked. 

But I am really concerned about the deficiencies that we have in 
rural  areas.  We  have  only  got  31  percent  of  rural  Americans  who 
have  home  broadband  connections  compared  with  49  percent  of 
suburban  residents,  and  52  percent  of  urban  Americans.  And  I 
really  think  this  is  a  key  when  it  comes  to  job  creation  and  eco-
nomic development in states like mine of South Dakota. 

I  have  talked  to  people  who  have  to  our  state  to  escape  some  of 
the hassles of living in the big city, like the wide open space, would 
like  to  be  able  to  continue  to  work  out  of  their  homes  to  telecom-
mute,  but  this  is  a  real  impediment  in  many  parts  of  South  Da-
kota. 

I  was  talking  to  somebody  who  moved  to  our  state  from  Texas 
just  recently  and  located  in  the  area  of  South  Dakota  that  is  very 
scenic  and  pretty  but  does  not  have  high-speed  Internet  access. 
And  it  is  a  real  problem  if  you  are  trying  to  continue  to  conduct 
business and commerce. 

So  I  guess  that  is  an  observation,  and  I  think  it  is  something 
that  the  statistics  that  were  up  previously  point  to  the  need  for 
steps on our part to correct. 

I  do  want  to  home  in  on  one  point,  though,  that  was  made,  and 
that  is  this  whole  issue  of  telehealth.  You  know,  we  fight  every 
year  for  a  few  million  dollars  in  appropriations  for  the  Office  for 
the Advancement of Telehealth and to try and get some demonstra-
tion programs funded actually that would yield results to the Gov-
ernment  because  the  grants  only  go  out  to  those  entities  that  are 
then  turning  around  and  using  those  dollars  to  demonstrate  that 
they  are  gaining  efficiencies  and  actually  making  health  care  less 
expensive  to  the  taxpayers  through  the  Medicare  program.  But  so 
far, we have not done a very good job. 

And  I  know  that  question  was  already  asked.  But  I  guess  I  am 
just curious maybe from any of you a comment about what are the 
impediments  in  your  mind  to  further  expansion  of  telehealth  as  a 
way  of  providing  health  care  to  people  in  rural  areas  of  this  coun-
try and what steps might we take that would remove some of those 
barriers. 

Mr.  LINKOUS.  If  I  could  respond  to  that.  First  of  all,  Senator, 
thank  you.  You  have  been  a  tremendous  champion  for  telehealth 
in the Senate, and I want to thank you for that publicly. 

But  our  goal  is  to  take  telehealth,  telemedicine,  whatever  you 
want to call it out of just the demonstration stage of having grants, 
which  have  been  very,  very  important,  but  moving  into  the  main-
stream  of  providing  medical  care.  To  do  that,  it  has  to  be,  number 
one, fully reimbursed by Medicare. That is a major barrier that we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

57 

still have in the Federal Government today. Telemedicine is consid-
ered  only  a  program  for  certain  areas,  for  certain  types  of  people, 
for  certain  types  of  services,  and  it  is  really  a  real  limiting  factor 
for the folks in your State as around the rest of the country. 

So  the  one  recommendation,  if  I  had  to  make  one  single  rec-
ommendation, is to open up Medicare reimbursement for telemedi-
cine  no  matter  who  you  are,  no  matter  where  you  are,  no  matter 
what services you receive. It should be just the same. 

Senator  THUNE.  Does  anybody  else  have  any  thoughts  on  that 

subject? Yes? 

Mr. COHEN. Yes. I would just say that, obviously, the speed issue 
matters  in  terms  of  telehealth,  aside  from  the  mapping  in  general 
for  this  country,  which  we  do  not  even  do.  I  think  we  could  focus 
on  bringing  genuine  high-speed  Internet  to  clinics  and  health  care 
facilities  in  rural  America.  I  mean,  if  you  do  not  have  speed  of  at 
least  5  or  6  megabits  a  second,  telehealth  is  going  to  be  at  a  very 
low  level.  It  has  got  to  be  two-way  speed  as  well,  not  just 
downloading. 

Mr.  RAMSEY.  And  Senator,  I  would  just  like  to  add  one  other 
piece  because,  obviously,  I  concur  with  what  was  said.  I  think  one 
of the things that we are seeing—and it was mentioned earlier that 
so much more is happening with disease management in the home. 
When  we  think  of  telemedicine,  it  is  not  only  the  important  work 
that  is  done  in  clinics  and  facilities,  but  it  is  how  do  we  facilitate 
and  create  a  comfort  level  of  people  having  these  applications  in 
the  home.  You  look  at  diabetes.  You  look  at  some  of  these  chronic 
illnesses.  So  much  of  the  success  of  that  patient  is  determined  by 
what  they  do  to  manage  their  own  disease,  and  much  can  be  done 
if you have the technology in the home. 

Dr.  MAYOR.  And  just  from  an  AARP  perspective,  we  know  that 
people  want  to  age  in  their  homes,  and  we  recently  did  a  survey. 
96  percent,  I  think  is  the  number  in  my  head,  of  the  respondents 
said  that  they  would  welcome  the  opportunity  to  have  that  tele-
medicine access in their homes. So it just reinforces the importance 
of having the broadband in the first place. 

Senator THUNE. As Mr. Linkous mentioned, we have been trying, 
through  these  demonstration  projects,  to  use  remote  monitoring 
technologies  so  that  people  can  stay  in  their  homes,  and  even  that 
seems  to  be  a  battle  every  year  to  get  recognized  as  an  important 
thing to be funded and something that in the long run, like I said, 
I think has the possibility of actually saving tax dollars by making 
these  programs  more  efficient  and  allowing  people  to  stay  in  a 
home  setting  as  opposed  to  having  to  go  into  an  area  where  it 
would probably be much more expensive to the taxpayer. 

So I just think that there we have really sort of missed the boat 
on  that,  and  there  is  so  much  more  than  we  can  and  should  be 
doing. And I think ultimately it does come back to reimbursement. 
And we know that. And I know that in the initial stages that prob-
ably  tends  to  be—people  look  at  it  and  say,  well  it  is  going  to  be 
expensive.  But  I  think  in  the  long  run,  it  is  going  to  save  money. 
So  I  appreciate  your  testimony.  I  have  some  other  questions  I 
would  like  to  ask,  but  I  have  got  some  places  I  need  to  get,  Mr. 
Chairman. But I thank you all very much for your input. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

58 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  discussion  is  an  important  one  today,  and 
yet we have just two Senators here. I can see in my lifetime a hear-
ing of this nature held with no one here. I may be officiating in my 
office  and  all  the  other  Senators  could  be  in  their  offices  and  all 
the  witnesses  in  their  homes  or  their  offices  just  like  the  witness 
from Alaska. 

However, there are two things that are in our way. One is a na-
tional broadband policy. We have not made it a policy to make this 
part of our communications system an important part. I look upon 
this  development  as  just  as  important  as  the  printing  press,  and 
it  is  a  shame  that  we  do  not  have  this  available  to  Americans. 
When  you  consider  that  only  25  percent  of  the  low-income  Ameri-
cans  have  access  to  broadband  and  just  slightly  over  half  of  all 
Americans have access to broadband, something is wrong. 

So I would hope that with your organizations you can provide us 
with  information  as  to  what  the  costs  would  be  because  at  this 
stage, we have no idea what the costs will be. 

We  know  what  the  potential  is.  I  was  at  a  viewing  of  surgery 
conducted  in  Bangkok  and  supervised  in  Tripler  in  Hawaii.  And  it 
was  fascinating  to  have  a  doctor  or  surgeon  in  Hawaii  tell  the 
Army surgeon in Bangkok, go to the left or go to the right or what 
have you, and successful. 

But  it  is  going  to  cost  money  and  we  have  no  idea  how  much  it 
costs.  And  if  there  is  no  American  government  policy  supporting 
this, then it becomes a political issue, an earmark. Well, I am will-
ing  to  put  in  an  earmark,  but  I  would  like  to  know  how  much  we 
need and how can we justify that. 

When  you  consider  that  most  of  our  homes  in  the  United  States 

have no computers, then something is wrong. 

So  you  would  be  doing  us  a  great  favor  and  yourselves  and  the 

people of the United States, if you would give us the facts. 

We have, for example, something that is going to happen in a few 
months,  February  17,  2009.  We  will  change  from  analog  to  high 
definition  digital  television.  21  million  Americans  rely  upon  over- 
the-air  television  with  rabbit  ears.  They  are  going  to  be  several 
thousand  Americans  waking  up  on  the  morning  of  February  17 
next year and find that the TV does not work. 

I  would  hope  that  we  can  do  better  than  that.  After  all,  we  are 
the  pioneers  that  discovered  the  computer,  that  came  up  with 
broadband,  and  yet  we  find  ourselves  doing  a  little  better  than 
Third World countries. I think we should do better than that. 

So  you  would  be  doing  us  and  the  country  a  great  favor  if  you 
could  feed  us—and  I  can  assure  you  we  are  hungry  for  data.  We 
are  hungry  for  facts.  If  you  have  any  right  now  as  to  what  do  you 
think  it  will  cost  and  what  sort  of  plan  we  should  have—these 
things are not in place yet—that is what I want to know. Anything 
you can provide us at this moment? Mr. Cohen? 

Mr. COHEN. Yes. We can bring in better data than I can give you. 
But again, it is a question of the cost to pass the house and then 
creating  the  demand  so  people  take  it  up.  So  you  actually  do  not 
need huge public expenditures if we can stimulate demand and ag-
gregate demand. So, again, to provide essentially what I guess now 
would be about 15 megabits per second, which still would leave us 
behind Korea and Canada—that is probably on the average—again, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

59 

it  depends  on  where  the  house  is,  but  on  the  average  in  the  U.S., 
it would cost $300 a house to pass the house with that level of serv-
ice. 100 megabit service is three times that because you have to ac-
tually  bring  fiber  to  the  premise  itself,  whereas  on  the  sort  of  15 
megabits,  you  can  bring  it  to  the  neighborhood  within  five-eighths 
of a mile. Now, again in rural areas, whether it is Hawaii or Alas-
ka, that is more of a challenge. 

Fourth generation wireless, which is just being built, can provide 
high-speed Internet as well, probably at least 5 or 6 megabits a sec-
ond,  probably  at  a  lower  price.  But  that  is  just  being  built.  So  we 
are not sure sort of how that works. And that would be with a cell 
site two or three miles potentially from a house. So it could be very 
valuable. 

Again,  Japan—my  colleague  here,  Mr.  Morishima,  could  tell  you 

that in Japan the fourth generation wireless is already built. 

So  I  think  a  lot  of  the  questions  you  raise  are  pretty  deep  ques-
tions  about,  A,  we  have  no  mapping;  B,  we  have  no  goals;  C,  we 
do  not  have  the  right  incentives  to  get  ourselves  the  cutting  edge 
technology  at  the  same  speed  that  countries  like  Korea  and  Japan 
do  because  the  national  broadband  policy  is  there,  as  well  as  in 
countries in Europe. 

And we will bring you more information. 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Ramsey? Anyone else who would like to con-

tribute something today? 

Mr. LINKOUS. Senator, although we do not have specific informa-
tion  on  some  of  the  costs  of  deployment,  I  think  there  are  increas-
ing  numbers  of  studies  and  research  that  have  shown  some  of  the 
benefits  in  financial  terms  to  the  Federal  Government  of  deploy-
ment of broadband applications, particularly in health care, and we 
will be glad to supply that information to the Committee. 

Mr.  RAMSEY.  And  Senator,  we  would  do  the  same  on  the  other 
applications,  particularly  around  education  and  workforce  develop-
ment, the demand side applications that are important to go along 
with the other infrastructure applications. 

The CHAIRMAN. All of you have used the word ‘‘demand.’’ How do 

we develop this demand? 

Mr. RAMSEY. I think, Senator, Mr. Chairman, the issue is to look 
at a variety of subject matter areas in terms of applications. So we 
spent  a  lot  of  time  talking  about  a  very  important  one  in  terms  of 
health, whether it is disease management, telemedicine. That is an 
application  sort  of  on  the  demand  side.  But  so  is  education.  So  is 
workforce development, the kind of online content that needs to be 
available at an assessable literacy level and in multiple languages. 
And  so  when  we  talk  about  demand,  it  is  when  a  person  sees  that 
application  and  says,  boy,  I  want  to  go  and  spend  some  money  to 
have  broadband  in  my  home  because  I  want  that  application  my-
self. And so when we talk about demand, that is what we are talk-
ing about. 

That  is  why  we  have  been  working  on  creating  this  channel  on-
line  to  bring  together  public  purpose  type  information  in  these 
areas,  and  that  is  the  kind  of  support  that  we  are  looking  for  and 
it is on the demand side. 

Dr.  MAYOR.  I  would  just  add  to  that  that  I  think  another  thing 
that  would  help  on  the  demand  side  is  the  easier  systems  are  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

60 

use,  the  more  intuitive  they  are.  I  think  the  world  divides  these 
days  into  two  categories:  people  who  think  if  they  hit  the  wrong 
button on the computer, it will explode; and people who think that 
you just have to keep hitting until something good happens. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  MAYOR.  Those  strategies  are  fine,  but  we  need  to  be  sort  of 
veering more to making it as easy as humanly possible, as intuitive 
as  humanly  possible,  to  take  away  that  sort  of  technology  phobia 
that at least some people still have. It is not a problem for the very 
young, but for the rest of us. 

Mr.  LINKOUS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  the  concept  of  needing  to 
create demand is a somewhat fleeting issue because I think we are 
going  to  have  tremendous  demand  very  shortly.  In  the  field  of 
health  care  alone,  we  were  worried  in  telemedicine  that  people 
would  not  accept  it,  but  in  fact,  consumers  not  only  are  accepting 
it in every case that I am aware of—in every study that I have ever 
seen  looking  at  demand,  they  have  not  only  accepted  it,  but  they 
want  more.  I  think  if  we  see  the  health  care  applications  that  are 
being  built  to  the  wireless  devices  into  the  home,  into  the  new 
games  that  people  are  using  throughout  the  country,  that  is  only 
going  to  expand.  So  I  think  if  we  have  broadband  available,  there 
is  no  doubt  in  my  mind  that  the  applications  and  the  interest  of 
Americans are going to just explode. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of  you,  especially  our 
friend  from  Alaska  in  Bethel,  Alaska,  Mr.  Peltola.  You  have  just 
demonstrated that it works. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  I  think  to  further  demonstrate  this  one  of 
these  hearings—I  think  I  will  convene  one  without  witnesses 
present  here  or  Senators  present  in  the  room  to  demonstrate  that 
it can work. 

I thank all of you, and if you can provide with us additional data, 

information, I would appreciate that very much. 

With that, adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:11 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES TOWNSEND, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

ATLANTIC WIRELESS L.P. 

Mr. Chairman, I am Charles Townsend, and I am President and CEO of Atlantic 
Wireless Limited Partners. Atlantic Wireless has purchased over $100 million of Ad-
vanced  Wireless  Spectrum  (AWS)  licenses  and  is  the  9th  largest  owner  of  AWS  li-
censes  in  the  U.S.  From  2002–2008,  I  was  the  President  and  CEO  of  Aloha  Part-
ners.  Aloha  Partners  was  the  largest  owner  of  700  MHz  spectrum  in  the  United 
States until the spring of 2008 when it sold all its licenses to AT&T. Aloha covered 
over  200  million  people  with  12  MHz  of  spectrum  on  former  UHF  channels  54  and 
59.  I  am  submitting  this  written  testimony  to  further  the  discussion  on  the  impor-
tance  of  broadband  to  rural  communities  across  America  and  the  contribution  that 
auctioning ‘‘white space’’ can make to ensuring that rural areas have access to high- 
speed connections. 
United States Lagging 

The  public’s  airwaves  are  a  vital  national  resource,  and  their  use  should  always 
be  geared  toward  improving  the  broad  public  interest.  Sen.  Inouye  has  said  that 
‘‘Broadband  communications  have  become  the  great  economic  engine  of  our  time’’ 
and  I  do  not  believe  that  anyone  would  disagree  with  him.  The  U.S.  faces  difficult 
challenges  because  the  rest  of  the  world  has  embraced  broadband  as  a  crucial  part 
of  their  economic  future.  Various  well-known  studies  have  shown  that  the  United 
States  trails  Japan,  South  Korea,  Canada,  France,  Finland,  and  a  host  of  other 
countries  in  Internet  connectivity.  One  of  the  main  reasons  that  the  U.S.  is  not  at 
the top of this list is its abundance of rural areas. It is estimated that between 15– 
20  percent  of  U.S.  households  cannot  receive  broadband  service.  The  majority  of 
these households are located in rural areas where it is too expensive to provide tra-
ditional broadband service. 

A recent study by the Communications Workers of America concludes that ‘‘all too 
many  Americans  encounter  a  significant  digital  divide.  Families  in  rural  areas  are 
much  less  likely  to  subscribe  to  broadband.  According  to  surveys,  while  57  percent 
of urban households subscribe to broadband, only 38 percent of rural households do. 
The  questions  is  then,  how  do  we  maximize  broadband  access  and  specifically  in 
rural  areas.  We  need  high-speed  Internet  for  our  homes,  schools,  hospitals,  and 
workplaces.  Speed  defines  what  is  possible  on  the  Internet.  It  determines  whether 
we will have the infrastructure required to create the jobs of the future, develop our 
economy,  and  support  innovations  in  telemedicine,  education,  public  safety,  and 
public  services  to  improve  our  lives  and  communities.  High-speed  Internet  is  even 
more crucial to underserved rural areas because it is the best and most realistic so-
lution  to  the  rural/urban  technology  divide.  High-speed  Internet  offers  the  chance 
to revitalize rural economies faced with the ever increasing shift to an urban, tech-
nology-based  economy.  Wireless  broadband  offers  a  solution  to  the  challenge  facing 
us. Wireless broadband has the potential to cover large geographic areas at low cost. 
‘‘White Space’’ Auction Offers Solution 

The  auctioning  of  ‘‘white  space’’  would  foster  the  development  of  wireless 
broadband  in  rural  areas  because  over  200  MHz  of  spectrum  is  available  in  those 
areas. To put this amount of spectrum in perspective, it is over 3 times the amount 
of  spectrum  as  was  auctioned  in  the  recent  700  MHz  auction.  In  addition,  the  li-
censed  spectrum  permits  maximum  power,  and  significantly  reduces  interference 
issues. The amount of spectrum and the power available make the ‘‘white space’’ ex-
tremely valuable in rural areas, as it would allow a licensed owner to provide serv-
ice over a large geographic area at a low cost. Further, an auction of licensed spec-
trum  could  provide  the  collateral  needed  to  finance  wireless  broadband  build-outs 
in  rural  markets.  Unlicensed  spectrum  will  not.  An  additional  benefit  is  the  poten-
tial  windfall  for  the  Federal  Government.  A  study  done  by  the  Brattle  group  states 
that  that  the  government  could  receive  $12–24  billion  by  auctioning  ‘‘white  space.’’ 

(61) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

62 

Certainly, given the current economic climate and the position the government finds 
itself in, any significant source of additional Federal revenue must be pursued. 

Currently, very few wireless broadband networks operate in rural America today. 
The  type  and  amount  of  spectrum  needed  for  these  wireless  networks  has  not  pre-
viously been available to rural wireless carriers. Outside of a licensed ‘‘white space’’ 
auction rural areas are unlikely to get broadband service because it is too expensive 
to build fixed networks. 

Engineers have estimated that a licensed signal can travel up to 30 miles in rural 
areas,  while  an  unlicensed  signal  can  travel  only  up  to  4  miles.  (This  calculation 
is  based  on  a  typical  power  of  1kW  for  the  licensed  spectrum  compared  to  1  W  for 
the  unlicensed  spectrum.)  This  difference  results  in  more  than  a  50-to-1  coverage 
advantage for the licensed spectrum. In other words, there would need to be roughly 
50  unlicensed  cell  sites  for  every  licensed  cell  site.  The  only  way  to  succeed  in  pro-
viding  broadband  to  rural  areas  is  on  a  licensed  basis  so  that  power  levels  can  be 
maximized and interference can be reduced. 

The  National  Telecommunications  Cooperative  Association  (NTCA)  recently  con-
ducted  a  survey  of  its  membership  about  wireless  broadband  issues  in  rural  areas. 
NTCA  represents  over  580  small  and  rural  telephone  companies  throughout  the 
U.S. Seventy-three percent of NTCA’s members indicated that they would prefer ac-
cess to additional licensed spectrum over additional unlicensed spectrum. 
Unlicensed Spectrum Wasteful 

On  the  other  side,  opponents  of  licensing  ‘‘white  space’’  promote  in-home  net-
working and improved WiFi as likely uses of the spectrum, but using the spectrum 
for low-power, short-range services like these fails to take full advantage the ‘‘white 
space.’’  The  widely  cited  Brattle  group  reply  comments  before  the  FCC  state  that 
the  ‘‘white  space’’  is  ‘‘overqualified’’  for  such  low-power,  short-range  services.  Using 
‘‘white  space’’  for  this  purpose  would  ‘‘amount  to  using  land  in  downtown  Tokyo  to 
grow rice.’’ 

Some spectrum utilization studies, including the NSF Spectrum Occupancy Meas-
urements  Project  Summary,  suggest  that  there  are  many  licensed  frequency  bands 
that  are  underutilized.  However,  this  initial  conclusion  is  deceptive.  Most  of  these 
are  frequencies  in  the  1240–1710  MHz  bands.  Much  of  the  spectrum  in  the  1240– 
1710 MHz bands is licensed to non-commercial operations. If you compare the unli-
censed PCS band (2390–2500 MHz) to the licensed PCS band (1850–1990 MHz), the 
studies  consistently  come  to  the  opposite  conclusion.  Licensed  PCS  frequencies  are 
utilized  significantly  more  than  the  unlicensed  frequencies.  In  2004  and  2005  the 
National  Science  Foundation  studied  spectrum  utilization  in  seven  different  loca-
tions  throughout  the  United  States.  In  six  of  those  seven  locations,  licensed  PCS 
spectrum is utilized significantly more than unlicensed PCS spectrum. 
Unlicensed Spectrum Finds Few Customers 

A  significant  number  of  experiments  with  unlicensed  WiFi  in  major  Metropolitan 
areas have not worked. In every instance, including in San Francisco, Philadelphia, 
and  New  Orleans,  these  experiments  have  failed.  A  lack  of  funding  was  not  the 
problem:  EarthLink  spent  more  than  $50  million  building  unlicensed  WiFi  oper-
ations  in  these  cities.  These  experiments  failed  due  to  lack  of  demand.  EarthLink 
expected over 100,000 customers in Philadelphia in the first year. In spite of exten-
sive marketing, EarthLink attracted only 5,942 subscribers. 

The  reason  for  these  consistent  failures  was  simple  . . .  no  customers.  Even  in 
Google’s  own  backyard,  no  one  has  attracted  enough  customers  to  make  unlicensed 
WiFi  viable.  Since  the  unlicensed  system  has  failed  in  these  urban  centers,  claims 
that  unlicensed  usage  of  ‘‘white  space’’  will  lead  to  greater  rural  broadband  access 
must be viewed with great skepticism. 

In conclusion, it is imperative that we bring broadband to rural America, and the 

only practical way to do that is through licensure of ‘‘white space.’’ 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE AMERICAN HOMEOWNERS GRASSROOTS ALLIANCE 
The  American  Homeowners  Grassroots  Alliance  (AHGA)  commends  the  Senate 
Commerce  Committee  for  holding  this  hearing  on  Why  Broadband  Matters.  AHGA 
is an independent national consumer advocacy organization which focuses on policy 
issues  that  have  a  significant  economic  impact  on  the  nation’s  75  million  home-
owners. 

Broadband  is  having  a  dramatic  and  positive  impact  on  the  Nation’s  75  million 
homeowners  as  well  as  other  consumers.  It  is  silently  helping  to  address  some  of 
the most serious immediate challenges facing the U.S. For example, the recent drop 
in  gasoline  prices  has  been  attributed  in  large  part  to  reduced  gasoline  demand  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

63 

consumers  made  conscious  efforts  to  drive  less.  While  some  of  that  reduction  is  the 
result  of  consumer  decisions  to  forgo  vacations,  much  of  it  is  undoubtedly  a  result 
of the increased use of Internet commerce and teleworking. Broadband is essential, 
in many cases, for both. During this crisis more consumers have been buying prod-
ucts  and  services  online  rather  than  driving  to  the  mall,  and  more  employers  are 
letting their workers telecommute on a temporary basis to help them cope with the 
high  prices  of  gasoline.  By  providing  an  increasingly  viable  option  to  hydrocarbon 
energy  consumption  in  many  endeavors,  broadband  has  revealed  its  ability  to  help 
the environment and stabilize energy costs that will be enhanced as broadband pen-
etration increases. 

The  impact  of  broadband  will  continue  to  grow  as  the  variety  and  sophistication 
of broadband applications expands, and as the number of homes with broadband ac-
cess,  now  over  50  percent,  continues  to  increase.  The  scope  of  broadband’s  impact 
on society is already breathtaking: 

For  families.  Broadband  is  changing  the  way  families  learn,  communicate,  play 
and  prepare  for  their  future.  Critically  important  information  about  health  care, 
scholarships, colleges, jobs, and community life such as e-government or registering 
to vote is increasingly on the Internet, and sometimes only on the Internet. 

For  consumers.  Broadband  has  transformed  commerce.  Just  about  every  product 
or  service  can  be  purchased  on  the  Internet,  and  consumers  can  find  products  and 
services they would never have found in an offline world. E-commerce growth rates 
continue  to  outstrip  offline  retail  sales.  E-government  is  increasingly  important  to 
consumers and businesses, saving both time and money. Already more than 14 mil-
lion Americans have placed a telephone call over the Internet. 

For workers. The number of teleworkers is increasing rapidly. More than 12.4 mil-
lion  Americans  telecommute  full-time.  Thanks  to  incentives  created  for  Federal 
agencies,  7  percent  of  the  Federal  workforce  now  telecommutes.  Since  they  do  not 
drive to work, home-based small business owners and teleworkers are helping to re-
duce  rush  hour  traffic  jams  for  other  workers  as  well.  A  recent  survey  of  members 
of the American Institute of Architects revealed that home offices are the most pop-
ular special function room of new home buyers for the third year in a row. 

For  rural  Americans.  Nowhere  is  broadband  opportunity  as  profound  as  it  is  in 
rural America. In too many rural communities, because jobs have migrated to urban 
areas,  high  school  graduates  often  feel  they  have  only  two  choices—go  away,  or  go 
nowhere. Broadband is the connection to new markets, new jobs, and to distant fam-
ily and friends. 

For  healthcare.  Health  IT  technologies  are  dependant  on  the  proliferation  of 
broadband.  Those  technologies  will  improve  the  efficiency  of  healthcare  and  signifi-
cantly  reduce  its  costs.  Health  IT  legislation  will  enable  privacy-protected  complete 
personal medical records to help doctors greatly improve diagnoses and treatments. 
Broadband will enable effective remote face-to-face consultations between healthcare 
providers  and  patients.  A  new  generation  of  wearable  medical  monitoring  devices 
now  under  development  will  enable  millions  of  chronically  ill  to  remain  in  their 
homes while their conditions are remotely monitored 24/7. They will also help many 
of  the  54  million  Americans  with  disabilities  to  remain  in  their  homes  and/or  lead 
more  productive  lives.  Collectively,  these  technologies  will  save  seniors  alone  more 
than $800 billion by reducing health care costs. 

For  seniors.  Our  society  continues  to  shift  from  the  geocentric  extended  families 
of  our  nation’s  early  history.  Older  Americans  today  are  far  more  likely  to  live  an 
extended physical distance from their children, siblings, other family members, and 
the friends of their youth. As AARP pointed out in its testimony to the Committee, 
‘‘High-quality broadband networks have the potential to make the world more acces-
sible to persons over age 50, providing convenient pathways to the economic and so-
cial  activities  that  are  not  only  vital  for  leading  comfortable  and  meaningful  lives, 
but  also  for  fostering  and  sustaining  livable  communities.  Creating  livable  commu-
nities  is  an  important  policy  goal  for  AARP.  More  than  just  a  concept,  livable  com-
munities seek to combine diverse and affordable housing, adequate mobility options, 
employment  opportunities,  entertainment  and  supportive  community  services  to 
allow persons of all ages to remain independent, active and engaged.’’ 

For  homeowners.  Today  over  80  percent  of  home  buyers  use  the  Internet  in  their 
search  for  new  homes  as  well  as  home  financing.  This  saves  them  tremendous 
amounts  of  time.  Home  sellers  can  list  their  homes  in  multiple  listing  services 
(MLS’s), which will distribute the listings to hundreds of real estate broker websites 
for  as  little  as  a  few  hundred  dollars.  Websites  like  Craigslist  are  becoming  more 
important  factors  in  real  estate  transactions,  and  home  sellers  or  agents  can  put 
listings  there  for  free.  Because  sellers  and  buyers  in  the  broadband  era  need  less 
support  from  real  estate  agents,  broadband  is  also  helping  to  reduce  real  estate 
sales  commission  rates.  According  to  U.S.  Census  figures  and  IDC,  a  national  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

64 

search  firm,  at  least  18  million  of  the  approximately  36  million  home  office  house-
holds  in  the  United  States  are  home-based  businesses.  Many  of  them  are  Internet- 
centric  businesses  which  are  heavily  dependant  on  broadband,  such  as  the  millions 
of  eBay  Power  Sellers  who  derive  all  or  much  of  their  income  from  Internet  com-
merce,  service  businesses  such  as  website  designers,  real  estate  agents,  mortgage 
brokers, and millions of other home-based businesses. 

For the environment. The shift to home-based teleworking is helping reduce envi-
ronmental  pollution  and  global  warming.  By  transforming  existing  rooms  in  their 
homes  into  offices,  telecommuters  and  home  based  businesses  reduce  the  need  for 
the  construction  of  new  commercial  office  space,  which  helps  the  environment.  A 
study  by  TIAX  LLC  determined  that  a  full  time  telecommuter  who  lives  22  miles 
from his or her workplace would save 320 gallons of gasoline and reduce CO2 emis-
sions by 4.5 to 6 tons per year. At $3.00+ per gallon gasoline prices, they would also 
save teleworkers about $1,000 in cash annually, not including savings in automobile 
insurance,  maintenance  costs  and  depreciation  resulting  from  those  trips.  Home 
based  business  owners  avoiding  commutes  to  a  separate  office  the  same  distance 
away would save the same amount. 

all families in America. 

ture investments, both for expansion and maintenance. 

For the economy. Ubiquitously available broadband could: 
• reduce  the  costs  of  Federal,  state,  and  local  physical  transportation  infrastruc-
• create an estimated $500 billion in economic growth. 
• create more than 1.2 million high-wage jobs. 
• strengthen America’s global competitiveness. 
• boost business productivity—which is essential to raising standards of living for 
• allow small businesses to reach global markets. 
For  Homeland  Security.  In  a  study  of  the  communications  failures  on  September 
11, 2001, the National Academies of Science found that the Internet held up better 
than  other  communications  technologies.  On  9/11,  95  percent  of  cell  phone  calls  at 
11 a.m. failed to get through, the central office for the phone system cutoff 300,000 
landline phones, television stations were knocked off the air, and police and fire de-
partment  radios  failed.  By  contrast,  only  2  percent  of  Internet  addresses  remained 
off-line  for  an  extended  period.  9/11  demonstrated  the  Internet’s  overall  resilience 
to  attacks  through  its  flexibility,  and  adaptability.  But  7  years  after  9/11,  America 
has  not  done  enough  to  advance  the  broadband  Internet  technologies  that  can  help 
avoid future communications failures. 

For  public  safety.  Hurricane  Katrina  highlighted  the  fragility  of  the  emergency 
communications  system  in  this  country.  During  Katrina,  38  Public  Safety  Answer-
ing  Points  (PSAPS)  failed,  preventing  911  calls  from  being  answered.  Connecting 
public  safety  answering  points  to  broadband,  like  we’ve  connected  schools  and  li-
braries, will strengthen the emergency responder communications network. 

For  government.  Universal  broadband  could  also  have  important  advantages  for 
the  government  itself,  allowing  government  workers  to  communicate  in  more  geo-
graphically-dispersed  locations  in  an  emergency.  In  the  event  of  a  major  9/11-type 
attack  on  Washington,  offices  could  be  inaccessible  but  employees  will  still  need  to 
communicate.  Federal  workers  using  broadband  enabled  phones  could  immediately 
work  from  home  or  other  broadband  enabled  location—improving  continuity  of  gov-
ernment.  Many  government  agencies  are  already  making  the  switch  to  broadband 
enabled voice services, but without broadband at home, workers can’t connect. 

For  business.  Broadband  has  greatly  enhanced  business  productivity  and  enabled 
small businesses, including home-based microbusinesses, play on a much more level 
playing  fields  against  larger  competitors.  A  small  business  today  can  create  a 
website  using  user-friendly  templates  and  maintain  their  website  for  $20  a  month 
or  less.  For  products  that  can  be  shipped  electronically  (movies,  software,  etc.), 
transportation  costs  associated  with  physical  products  are  eliminated,  because  the 
customers’ Internet service provides the transportation. 

To  help  make  the  aforementioned  benefits  available  to  all  in  society  we  must 
make broadband accessible to all. To achieve that objective, AHGA recommends that 
Congress undertake the following specific actions: 

• Promote  a  non-partisan  broadband  debate.  The  current  broadband  debate  has 
become very partisan, ideological, and acrimonious. Yet the benefits of expanded 
broadband access are not a matter of partisan differences. Legislators can dem-
onstrate  their  leadership  and  maturity  by  helping  to  bring  a  more  thoughtful 
tone to the debate in the future. Members of Congress, and leaders of consumer 
and business organizations, need to recognize that our progress is dependant on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

65 

reaching  consensus  among  most  or  all  of  the  key  players.  No  segment  of  the 
consumer,  business,  or  political  community  can  expect  to  achieve  all  of  their 
goals.  Progress  will  have  to  come  in  incremental  steps,  and  compromises  will 
be  necessary  even  as  we  move  forward  incrementally.  It  is  far  better  to  devote 
our  energies  to  finding  areas  of  common  ground  that  will  move  us  toward  the 
ultimate  goal  than  to  expend  energies  trying  to  deny  any  success  to  those  who 
disagree with us. 
• Pass  broadband  mapping  legislation.  Broadband  mapping  will  collect  accurate 
data  that  will  reveal  the  extent  and  distribution  of  current  broadband  deploy-
ment,  enable  us  to  forecast  trends,  and  identify  areas  where  additional  meas-
ures  are  required.  It  will  also  help  defuse  differences  of  opinion  regarding  the 
types  and  seriousness  of  the  challenges  to  further  broadband  deployment.  The 
information that S. 1492, the Broadband Data Improvement Act passed by this 
Committee,  and  House-passed  legislation  H.R.  3919,  the  Broadband  Census  of 
America of 2007, will help both the Federal Government and local communities 
and  states  assess  their  broadband  inventory.  That  information  is  critical  to  in-
telligent planning and resource allocation going forward. 
• Make smart government investments in this critical infrastructure. The nation’s 
resources  are  limited,  and  both  existing  programs  and  any  new  resources 
brought  to  bear  on  the  challenge  must  be  made  to  work  with  maximum  effi-
ciency. Existing programs such as the universal service system are still oriented 
to  outdated  consumer  communications  needs  and  old  communications  tech-
nologies.  The  universal  service  system  needs  to  be  modified  to  better  support 
the  goal  of  deployment  of  high  speed  Internet  for  all.  We  also  need  to  invest 
more  public  funds  in  efforts  to  improve  digital  literacy,  provide  broadband  ac-
cess and needed hardware are to low income households, support public/private 
partnerships,  and  make  low  interest  business  loans  available  to  spur  deploy-
ment of faster, second-generation networks. 
• Create new economic incentives to spur the demand for broadband services and/ 
or  reduce  the  cost  of  deploying  broadband  services.  Laws  that  have  effectively 
expanded  telecommuting  by  Federal  workers  need  to  be  complimented  with 
similar incentives in the private sector. A $2,000 tax credit for technology equip-
ment  and  broadband  service  expenses  required  to  establish  home  offices  for 
workers and home-based business owners would encourage more employers and 
workers to shift to teleworking, just as the $2,000 hybrid vehicle tax credit has 
encouraged more commuters to choose more fuel efficient cars. Congress should 
enact  a  permanent,  nationwide,  state  and  local  sales  tax  holiday  on  goods  and 
services  that  are  sold  over  the  Internet.  Exempting  Internet  sales  from  state 
and local sales taxes was supported by 85 percent of the 3,125 survey respond-
ents in a 2008 Parade Magazine readers survey. Such an exemption would spur 
Internet commerce and the demand for broadband services. State and local gov-
ernments  would  benefit  from  a  reduced  need  for  new  transportation  invest-
ments  and  maintenance,  and  society  would  benefit  from  the  many  other  eco-
nomic and environmental benefits of e-commerce. Tax credits or other incentives 
tied  to  accelerating  the  build  out  of  networks  and  upgrading  them  to  second- 
generation capability should be provided to broadband and cellular service pro-
viders. 
• Support  niche  opportunities  to  take  advantage  of  new  broadband  applications. 
Much progress has been made in narrowing differences in health IT legislation 
in this Congress. It would be a great step forward if Congress could pass health 
IT legislation this year. If time does not permit action in this Congress, passage 
of health IT legislation should be moved to the top of the priority list next year. 
Congress should continue to seek similar niche opportunities to take advantage 
of broadband technology in other areas in the future. 
• Remove  major  barriers  to  broadband  adoption.  Privacy  issues  are  a  serious 
threat to consumers. They slow both Internet use and broadband adoption. Con-
gress must take steps to address threats to privacy, security and safety. 

The  most  serious  is  identity  theft,  which  has  a  very  adverse  effect  on  consumers 
when  it  occurs,  and  is  also  discouraging  many  other  consumers  from  taking  advan-
tage  of  the  benefits  of  Internet  Commerce.  A  recent  University  of  Michigan  study 
determined that up to 75 percent of all bank websites have security flaws resulting 
from  poor  website  design  that  make  them  susceptible  to  hacking.  Federal  privacy 
legislation  should  establish  reasonable  basic  minimum  security  and  privacy  for  on-
line  activity.  These  standards  should  not  be  so  rigorous  that  they  would  impose 
undue  burdens  on  home-based  and  other  small  businesses  which  incorporate  Inter-
net commerce in their business models. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

66 

A new and growing threat to consumer privacy, security and safety are new tech-
nology  applications  that  provide  high  quality,  ground  level  pictures  of  residential 
neighborhoods,  which  have  been  made  available  on  the  Internet  without  the  con-
sumer’s  advance  knowledge  or  permission  by  companies  such  as  Google  (Street 
View),  Mapjack,  EveryScape  Inc.  and  Povo  Inc.  Ground  level  view  technologies  en-
able  anyone  with  Internet  access  to  drive  virtually,  undetected,  and  very  efficiently 
through residential neighborhoods and peer into the windows of peoples’ homes, and 
view  what  they  were  doing  inside  their  home  or  elsewhere  on  their  property.  Per-
sonally embarrassing photographs from these services have been widely republished 
on  the  Internet.  The  degree  of  invasion  of  someone’s  privacy  and  potential  risk  of 
damage  to  someone’s  career  posed  by  these  tools  is  many  times  greater  than  that 
posed  by  a  neighborhood  busybody,  and  these  tools  create  security  threats  to  con-
sumers  as  well.  The  Pentagon  has  prohibited  Google  from  publishing  its  ‘‘Street 
View’’ content of U.S. military bases and the Department of Homeland Security has 
reportedly asked Google not to release its street views of the Washington, D.C. area 
out  of  concern  that  the  pictures  may  be  used  by  international  terrorists  to  plan  at-
tacks. These new tools can just as easily be used by domestic criminals as they can 
by international terrorists. They make it far easier and more efficient for potentially 
violent burglars, car thieves, and other criminals to plan their crimes. These compa-
nies  should  be  required  to  get  advance  opt-in  permission  from  consumers  before 
posting pictures of consumers’ homes on the Internet. 

Another privacy issue involves tools companies use to track consumers’ online ac-
tivities  across  the  entire  Internet  in  great  detail.  The  tracking  done  thus  far  using 
tools such as ‘‘deep-packet inspection’’, and other advance technologies used by com-
panies  such  as  Google  and  others  to  track  consumers’  activities  across  the  Internet 
has  been  done  without  consumers’  advance  knowledge  or  consent,  and  outside  the 
bounds of consumer expectation. 

Companies that track consumer Internet activity in great detail beyond their own 
company’s  website  should  be  required  to  get  advance  opt-in  permission  from  con-
sumers  before  tracking  types  of  online  behavior  that  consumers  have  a  reasonable 
expectation of privacy. 

We thank the Senate Commerce Committee for this effort to help understand the 
many benefits that broadband is delivering to society. The Alliance also appreciates 
the  opportunity  to  provide  these  suggestions  to  help  speed  broadband  adoption  in 
the U.S. We look forward to supporting this Committee’s efforts to make broadband 
as  universal  as  telephone  service  is  today  and  bring  its  benefits  to  all  Americans 
as soon as possible. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE INSTITUTE OF ELECTRICAL AND ELECTRONICS 

ENGINEERS-UNITED STATES OF AMERICA (IEEE-USA) 

IEEE-USA  is  delighted  to  submit  this  statement  to  the  U.S.  Senate  Commerce, 
Science  and  Transportation  Committee.  IEEE-USA  advances  the  public  good  and 
promotes the careers and public policy interests of the 215,000 engineers, scientists 
and allied professionals who are U.S. members of the IEEE. 

IEEE-USA  congratulates  Chairman  Daniel  Inouye  and  the  Senate  Commerce 
Committee  for  supporting  S.  1492,  the  ‘‘Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act,’’  and 
supports passage of this important legislation. 

Universal access to high-speed broadband data services is as imperative to our na-
tion’s  economic  prosperity  in  the  21st  century  as  universal  access  to  electric  power 
and telephone services was in the 20th century. Broadband services enable telecom-
muting, distance learning, improved medical care, gateways to vast sources of infor-
mation, and a host of other economic and quality-of-life opportunities. As with elec-
tricity  and  telephone  service  before  it,  new  Internet  applications  generate  economic 
and social gains that far exceed the investment in the enabling infrastructure. 

The  various  members  of  U.S.  consumer  households  of  the  near  future  will  be 
needing  access  to  many  broadband  applications  all  at  the  same  time.  The  children 
do their homework, the breadwinner works part time or full from home, the grand-
parents  keep  in  touch  with  their  doctors,  and  some  of  them  seek  help  from  their 
governments on taxes, social security, Medicare, business, energy, housing, and pub-
lic safety. The aggregation of these simultaneous applications in the home, together 
with entertainment, will drive the future demand for broadband. 

Although  the  United  States  can  legitimately  take  credit  for  development  of  the 
Internet,  we  cannot  claim  that  our  nation  leads  in  providing  access  to  it.  Many 
countries  have  recognized  the  benefits  of  high-speed  broadband  data  services  and 
have  dramatically  expanded  both  the  availability  and  speed  of  their  national  net-
works.  Such  investments  provide  competitive  advantages  that  must  not  be  ignored. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

67 

We must meet these challenges with new cooperative initiatives between the U.S. 
Government  and  the  U.S.  communications  industry.  These  efforts  will  require 
strong  national  leadership  focused  on  development  of  new  policy  and  regulatory 
frameworks to stimulate investment in the enabling infrastructure for extending na-
tional  access  to  the  Internet;  its  widespread  use;  and  competition  in  its  facilities, 
service provision, and content. 

IEEE-USA  urges  the  U.S.  Congress  to  create  incentives  for  the  provision  of  uni-
versal  and  affordable  high-speed  broadband  access  to  new  and  demanding  Internet 
applications.  Such  access  will  bring  consumer  benefits  to  education,  job  opportuni-
ties,  telemedicine,  and  access  to  government  resources.  Beyond  these  benefits,  such 
access will stimulate innovation, spur economic activity, and contribute to increased 
productivity for the Nation. 

To achieve these benefits IEEE-USA recommends the following actions covered at 

greater length below: 

• Designate universal and affordable access to high-speed broadband networks as 
a  national  priority  and  establish  a  series  of  bandwidth  goals  and  target  dates 
for deployment. 
• Provide economic incentives for broadband investments and uses that qualify as 
• Foster  further  competition  in  facilities,  service  provision,  and  content  through 

furthering our national objectives. 

legislation and regulation. 

The United States Faces Challenges for its Broadband Infrastructure. 

Current levels of speed and access fall short of evolving demand. The Federal Com-
munications  Commission’s  (FCC)  prior  definition  of  broadband  speed  was  200  kilo-
bits  per  second  (kb/s).  Recently  the  FCC  replaced  this  definition  with  seven 
broadband  tiers  starting  at  768  kb/s  and  extending  to  speeds  greater  than  100 
megabits per second (Mb/s). Five principal technologies currently deliver broadband 
within these tiers: 

• Cellular telephony 
• Digital Subscriber Line, offered by telephone companies 
• Cable modem, provided by cable companies 
• Wireless Fidelity (Wi-Fi) networks 
• Optical fiber to the home or the neighborhood 
• Satellite. 
Availability and data rates vary widely within each of these technologies, so that 
tabulation  of  their  capabilities  here  would  necessarily  be  incomplete  and  subject  to 
change.  However,  typical  data  rates  currently  increase  from  about  0.5  Mb/s  for  the 
newer  cellular  telephony  systems  progressing  to  20  Mb/s  for  optical  fiber  to  the 
home.  Optical  fiber  so  far  is  available  only  in  limited  service  areas  compared  with 
Japan, South Korea, and France. 

As microprocessor and broadband capabilities expand, new computing applications 
emerge.  This  is  the  story  of  technological  progress  in  all  fields.  Many  studies  cite 
examples, just a few of which follow: 

works. 

• Convergence  of  voice,  data,  and  video  into  bit  streams  carried  on  digital  net-
• Widespread  bidirectional  video  conferencing,  useful  in  education  and  business. 
• High  resolution  medical  images  and  electronic  medical  records  transferred  for 

diagnosis and consultation. 

These  new  applications  can  be  used  on  the  Internet  now,  but  can  experience 
delays in delivery where the Internet is not robust enough to handle the additional 
traffic they induce, as well as impact the user experience of any others sharing the 
same portion of the Internet. 

The  market  is  advancing  U.S.  broadband  deployment,  but  at  a  pace  limited  by 
each  individual  provider’s  perceived  return  on  investment.  The  result  is  twofold:  we 
face inadequate provision for coming demand and we lack parity among world-class 
networks.  To  encourage  faster  progress,  initiatives  beyond  ordinary  market  forces 
are needed. 
Priority Action Will Return Rewarding Benefits to Consumers 

All levels of education are using broadband. Images and videos enrich the primary 
grades in science, music, art, and current events. High school students research ma-
terial for their arts and their sciences assignments. Almost every higher educational 
institution  makes  its  entire  curricula  available  on  its  websites,  either  for  fee  or  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

68 

free. For example, the University of Maryland University College enrolls 90,000 stu-
dents worldwide, mostly in distance learning courses otherwise unavailable to work-
ing adults because of location, schedule, and duties. 

Telework  and  telecommuting  enable  people  to  join  in  the  workforce  who  would 
otherwise  be  excluded  by  reason  of  location,  mobility,  age,  or  cost.  However,  these 
applications are most effective with ample bandwidth for fast transfers of large files 
and  interactive  video.  Additionally,  the  very  investment  needed  to  expand  the 
broadband infrastructure will create skilled jobs in U.S. industry in rural areas and 
across the U.S. 

Broadband is improving both the efficiency and effectiveness of health care deliv-
ery through rapid access to medical records, detailed medical imagery, video patient 
diagnosis and monitoring, and even telesurgery for patients unable to get to a quali-
fied  surgeon.  These  applications  use  bandwidth  beyond  what  is  generally  available 
now. 

More extensive Federal and local government use of broadband facilities and serv-
ices  could  provide  superior  services  to  its  citizens  in  law  enforcement,  emergency 
management, health, housing, and business. 
Telemedicine 

Increasing  health  care  costs  and  an  aging  population  are  placing  significant 
strains upon the U.S. health care system. Small pilot studies have shown that meet-
ing  seniors’  needs  for  independence  and  autonomy,  coupled  with  expanded  use  of 
home  health  technologies,  mitigate  against  these  circumstances  and  provide  im-
proved  health  outcomes.  Difficulty  with  reimbursement  policies,  governmental  ap-
proval  processes,  and  absence  of  efficient  deployment  strategies  have  hampered 
adopting such technologies. 

These  technologies  can  reduce  or  eliminate  the  need  for  personal  services  in  the 
home  and  can  also  improve  treatment  in  hospitals  and  nursing  care  facilities  in 
rural  areas  and  other  environments.  IEEE-USA  believes  that  using  electronic  tech-
nologies to assist and monitor elderly, disabled, and chronically ill individuals in the 
home  can  improve  quality  of  life,  improve  health  outcomes,  and  help  control  health 
care costs. 

IEEE-USA  urges  Congress  and  policy-makers,  in  both  the  public  and  the  private 
sector, to take the actions needed to expand uses for electronic devices, assistive and 
monitoring software, and home health communication technologies to provide home 
health  care  to  those  in  need.  Further,  we  support  developing  guidelines  for  reim-
bursement of these technologies—both for developers and users. 
Universal Access Will Return Rewarding Results in Other Fields as Well 

As  networks  connect  larger  numbers  of  people,  disproportionately  positive  eco-
nomic  and  social  benefits  accrue  to  society  because  the  possible  interactions  grow 
faster than the number of subscribers. 

Economically,  broadband  networks  have  been  shown  to  spur  growth  through  pro-
ductivity,  new  and  augmented  markets,  expanded  work  force,  innovative  products 
and services, and research. This occurs by speeding the diffusion of ideas and proce-
dures  throughout  individuals  and  organizations,  so  that  the  direct  benefits  diffuse 
throughout the society as a whole. In rural areas, facilities ownership by enterprises 
and  communities  is  providing  expanded  capability  in  sparsely  populated  markets, 
thus  enhancing  local  economic  opportunity  and  richness  of  life.  Faster  and  more 
available  wireless  access  can  expand  mobile  commerce  and  create  new  multimedia 
applications  such  as  mobile  video  telephony.  The  broadband  infrastructure  can  en-
able  energy  efficiency  as  well  as  substitute  for  other  resources,  such  as  use  of  the 
transportation  infrastructure,  medical  examination  and  advice,  and  paper-based 
records. 

National  security  and  public  safety  can  be  enhanced  by  a  robust  Internet.  The 
Internet’s fundamental design provides redundancy in case of isolated failures; how-
ever, best practices for critical infrastructure protection must be employed to ensure 
improved  robustness  and  survivability  from  both  natural  and  man-made  disasters. 
Socially,  such  networks  have  been  shown  to  enrich  the  quality  of  life,  and  to  di-
minish  the  disparity  in  access  between  rich  and  poor,  urban  and  rural,  and  ethnic 
groups. 

Globally, high-performance networks will enable the United States to match or ex-
ceed  services  and  applications  available  to  the  citizens  or  trading  partners  of  other 
nations, with consequent competitive advantages. 
Government Has Options for Constructive Action 

Designate  deployment  of  high-speed  broadband  networks  as  a  national  priority 

and establish a series of bandwidth goals and target dates for deployment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

69 

• The  President  and  Congress  have  a  chance  to  provide  vision  and  leadership  by 
giving  priority  status  to  high-speed  broadband  deployment  and  access.  Such 
leadership will close the widely publicized gap in penetration, access, and price 
between the United States and countries like Japan, South Korea, and Europe. 
• Initially,  we  advocate  the  achievement  of  20  Mb/s  bidirectional  speed  with  90 
percent availability throughout the Nation within 5 years. The wide penetration 
of such speeds will achieve most of the expected benefits and accommodate nu-
merous  simultaneous  applications  per  household  or  small  business.  Of  course, 
greater speeds can be had by those with greater needs. 
• We further advocate the achievement of 100 Mb/s bidirectional speed with avail-
ability  to  all  businesses  and  households  within  10  years.  The  technology  nec-
essary  to  meet  this  goal  is  scalable  to  almost  any  future  need  at  inexpensive 
upgrade costs. 
• Create a national annual census of broadband availability and usage to monitor 
progress toward the goals, identify competitive opportunities, and reveal under-
served areas. 

Provide economic and other incentives for broadband investment and use. 
• The  government  should  reaffirm  and  extend  tax  incentives  to  private  sector 
broadband investment. These include expensing of certain investments, acceler-
ated  depreciation,  R&D  tax  credit,  matching  grants,  and  guaranteed  loans  for 
broadband  deployment  in  underserved  areas  including  use  of  the  Universal 
Service Fund. 
• Other incentives would include deductions for certain broadband subscriber ex-
• Additionally, to stimulate use and demand, provide programs to increase digital 

penses that further education and health care. 

literacy. 

Foster competition in facilities, services, and content. 
• Competition among providers and technologies can be relied on to provide wider 
deployment,  higher  speeds,  and  lower  prices  just  as  it  has  in  other  countries. 
The following actions will foster such competition: 
» Rescind  legislative  and  regulatory  restrictions  on  deployment  of  end-user 
owned wired and wireless networks by municipalities and other communities 
wherever  these  provide  capability  in  the  absence  of  adequate,  cost-effective, 
or timely commercial services. 

» Encourage  negotiation  between  service  providers  and  facilities  providers  for 
access  to  the  physical  infrastructure,  so  as  to  realize  the  benefits  of  innova-
tion, content diversity, end-user choice, and competition. 

» Recommend network benchmark tests for broadband performance and contin-
ually redefine them as usage and technology evolve. Different broadband tech-
nologies  have  more  than  raw  speed  differences.  For  the  competitive  market-
place  to  work  in  selecting  broadband  alternatives  there  must  be  information 
on the alternatives. Thus users can select the performance best for their par-
ticular needs. 

Additional initiatives will also encourage broadband investment and use. 
• The  FCC  should  designate  ample  licensed  and  unlicensed  spectrum  bands,  in-
cluding  unused  portions  of  television  bands,  for  high-speed  wireless  networks, 
ultimately aiming at access for all. This action will expand mobile and nomadic 
services and augment access to the wired infrastructure. 
• Appropriate  government  agencies  should  step  up  their  network  acquisitions  to 
• The  National  Science  Foundation,  other  funding  agencies,  and  industry  should 
assure  research  levels  for  hardware,  software,  applications,  and  standards  that 
are  sufficient  to  spur  continuing  technological  development,  as  Japan  and  the 
European Union are doing. 

stimulate demand. 

The above Considerations Support the Following Conclusions 

The  capabilities  and  benefits  of  widespread,  advanced  broadband  networks  are 
achievable  by  visionary  national  policies  and  leadership,  enabling  cooperative  gov-
ernment  and  industry  initiatives.  Such  networks  are  necessary  for  attaining  and 
sustaining  U.S.  technological  and  competitive  advantage  in  the  global  economy. 
Once in place, such networks reduce bandwidth constraints, thus opening a new era 
of innovation for knowledge-based goods and services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

70 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

LARRY COHEN 

Question 1. If this hearing is to act as a jumping off point for next Congress, and 
for  the  next  Administration,  can  you  each  give  a  policy  recommendation  for  how  to 
go about deploying broadband to every American? What policy initiatives should be 
included in the President’s national broadband Strategy? What can be accomplished 
at  the  FCC?  And  what  initiatives  should  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  to 
increase understanding and information in order to improve demand on the part of 
the consumer? 

Answer.  There  are  a  number  of  immediate  steps  that  the  next  Administration, 
Congress, and the FCC can take to achieve the goal of affordable, high speed Inter-
net for all Americans. 

First,  the  President’s  broadband  strategy  should  establish  a  national  broadband 
policy  goal.  A  reasonable  initial  goal  would  be  to  construct  an  infrastructure  with 
enough  capacity  for  10  megabits  per  second  (mbps)  downstream  and  1  mbps  up-
stream by 2010. 

Second,  Congress  in  partnership  with  the  states  should  fund  a  program  to  map 
broadband  infrastructure.  We  still  do  not  have  detailed  national  information  about 
where  broadband  deployed  and  at  what  speeds.  The  next  Congress  should  make  it 
a  top  priority  to  authorize  and  appropriate  funds  to  implement  S.  1492,  the 
Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act,  (Public  Law  110–385),  which  provides  grants  to 
states  to  conduct  broadband  mapping  and  to  create  public-private  partnerships  to 
aggregate demand. 

Third,  the  FCC  should  reform  the  universal  service  program.  Today,  universal 
service subsidies support voice telephony service. The FCC should move forward im-
mediately to reform the universal service program to support build-out of broadband 
networks in rural high-cost areas and subsidies for low-income households for Inter-
net access and equipment. 

Fourth,  Congress  should  adopt  tax  incentives,  low-interest  loans,  and  grants  to 
stimulate build-out of high-speed broadband infrastructure. Other countries such as 
Japan,  South  Korea,  and  Sweden  have  spurred  the  deployment  of  faster  networks 
through  such  programs.  Congress  could  adopt  such  incentives  as  part  of  an  infra-
structure  stimulus  package  designed  to  jump-start  the  economy,  create  jobs,  while 
investing in 21st century broadband infrastructure. 

Fifth, Congress in cooperation with the states should fund programs to stimulate 
demand  for  high-speed  broadband  networks,  including  community-based  digital  lit-
eracy  programs,  grants  for  broadband  applications  and  services,  and  programs  that 
provide free or low-cost computers to low-income households. A Digital Ambassadors 
program could be considered as part of a job-creating stimulus package. 

Question  2.  Massachusetts  Governor  Deval  Patrick  proposed  and  passed  with  the 
cooperation  of  the  legislature  an  initiative  to  fund  next  generation  communications 
infrastructure  through  state  issued  bonds.  Is  this  a  strategy  that  makes  sense  in 
your mind? Is it an idea that has merit at the Federal level? 

Answer. There is merit in exploring a Federal program that would support invest-
ment  in  next-generation  communications  infrastructure  through  an  infrastructure 
bond  program.  Such  a  program  should  be  structured  to  lower  private  sector  capital 
costs for investments in next-generation communications infrastructure. In addition, 
it  is  worth  exploring  other  programs  that  would  lower  private  sector  cost  of  capital 
for investment in next-generation networks such as accelerated expensing of invest-
ments in high-speed next-generation networks, investment tax credits, and competi-
tive matching grants. 

Question  3.  There  has  been  talk  about  a  second  stimulus  package,  and  the  value 
of  including  infrastructure  improvements  in  such  a  package.  Could  you  speak  to 
how  public  funds  directed  at  infrastructure  improvements—whether  they  be  roads, 
bridges,  railroads  or  communications  networks—can  build  jobs  and  stimulate  the 
economy? 

Answer.  Public  funds  directed  at  infrastructure  improvements—whether  they  be 
roads,  bridges,  schools,  or  communications  networks—can  build  jobs  and  jumpstart 
the  economy  in  the  short-term,  while  investing  in  the  21st  century  infrastructure 
to  assure  long-run  economic  growth.  Moreover,  advanced  networks  support  innova-
tions  in  health  care,  education,  public  safety,  energy,  and  public  services  that  will 
improve  our  lives  and  communities,  while  providing  public  services  in  a  more  effi-
cient manner. 

In a report prepared for the U.S. Department of Commerce, economists found that 
communities with broadband experienced a higher rate of job growth and new busi-
ness start-ups than communities without high-speed networks. Another study of the 
central  Appalachian  region  found  that  firms  in  communities  with  broadband  were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

71 

14  to  17  percent  more  productive  than  those  in  communities  without  high-speed 
Internet  access.  A  Brookings  Institution  paper  calculated  that  build-out  of 
broadband infrastructure to all households would add $500 billion to gross domestic 
product  and  1.2  million  additional  jobs.  Another  report  warned  that  the  failure  to 
improve  broadband  performance  could  reduce  U.S.  productivity  by  1  percentage 
point or more per year.1 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

JONATHAN LINKOUS 

Question 1. If this hearing is to act as a jumping off point for next Congress, and 
for  the  next  Administration,  can  you  each  give  a  policy  recommendation  for  how  to 
go about deploying broadband to every American? What policy initiatives should be 
included in the President’s national broadband Strategy? What can be accomplished 
at  the  FCC?  And  what  initiatives  should  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  to 
increase understanding and information in order to improve demand on the part of 
the consumer? 

Answer.  Using  Federal  funds  to  pay  for  the  deployment  of  large  telecommuni-
cation pipes where there is no foreseeable need or where consumer demand and the 
private sector will already meet the need, would be imprudent. Similarly, deploying 
broadband over pathways already filled with dark fiber or paying for outdated tele-
communications technology is equally foolish. 

However,  there  are  a  growing  number  of  health,  educational,  and  public  sector 
services requiring broadband access where such access might not otherwise be avail-
able.  Also,  there  are  certain  geographic  areas  that  may  present  economic  barriers 
to  broadband  deployment.  Finally,  low  income  families  may  not  be  able  to  afford 
such access. In these cases, there is a justifiable need for public support to gain ac-
cess to broadband. Historically, these are the same arguments that justified the es-
tablishment of Universal Service. 

The easiest and most cost-effective approach to ensure broadband access to every 
American  is  to  use  the  universal  service  mechanism.  Thus,  the  existing  definition 
of  ‘‘Plain  Old  Telephone  Service’’  that  is  offered  through  Universal  Service  policies 
should  be  revised  to  reflect  faster  speeds,  both  to  and  from  the  consumer.  Such  a 
change  in  public  policy  should  originate  from  Congress  and  be  implemented  at  the 
FCC. 

Question  2.  Experts  and  legislators  from  both  side  of  the  aisle  see  great  promise 
in  modernizing  the  health  care  system,  particularly  the  life  saving  and  cost  saving 
benefits  of  electronic  prescribing  and  electronic  health  records.  To  what  extent  do 
you  see  the  lack  of  broadband  access  and  penetration  as  limiting  the  full  adoption 
and functionality of our progress in developing digital health care? 

Answer.  There  are  numerous  barriers  inhibiting  the  deployment  of  many  forms 
of  health  technology.  Technical  standardization,  clinical  practice  guidelines  and  re-
imbursement  for  remote  health  services  are  a  few  of  the  needs.  Telemedicine,  the 
provision of health services over distances, also needs affordable telecommunications 
services.  Traditionally  connecting  large  hospitals  to  outlying  clinics,  telemedicine  is 
now  being  made  available  directly  to  the  individual  through  the  Internet  and  cell 
phones.  Continuous,  personal  health  monitoring  and  instant  diagnosis  and  even 
treatment of an individual’s health problems via telemedicine are around the corner. 
Such revolutionary applications are transforming how, why and when healthcare is 
delivered, improving care and vastly reducing costs. 

Universal  access  to  these  health  services  will  soon  become  critical  in  order  to 
avoid  yet  one  more  set  of  haves  and  have-nots.  In  the  near  future,  the  lack  of  per-
sonal  access  to  telecommunications  will  be  tantamount  to  a  lack  of  access  to 
healthcare. 

1 William  Lehr,  Carlos  A.  Osorio,  Sharon  E.  Gillett,  and  Marvin  Sirbu, 

‘‘Measuring 
Broadband’s  Economic  Impact,’’  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  Economic  Development  Admin-
istration  (Feb.  2006)  (available  at  http://www.eda.gov/ImageCache/EDAPublic/documents/ 
pdfdocs2006/mitcmubbimpactreportl2epdf/v1/mitcmubbimpactreport.pdf);  Mark  L.  Burton 
and Michael J. Hicks, ‘‘The Residential and Commercial Benefits of Rural Broadband: Evidence 
from Central Appalachia,’’ June 2005, Paper prepared for the West Virginia Development Office, 
Center  for  Business  and  Economic  Research,  Marshall  University;  R.  Crandall  and  C.  Jackson, 
‘‘The  $500  Billion  Opportunity:  The  Potential  Economic  Benefit  of  Widespread  Diffusion  of 
Broadband  Internet  Access,’’  Criterion  Economics,  2001  (available  at  http://www.ntia.doc.gov/ 
ntiahome/broadband/comments/verizon/ExhibitA.pdf);  C.  Ferguson, 
‘‘The  United  States 
Broadband  Problem:  Analysis  and  Recommendations,’’  Brookings  Institution  Working  Paper, 
2002 
http://www.brookings.edu/views/papers/ferguson/workinglpaper 
l20020531.pdf) 

(available 

at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

72 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

MARA MAYOR, PH.D. 

Question 1. If this hearing is to act as a jumping off point for next Congress, and 
for  the  next  Administration,  can  you  each  give  a  policy  recommendation  for  how  to 
go about deploying broadband to every American? What policy initiatives should be 
included in the President’s national broadband Strategy? What can be accomplished 
at  the  FCC?  And  what  initiatives  should  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  to 
increase understanding and information in order to improve demand on the part of 
the consumer? 

Answer. Older Americans have the potential to reap significant benefits from the 
widespread  availability  of  affordable  and  high-quality  broadband  services. 
Broadband  services  can  create  new  opportunities  for  older  Americans  to  maintain 
their  independence  and  security,  to  receive  improved  medical  supervision  and  care, 
and  to  maintain  their  productivity  in  the  work  force.  Broadband  provides  new  ave-
nues  for  socialization  and  contact  with  the  outside  world  for  individuals  who  may 
experience  decreased  mobility.  Broadband  also  has  the  potential  to  offer  expanded 
support to family and friends who act as unpaid caregivers for older Americans. 

More  generally,  broadband  can  enable  expanded  innovation  and  provide  new  op-
portunities  for  economic  growth,  both  in  economic  sectors  associated  with  serving 
older persons, such as health and social care, and in the overall economy. A growing 
body  of  research  links  broadband  deployment  to  increases  in  employment  and  eco-
nomic growth. 

Congress  should  make  ubiquitous,  affordable,  and  truly  high-speed  broadband  a 
national  priority.  It  should  create  an  aggressive  national  broadband  deployment 
strategy that establishes the U.S. as the world leader in providing all of its citizens 
with  access  to  the  fastest  and  most  affordable  broadband  services.  Specific  targets 
in  terms  of  broadband  penetration,  coverage,  and  usage  should  be  established  to 
spur  progress  toward  meeting  the  statutory  objectives  of  ‘‘access  to  broadband  tele-
communications  capability  that  enables  users  to  originate  and  receive  high-quality 
voice,  data,  graphics,  and  video  telecommunications  using  any  technology.’’  Estab-
lishing the following milestones would help reach that goal: 

• the  provision  of  affordable  broadband  with  symmetrical  speeds  of  at  least  10 
Mbps  that  is  available  to  100  percent  of  U.S.  households  by  the  end  of  2010; 
• the  provision  of  affordable  broadband  with  symmetrical  speeds  of  at  least  100 

Mbps available to 100 percent of U.S. households by the end of 2015. 

In  addition,  a  new  national  broadband  policy  should  encourage  both  the  demand 
and supply sides of the market for this technology and incorporate the following key 
principles: 

• transparency  and  accountability—Indicators  of  market  performance  are  essen-

tial for achieving strategic goals. 

• promotion  of  open  and  standardized  broadband  platforms—open  and  standard-
ized broadband platforms will result in the greatest opportunities for innovation 
and the fullest benefits of competition. 

• greater promotion of broadband adoption especially among the older and under-

served populations—see response to question #2 below. 

Question 1a. What can be accomplished at the FCC? 
Answer.  Contrary  to  the  FCC’s  recent  Report  to  Congress  that  indicates  that  all 
Americans  have  access  to  affordable  advanced  telecommunications  services, 
broadband  deployment  in  the  United  States  has  substantial  deficiencies.  For  exam-
ple,  evidence  shows  that  there  is  a  significant  difference  between  rural  and  urban 
broadband Internet usage in the United States. There are substantial differences in 
broadband  adoption  based  on  household  income.  Age  is  also  a  factor  limiting 
broadband  adoption,  with  a  scant  15  percent  of  households  headed  by  individuals 
over 65 having a broadband connection. 

To implement meaningful reform, the following steps are appropriate by the FCC: 
• The FCC must identify the supported companies that have upgraded their net-

works to provide broadband. 

• The  FCC  must  audit  these  firms  to  determine  the  extent  and  quality  of 
broadband coverage, this audit can contribute to generating accurate maps that 
identify the characteristics of broadband deployment. 

• The  FCC  must  establish  the  cost  basis  for  the  joint  provision  of  voice  and 

broadband services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

73 

• The  FCC  must  acknowledge  revenue  streams  arising  from  both  voice  and 
• The  FCC  must  award  support  to  these  companies  based  on  data  obtained  from 

broadband services, and, 

the review of costs and revenues. 

To  satisfy  the  statutory  objectives,  mapping  must  identify  the  current  status  of 
all broadband deployments. The FCC must establish a broadband speed benchmark 
that encourages the deployment of high quality broadband. For any new broadband 
facilities  supported  by  any  broadband  expansion  fund,  priority  be  awarded  to  de-
ployments that provide symmetrical data speeds of 10 Mbps or greater. 

Question  1b.  What  initiatives  should  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  to  in-
crease  understanding  and  information  in  order  to  improve  demand  on  the  part  of 
the consumer? 

Answer. Affordability is a key factor in improving demand on the part of the con-
sumer.  Given  the  inclusion  of  broadband  services  in  the  universal  service  offering, 
the  FCC  must  establish  an  affordability  standard.  Affordability  proceedings  should 
be conducted with the assistance of the state commissions, as regional and local fac-
tors have a strong influence on the ability of households to afford broadband. In ad-
dition,  policymakers  should  establish  and  sufficiently  fund  broadband  assistance 
programs for low-income consumers to ensure that high-quality broadband is within 
the reach of all U.S. households. 

Question 2. In your testimony, you mention the fact that only 19 percent of people 
over age 65 have broadband service in their home. How much of the problem is lack 
of  education  and  understanding,  and  what  can  be  done  to  help  this  demographic 
learn more about the benefits of broadband access? 

Answer.  Many  older  adults  and  many  younger  ones  as  well,  could  benefit  by 
knowing  more  about  the  benefits  of  broadband  access  that  are  available  today,  and 
those that are on the horizon. In this regard, education and incentives that encour-
age broadband consumption should be implemented. The education efforts should be 
oriented toward ‘‘lifelong learning’’ to ensure that all members of society have suffi-
cient  knowledge  to  understand  the  benefits  of  information  technologies,  including 
broadband. The promotion of broadband consumption should leverage telework, tele-
health,  electronic  commerce,  electronic  government,  and  distance-education  activi-
ties as key focus areas. Special attention should be given to demonstrating the util-
ity  of  applications  in  these  areas  to  meeting  the  independent  living  assistance,  em-
ployment,  health,  and  education  needs  of  older  persons.  Specific  provisions  to  pro-
mote broadband consumption could include: 

• programs that promote the refurbishment and distribution to low-income house-
holds  of  discarded  but  serviceable  computers,  to  ensure  the  availability  of  com-
puters in low income households; 

• public service advertising; 
• expanded  adult  community  education  programs  targeting  broadband  and  com-
• a  national  initiative  to  ensure  a  minimum  level  of  technology  education  in 

puter use; and 

schools and other appropriate venues. 

While limited awareness about the benefits of broadband access may help explain 
the relatively low adoption rate of home broadband service by older adults, it is not 
the  only  factor.  Indeed,  research  suggests  that  older  consumers’  concerns  about  the 
costs of broadband services and capabilities and older consumers’ perceptions of the 
relevance  of  these  services  and  capabilities  are  more  important  factors  in  deter-
mining widespread adoption of broadband service. 

For  example,  broadband  can  create  opportunities  to  address  the  complexities  of 
serving  an  aging  population  by  facilitating  access  to  health  care  services  that  are 
necessary  to  help  older  persons  age  successfully.  In  this  regard,  recent  AARP  re-
search suggests strong support for telehealth. Three-fourths of older adults age 65+ 
say they are willing to have a cardiologist diagnose or monitor a heart condition by 
receiving  information  that  is  transmitted  electronically  to  them  from  their  primary 
care  doctor’s  office  or  their  home.  Moreover,  older  adults  identify  safety,  emotional 
peace  of  mind  and  comfort  as  benefits  associated  with  personal  health  monitoring 
devices  that  are  well  supported  by  always-on  broadband  connections.  Nevertheless, 
cost concerns rise to the top of the older adults’ perceptions of these devices. Indeed, 
four out of five older adults express concern about the costs to install and maintain 
these  devices.  Similarly,  other  research  finds  that  older  adults  perceive  these 
broadband-enabled services to be too expensive for individual consumers unless they 
are  extremely  frail  or  the  only  other  alternative  to  nursing  care  or  living  with  an 
adult child. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

74 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

MARGARET M. CONROY 

Question  1.  If  this  hearing  is  to  act  as  a  jumping  off  point  for  the  next  Congress, 
and for the next Administration, can you each give a policy recommendation for how 
to go about deploying broadband to every American? 

Answer.  This  is  a  time  of  great  opportunity  for  the  111th  Congress  to  provide 
leadership  and  vision  to  establish  universal  broadband  services  to  all  Americans. 
Like  public  libraries,  public  education  and  the  Universal  Service  Fund  (USF),  uni-
versal  broadband  must  be  a  long  term  and  major  priority  so  that  legislation  and 
funding  will  be  passed  to  see  genuine  build  out  of  this  essential  new  infrastruc-
ture—especially in rural and remote communities. 

Congressional  leaders  and  pertinent  Committees  must  make  broadband  deploy-
ment and sustainability a top priority for the coming congressional session. To make 
the proverbial ‘‘level playing field’’ in America a reality, broadband is essential. Con-
gress should consider integrating a broadband component into all programs address-
ing economic and community development as well as library services, education and 
healthcare. 

Additionally,  Congress  must  put  the  reform  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund  (USF) 
as  a  first  ‘‘must  do’’  in  its  telecommunications  agenda.  USF  is  a  critical  tool  for 
broadband  build  out  and  for  sustaining  broadband  once  it  is  constructed.  As  part 
of USF, the E-rate and rural telemedicine programs must be maintained and be con-
figured  to  allow  for  more  collaboration  and  aggregation  of  demand  leading  to 
broadband access especially in rural communities. Since it will be some time before 
there is ‘‘big broadband’’ to every home, we must make sure that unreached commu-
nities  have  access  through  their  public  libraries  and  rural  healthcare  providers  for 
the interim and thereafter. 

When  the  Senate  considers  a  new  nominee  for  chair  of  the  Federal  Communica-
tions  Commission  (FCC)  priority  must  be  on  a  candidate  who  is  not  just  visionary, 
but  is  genuinely  willing  to  set  broadband  as  the  top  goal  for  2009–2010—and  be 
willing to state such in a confirmation hearing. 

Congress also has a role in revitalizing the National Telecommunications and In-
formation  Administration  (NTIA)  and  expanding  the  Rural  Utilities  Services  pro-
gram and related programs in the Department of Agriculture. Emphasis on existing 
or new initiatives should be on promoting aggregation of demand and the flexibility 
to develop partnerships, especially in rural and remote areas. 

Meanwhile,  the  Obama  Administration  must  make  broadband  deployment  one  of 
the  highest  priorities  to  promote  economic  development,  education  and  community 
development.  The  Administration  should  develop  a  clear  vision  statement  to  pro-
mote broadband policies and work closely with Congress to actualize this vision. 

We  believe  there  is  still  a  need  for  a  strong  public  education  program  conducted 
by  both  leaders  in  the  Executive  Branch  and  Congress  and  through  trusted  inter-
mediaries  such  as  public  libraries  about  why  broadband  is  so  essential—especially 
in  communities  that  do  not  have  broadband  and  have  not  experienced  what  it  can 
do. 

Question  2.  What  policy  initiatives  should  be  included  in  the  President’s  national 

broadband Strategy? 

Answer.  We  encourage  the  President  to  appoint  strong  leaders  and  effective  ad-
ministrators  at  the  FCC  and  the  NTIA  to  promote  and  coordinate  the  Administra-
tion’s  broadband  efforts.  A  public  education  program  should  be  established  for  both 
national leaders—but also for local education programs to inform communities about 
the  need  for  broadband  and  the  many  essential  services  and  opportunities  for  eco-
nomic  development,  education  and  telemedicine.  If  there  is  a  ‘‘chief  technology  offi-
cer’’ (CTO) the role should be as much about public education and promoting appli-
cations  as  it  is  on  ending  up  on  the  same  old  corporate  disputes  between  different 
carriers and technologies. 

Question 3. What can be accomplished at the FCC? 
Answer.  The  FCC  must  serve  its  role  in  the  reform  of  USF  and  promoting 
broadband  construction.  Its  policies  should  be  technology-neutral  and  provide  op-
tions for different technologies to be used in different types of communities with dif-
ferent  geographies  and  economics.  This  means  a  more  flexible  USF  especially  in 
rural areas. By all means, the FCC must assure that the E-rate and rural telemedi-
cine programs are stabilized and functioning effectively. 

Question  4.  And  what  initiatives  should  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  to 
increase understanding and information in order to improve demand on the part of 
the consumer? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

75 

Answer. There should be a greater emphasis on public education to promote WHY 
our  Nation  needs  broadband.  At  the  end  of  the  day,  it  is  the  applications  that 
broadband allows—from commercial and retail enterprises to e-government services 
to distance learning and remote telemedicine services and much more. Policies that 
impact the use of the technology should not limit the potential for creative new uses 
of broadband. The library community stands firmly in support of network neutrality 
as one policy reform needed to assure an open Internet. 

Hon. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 
Hart Senate Office Building, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator McCaskill, 

November 18, 2008 

I  am  so  appreciative  of  the  opportunity  to  address  the  Senate  Commerce  Com-
mittee  on  September  16  to  share  stories  of  how  Missouri’s  libraries  (and  indeed  li-
braries  across  the  nation)  are  dependent  on  robust  broadband  Internet  access  to 
meet the needs of citizens. 

You asked about the demand of higher education on Internet usage, and I am at-
taching  a  chart  showing  actual  and  projected  usage  of  bandwidth  from  MOREnet 
for  higher  education  circuits.  MOREnet  serves  the  majority  of  public  colleges  and 
universities in the state. 

You also asked about the State of Missouri’s investment in public Internet access. 

Here are the funds from the current state budget dedicated to MOREnet: 

For education: $12,829,612 
For libraries: $3,109,000 

State  agencies  currently  expend  a  little  under  $1  million  per  year  for  broadband 
and  Internet  services.  This  is  the  amount  paid  to  communication  carriers  (ca. 
$800,000)  and  for  MOREnet  membership  fees,  and  does  not  include  equipment  or 
personnel costs to handle connectivity and security. 

Finally,  the  amount  MOREnet  spends  on  e-rate  eligible  services  returns  around 

MARGARET M. CONROY, 

Missouri State Librarian. 

$6,000,000 annually to the state in e-rate funds ($5,909,000 in FY08). 

Thank you again for the opportunity to address the Senate Commerce Committee 
and  to  provide  you  with  information  on  how  telecommunications  investments  sup-
port libraries and education in Missouri. 

Sincerely, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

76 

14,000  ,---------=' - - - - -- - - -- - -- - - - - - ,  

Missouri Higher Education Institutions Bandwidth Growth 

12,000  f---- - - -- - - - - -- - - - --

-

.!) 

- - - - - - - - ----j 

~ 10,000 
6 
"0 :5  8,OOO I - - - - - - --
~ 
~ 6,000  f - -- - - - -- - - - - - -- -

'(cid:173)
OJ 

l I:  4,000  f - - - - - -- - - - -- --f 

2,000  f----- - - - - - - - - - ,  

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:36 Apr 23, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80429.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
2
R
N
O
C
6
1
9

